Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4550.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: ARTICLE 1 AGING AND DISABILITY SERVICES Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245A.03, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Licensing moratorium. (a) The commissioner shall not issue an initial license for child foster care licensed under Minnesota Rules, parts 2960.3000 to 2960.3340, which does not include child foster residence settings with residential program certifications for compliance with the Family First Prevention Services Act under section 245A.25, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), or adult foster care licensed under Minnesota Rules, parts 9555.5105 to 9555.6265, under this chapter for a physical location that will not be the primary residence of the license holder for the entire period of licensure. If a child foster residence setting that was previously exempt from the licensing moratorium under this paragraph has its Family First Prevention Services Act certification rescinded under section 245A.25, subdivision 9, or if a family adult foster care home license is issued during this moratorium, and the license holder changes the license holder's primary residence away from the physical location of the foster care license, the commissioner shall revoke the license according to section 245A.07. The commissioner shall not issue an initial license for a community residential setting licensed under chapter 245D. When approving an exception under this paragraph, the commissioner shall consider the resource need determination process in paragraph (h), the availability of foster care licensed beds in the geographic area in which the licensee seeks to operate, the results of a person's choices during their annual assessment and service plan review, and the recommendation of the local county board. The determination by the commissioner is final and not subject to appeal. Exceptions to the moratorium include: (1) a license for a person in a foster care setting that is not the primary residence of the license holder and where at least 80 percent of the residents are 55 years of age or older; deleted text begin (2) foster care licenses replacing foster care licenses in existence on May 15, 2009, or community residential setting licenses replacing adult foster care licenses in existence on December 31, 2013, and determined to be needed by the commissioner under paragraph (b); deleted text end deleted text begin (3)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end new foster care licenses or community residential setting licenses determined to be needed by the commissioner under paragraph (b) for the closure of a nursing facility, ICF/DD, or regional treatment center; restructuring of state-operated services that limits the capacity of state-operated facilities; or allowing movement to the community for people who no longer require the level of care provided in state-operated facilities as provided under section 256B.092, subdivision 13, or 256B.49, subdivision 24;new text begin ornew text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end new foster care licenses or community residential setting licenses determined to be needed by the commissioner under paragraph (b) for persons requiring hospital-level caredeleted text begin ; ordeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (5) new community residential setting licenses determined necessary by the commissioner for people affected by the closure of homes with a capacity of five or six beds currently licensed as supervised living facilities licensed under Minnesota Rules, chapter 4665, but not designated as intermediate care facilities. This exception is available until June 30, 2025. deleted text end (b) The commissioner shall determine the need for newly licensed foster care homes or community residential settings as defined under this subdivision. As part of the determination, the commissioner shall consider the availability of foster care capacity in the area in which the licensee seeks to operate, and the recommendation of the local county board. The determination by the commissioner must be final. A determination of need is not required for a change in ownership at the same address. (c) When an adult resident served by the program moves out of a foster home that is not the primary residence of the license holder according to section 256B.49, subdivision 15, paragraph (f), or the adult community residential setting, the county shall immediately inform the Department of Human Services Licensing Division. The department may decrease the statewide licensed capacity for adult foster care settings. (d) Residential settings that would otherwise be subject to the decreased license capacity established in paragraph (c) must be exempt if the license holder's beds are occupied by residents whose primary diagnosis is mental illness and the license holder is certified under the requirements in subdivision 6a or section 245D.33. (e) A resource need determination process, managed at the state level, using the available data required by section 144A.351, and other data and information must be used to determine where the reduced capacity determined under section 256B.493 will be implemented. The commissioner shall consult with the stakeholders described in section 144A.351, and employ a variety of methods to improve the state's capacity to meet the informed decisions of those people who want to move out of corporate foster care or community residential settings, long-term service needs within budgetary limits, including seeking proposals from service providers or lead agencies to change service type, capacity, or location to improve services, increase the independence of residents, and better meet needs identified by the long-term services and supports reports and statewide data and information. (f) At the time of application and reapplication for licensure, the applicant and the license holder that are subject to the moratorium or an exclusion established in paragraph (a) are required to inform the commissioner whether the physical location where the foster care will be provided is or will be the primary residence of the license holder for the entire period of licensure. If the primary residence of the applicant or license holder changes, the applicant or license holder must notify the commissioner immediately. The commissioner shall print on the foster care license certificate whether or not the physical location is the primary residence of the license holder. (g) License holders of foster care homes identified under paragraph (f) that are not the primary residence of the license holder and that also provide services in the foster care home that are covered by a federally approved home and community-based services waiver, as authorized under chapter 256S or section 256B.092 or 256B.49, must inform the human services licensing division that the license holder provides or intends to provide these waiver-funded services. (h) The commissioner may adjust capacity to address needs identified in section 144A.351. Under this authority, the commissioner may approve new licensed settings or delicense existing settings. Delicensing of settings will be accomplished through a process identified in section 256B.493. (i) The commissioner must notify a license holder when its corporate foster care or community residential setting licensed beds are reduced under this section. The notice of reduction of licensed beds must be in writing and delivered to the license holder by certified mail or personal service. The notice must state why the licensed beds are reduced and must inform the license holder of its right to request reconsideration by the commissioner. The license holder's request for reconsideration must be in writing. If mailed, the request for reconsideration must be postmarked and sent to the commissioner within 20 calendar days after the license holder's receipt of the notice of reduction of licensed beds. If a request for reconsideration is made by personal service, it must be received by the commissioner within 20 calendar days after the license holder's receipt of the notice of reduction of licensed beds. (j) The commissioner shall not issue an initial license for children's residential treatment services licensed under Minnesota Rules, parts 2960.0580 to 2960.0700, under this chapter for a program that Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services would consider an institution for mental diseases. Facilities that serve only private pay clients are exempt from the moratorium described in this paragraph. The commissioner has the authority to manage existing statewide capacity for children's residential treatment services subject to the moratorium under this paragraph and may issue an initial license for such facilities if the initial license would not increase the statewide capacity for children's residential treatment services subject to the moratorium under this paragraph. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245D.091, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Positive support professional qualifications. A positive support professional providing positive support services as identified in section 245D.03, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), clause (1), item (i), must have competencies in the following areas as required under the brain injury, community access for disability inclusion, community alternative care, and developmental disabilities waiver plans or successor plans: (1) ethical considerations; (2) functional assessment; (3) functional analysis; (4) measurement of behavior and interpretation of data; (5) selecting intervention outcomes and strategies; (6) behavior reduction and elimination strategies that promote least restrictive approved alternatives; (7) data collection; (8) staff and caregiver training; (9) support plan monitoring; (10) co-occurring mental disorders or neurocognitive disorder; (11) demonstrated expertise with populations being served; and (12) must be a: (i) psychologist licensed under sections 148.88 to 148.98, who has stated to the Board of Psychology competencies in the above identified areas; (ii) clinical social worker licensed as an independent clinical social worker under chapter 148E, or a person with a master's degree in social work from an accredited college or university, with at least 4,000 hours of post-master's supervised experience in the delivery of clinical services in the areas identified in clauses (1) to (11); (iii) physician licensed under chapter 147 and certified by the American Board of Psychiatry and Neurology or eligible for board certification in psychiatry with competencies in the areas identified in clauses (1) to (11); (iv) licensed professional clinical counselor licensed under sections deleted text begin 148B.29 to 148B.39deleted text end new text begin 148B.5301 and 148B.532new text end with at least 4,000 hours of post-master's supervised experience in the delivery of clinical services who has demonstrated competencies in the areas identified in clauses (1) to (11); (v) person with a master's degree from an accredited college or university in one of the behavioral sciences or related fields, with at least 4,000 hours of post-master's supervised experience in the delivery of clinical services with demonstrated competencies in the areas identified in clauses (1) to (11); (vi) person with a master's degree or PhD in one of the behavioral sciences or related fields with demonstrated expertise in positive support services, as determined by the person's needs as outlined in the person's assessment summary; (vii) registered nurse who is licensed under sections 148.171 to 148.285, and who is certified as a clinical specialist or as a nurse practitioner in adult or family psychiatric and mental health nursing by a national nurse certification organization, or who has a master's degree in nursing or one of the behavioral sciences or related fields from an accredited college or university or its equivalent, with at least 4,000 hours of post-master's supervised experience in the delivery of clinical services; or (viii) person who has completed a competency-based training program as determined by the commissioner. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245D.091, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Positive support analyst qualifications. (a) A positive support analyst providing positive support services as identified in section 245D.03, subdivision 1, paragraph (c), clause (1), item (i), must satisfy one of the following requirements as required under the brain injury, community access for disability inclusion, community alternative care, and developmental disabilities waiver plans or successor plans: (1) have obtained a baccalaureate degree, master's degree, or PhD in either a social services discipline or nursing; (2) meet the qualifications of a mental health practitioner as defined in section 245.462, subdivision 17; (3) be a deleted text begin board-certifieddeleted text end new text begin licensed new text end behavior analyst or new text begin a new text end board-certified assistant behavior analyst new text begin certified new text end by the Behavior Analyst Certification Board, Incorporated; or (4) have completed a competency-based training program as determined by the commissioner. (b) In addition, a positive support analyst must: (1) either have two years of supervised experience conducting functional behavior assessments and designing, implementing, and evaluating effectiveness of positive practices behavior support strategies for people who exhibit challenging behaviors as well as co-occurring mental disorders and neurocognitive disorder, or for those who have obtained a baccalaureate degree in one of the behavioral sciences or related fields, demonstrated expertise in positive support services; (2) have received training prior to hire or within 90 calendar days of hire that includes: (i) ten hours of instruction in functional assessment and functional analysis; (ii) 20 hours of instruction in the understanding of the function of behavior; (iii) ten hours of instruction on design of positive practices behavior support strategies; (iv) 20 hours of instruction preparing written intervention strategies, designing data collection protocols, training other staff to implement positive practice strategies, summarizing and reporting program evaluation data, analyzing program evaluation data to identify design flaws in behavioral interventions or failures in implementation fidelity, and recommending enhancements based on evaluation data; and (v) eight hours of instruction on principles of person-centered thinking; (3) be determined by a positive support professional to have the training and prerequisite skills required to provide positive practice strategies as well as behavior reduction approved and permitted intervention to the person who receives positive support; and (4) be under the direct supervision of a positive support professional. (c) Meeting the qualifications for a positive support professional under subdivision 2 shall substitute for meeting the qualifications listed in paragraph (b). new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0625, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 77. new text end new text begin Early intensive developmental and behavioral intervention benefit. new text end new text begin Medical assistance covers early intensive developmental and behavioral intervention services according to section 256B.0949. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.0911, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. MnCHOICES assessor qualifications, training, and certification. (a) The commissioner shall develop and implement a curriculum and an assessor certification process. (b) MnCHOICES certified assessors must have received training and certification specific to assessment and consultation for long-term care services in the state and either: (1) have at least an associate's degree in human services, or other closely related field; (2) have at least an associate's degree in nursing with a public health nursing certificate, or other closely related field; or (3) be a registered nurse. (c) Certified assessors shall demonstrate best practices in assessment and support planning, including person-centered planning principles, and have a common set of skills that ensures consistency and equitable access to services statewide. (d) Certified assessors must be recertified every three years. new text begin (e) A Tribal Nation may establish the Tribal Nation's own education and experience qualifications for certified assessors. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0911, subdivision 32, is amended to read: Subd. 32. Administrative activity. (a) The commissioner shall: (1) streamline the processes, including timelines for when assessments need to be completed; (2) provide the services in this section; and (3) implement integrated solutions to automate the business processes to the extent necessary for support plan approval, reimbursement, program planning, evaluation, and policy development. (b) The commissioner shall work with lead agencies responsible for conducting long-term care consultation services todeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end modify the MnCHOICES application and assessment policies to create efficiencies while ensuring federal compliance with medical assistance and long-term services and supports eligibility criteriadeleted text begin ; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (2) develop a set of measurable benchmarks sufficient to demonstrate quarterly improvement in the average time per assessment and other mutually agreed upon measures of increasing efficiency. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) The commissioner shall collect data on the benchmarks developed under paragraph (b) and provide to the lead agencies an annual trend analysis of the data in order to demonstrate the commissioner's compliance with the requirements of this subdivision. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0924, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Eligibility. Persons are eligible to receive targeted case management services under this section if the requirements in paragraphs (a) and (b) are met. (a) The person must be assessed and determined by the local county new text begin or Tribal new text end agency to: (1) be age 18 or older; (2) be receiving medical assistance; (3) have significant functional limitations; and (4) be in need of service coordination to attain or maintain living in an integrated community setting. (b) new text begin Except as permitted under paragraph (c), new text end the person must benew text begin : (i)new text end a vulnerable adult in need of adult protection as defined in section 626.5572deleted text begin , or isdeleted text end new text begin ; (ii)new text end an adult with a developmental disability as defined in section 252A.02, subdivision 2deleted text begin , ordeleted text end new text begin ; (iii) an adult withnew text end a related condition as defined in section 256B.02, subdivision 11, deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin whonew text end is not receiving home and community-based waiver servicesdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end or deleted text begin isdeleted text end new text begin (iv)new text end an adult who lacks a permanent residence and who has been without a permanent residence for at least one year or on at least four occasions in the last three years. new text begin (c) Tribal agencies may make a determination of eligibility under Tribal governance codes for adult protection or policy procedures consistent with section 626.5572 when determining whether a person is a vulnerable adult in need of adult protection or an adult with developmental disabilities or a related condition. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0924, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Provider standards. County boards deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end providers who contract with the countynew text begin , or Tribal government contracted providersnew text end are eligible to receive medical assistance reimbursement for adult targeted case management services. To qualify as a provider of targeted case management services the vendor must: (1) have demonstrated the capacity and experience to provide the activities of case management services defined in subdivision 4; (2) be able to coordinate and link community resources needed by the recipient; (3) have the administrative capacity and experience to serve the eligible population in providing services and to ensure quality of services under state and federal requirements; (4) have a financial management system that provides accurate documentation of services and costs under state and federal requirements; (5) have the capacity to document and maintain individual case records complying with state and federal requirements; (6) coordinate with county social deleted text begin servicedeleted text end new text begin services or Tribal human servicesnew text end agencies responsible for planning for community social services under chapters 256E and 256F; conducting adult protective investigations under section 626.557, and conducting prepetition screenings for commitments under section 253B.07; (7) coordinate with health care providers to ensure access to necessary health care services; (8) have a procedure in place that notifies the recipient and the recipient's legal representative of any conflict of interest if the contracted targeted case management service provider also provides the recipient's services and supports and provides information on all potential conflicts of interest and obtains the recipient's informed consent and provides the recipient with alternatives; and (9) have demonstrated the capacity to achieve the following performance outcomes: access, quality, and consumer satisfaction. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0924, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 5a. new text end new text begin Tribal case manager qualifications. new text end new text begin An individual is authorized to serve as a vulnerable adult and developmental disability targeted case manager if the individual is certified by a federally recognized Tribal government in Minnesota pursuant to section 256B.02, subdivision 7, paragraph (c). new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.0924, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Payment for targeted case management. (a) Medical assistance and MinnesotaCare payment for targeted case management shall be made on a monthly basis. In order to receive payment for an eligible adult, the provider must document at least one contact per month and not more than two consecutive months without a face-to-face contact either in person or by interactive video that meets the requirements in section 256B.0625, subdivision 20b, with the adult or the adult's legal representative, family, primary caregiver, or other relevant persons identified as necessary to the development or implementation of the goals of the personal service plan. (b) Except as provided under paragraph (m), payment for targeted case management provided by county staff under this subdivision shall be based on the monthly rate methodology under section 256B.094, subdivision 6, paragraph (b), calculated as one combined average rate together with adult mental health case management under section 256B.0625, subdivision 20deleted text begin , except for calendar year 2002deleted text end . deleted text begin In calendar year 2002, the rate for case management under this section shall be the same as the rate for adult mental health case management in effect as of December 31, 2001.deleted text end Billing and payment must identify the recipient's primary population group to allow tracking of revenues. (c) Payment for targeted case management provided by county-contracted vendors shall be based on a monthly rate calculated in accordance with section 256B.076, subdivision 2. new text begin Payment for case management provided by vendors who contract with a Tribe must be made in accordance with Indian health service facility requirements. If a Tribe chooses to contract with a vendor receiving payment not through an Indian health service facility, the rate must be based on a monthly rate negotiated by the Tribe. new text end The rate must not exceed the rate charged by the vendor for the same service to other payers. If the service is provided by a team of contracted vendors, the team shall determine how to distribute the rate among its members. No reimbursement received by contracted vendors shall be returned to the countynew text begin or Tribenew text end , except to reimburse the county new text begin or Tribe new text end for advance funding provided by the county new text begin or Tribe new text end to the vendor. (d) If the service is provided by a team that includes new text begin any combination of new text end contracted vendors deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin ,new text end county new text begin staff, and Tribal new text end staff, the costs for county staff participation on the team shall be included in the rate for county-provided services. In this case, the contracted vendor and the countynew text begin and Tribal case managersnew text end may each receive separate payment for services provided by each entity in the same month. In order to prevent duplication of services, deleted text begin the countydeleted text end new text begin each entitynew text end must documentdeleted text begin , in the recipient's file,deleted text end the need for team targeted case management and a description of the different roles of deleted text begin the team membersdeleted text end new text begin staffnew text end . (e) Notwithstanding section 256B.19, subdivision 1, the nonfederal share of costs for targeted case management shall be provided by the recipient's county of responsibility, as defined in sections 256G.01 to 256G.12, from sources other than federal funds or funds used to match other federal funds.new text begin If the service is provided by a Tribal agency, the recipient's Tribe must provide the nonfederal share of costs, if any.new text end (f) The commissioner may suspend, reduce, or terminate reimbursement to a provider that does not meet the reporting or other requirements of this section. The county of responsibility, as defined in sections 256G.01 to 256G.12, new text begin or Tribe when applicable, new text end is responsible for any federal disallowances. The county may share this responsibility with its contracted vendors. (g) The commissioner shall set aside five percent of the federal funds received under this section for use in reimbursing the state for costs of developing and implementing this section. (h) Payments to counties new text begin and Tribes new text end for targeted case management expenditures under this section shall only be made from federal earnings from services provided under this section. Payments to contracted vendors shall include both the federal earnings and the county share. (i) Notwithstanding section 256B.041, county new text begin or Tribal new text end payments for the cost of case management services provided by county new text begin or Tribal new text end staff shall not be made to the commissioner of management and budget. For the purposes of targeted case management services provided by county new text begin or Tribal new text end staff under this section, the centralized disbursement of payments to counties new text begin or Tribes new text end under section 256B.041 consists only of federal earnings from services provided under this section. (j) If the recipient is a resident of a nursing facility, intermediate care facility, or hospital, and the recipient's institutional care is paid by medical assistance, payment for targeted case management services under this subdivision is limited to the lesser of: (1) the last 180 days of the recipient's residency in that facility; or (2) the limits and conditions which apply to federal Medicaid funding for this service. (k) Payment for targeted case management services under this subdivision shall not duplicate payments made under other program authorities for the same purpose. (l) Any growth in targeted case management services and cost increases under this section shall be the responsibility of the countiesnew text begin or Tribesnew text end . (m) The commissioner may make payments for Tribes according to section 256B.0625, subdivision 34, or other relevant federally approved rate setting methodologies for vulnerable adult and developmental disability targeted case management provided by Indian health services and facilities operated by a Tribe or Tribal organization. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. new text end Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0924, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Implementation and evaluation. The commissioner of human services in consultation with county boards new text begin and Tribal Nations new text end shall establish a program to accomplish the provisions of subdivisions 1 to 6. The commissioner in consultation with county boards new text begin and Tribal Nations new text end shall establish performance measures to evaluate the effectiveness of the targeted case management services. If a county new text begin or Tribe new text end fails to meet agreed-upon performance measures, the commissioner may authorize contracted providers other than the countynew text begin or Tribenew text end . Providers contracted by the commissioner shall also be subject to the standards in subdivision 6. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.0949, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Definitions. (a) The terms used in this section have the meanings given in this subdivision. (b) "Advanced certification" means a person who has completed advanced certification in an approved modality under subdivision 13, paragraph (b). (c) "Agency" means the legal entity that is enrolled with Minnesota health care programs as a medical assistance provider according to Minnesota Rules, part 9505.0195, to provide EIDBI services and that has the legal responsibility to ensure that its employees carry out the responsibilities defined in this section. Agency includes a licensed individual professional who practices independently and acts as an agency. (d) "Autism spectrum disorder or a related condition" or "ASD or a related condition" means either autism spectrum disorder (ASD) as defined in the current version of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM) or a condition that is found to be closely related to ASD, as identified under the current version of the DSM, and meets all of the following criteria: (1) is severe and chronic; (2) results in impairment of adaptive behavior and function similar to that of a person with ASD; (3) requires treatment or services similar to those required for a person with ASD; and (4) results in substantial functional limitations in three core developmental deficits of ASD: social or interpersonal interaction; functional communication, including nonverbal or social communication; and restrictive or repetitive behaviors or hyperreactivity or hyporeactivity to sensory input; and may include deficits or a high level of support in one or more of the following domains: (i) behavioral challenges and self-regulation; (ii) cognition; (iii) learning and play; (iv) self-care; or (v) safety. (e) "Behavior analyst" means an individual licensed under sections 148.9981 to 148.9995 as a behavior analyst. (f) "Clinical supervision" means the overall responsibility for the control and direction of EIDBI service delivery, including deleted text begin individual treatment planning,deleted text end staff supervision,new text begin including observation and direction;new text end individual treatment plannew text begin development andnew text end progress monitoringdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ; family training and counseling;new text end and deleted text begin treatment reviewdeleted text end new text begin coordinated care conference coordinationnew text end for each person. Clinical supervision is provided by a qualified supervising professional (QSP) who takes full professional responsibility for the service provided by each supervisee and the clinical effectiveness of all interventions. (g) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of human services, unless otherwise specified. (h) "Comprehensive multidisciplinary evaluation" or "CMDE" means a comprehensive evaluation of a person to determine medical necessity for EIDBI services based on the requirements in subdivision 5. (i) "Department" means the Department of Human Services, unless otherwise specified. (j) "Early intensive developmental and behavioral intervention benefit" or "EIDBI benefit" means a variety of individualized, intensive treatment modalities approved and published by the commissioner that are based in behavioral and developmental science consistent with best practices on effectiveness. (k) "Employee of an agency" or "employee" means any individual who is employed temporarily, part time, or full time by the agency that is submitting claims or billing for the work, services, supervision, or treatment performed by the individual. Employee does not include an independent contractor, billing agency, or consultant who is not providing EIDBI services. Employee does not include an individual who performs work, provides services, supervises, or provides treatment for less than 80 hours in a 12-month period. (l) "Generalizable goals" means results or gains that are observed during a variety of activities over time with different people, such as providers, family members, other adults, and people, and in different environments including, but not limited to, clinics, homes, schools, and the community. (m) "Incident" means when any of the following occur: (1) an illness, accident, or injury that requires first aid treatment; (2) a bump or blow to the head; or (3) an unusual or unexpected event that jeopardizes the safety of a person or staff, including a person leaving the agency unattended. (n) "Individual treatment plan" or "ITP" means the person-centered, individualized written plan of care that integrates and coordinates person and family information from the CMDE for a person who meets medical necessity for the EIDBI benefit. An individual treatment plan must meet the standards in subdivision 6. (o) "Legal representative" means the parent of a child who is under 18 years of age, a court-appointed guardian, or other representative with legal authority to make decisions about service for a person. For the purpose of this subdivision, "other representative with legal authority to make decisions" includes a health care agent or an attorney-in-fact authorized through a health care directive or power of attorney. (p) "Mental health professional" means a staff person who is qualified according to section 245I.04, subdivision 2. (q) "Person" means an individual under 21 years of age. (r) "Person-centered" means a service that both responds to the identified needs, interests, values, preferences, and desired outcomes of the person or the person's legal representative and respects the person's history, dignity, and cultural background and allows inclusion and participation in the person's community. (s) "Qualified EIDBI provider" means an individual who is a QSP or a level I, level II, or level III treatment provider. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.0949, subdivision 16, is amended to read: Subd. 16. Agency duties. (a) An agency delivering an EIDBI service under this section must: (1) enroll as a medical assistance Minnesota health care program provider according to Minnesota Rules, part 9505.0195, and section 256B.04, subdivision 21, and meet all applicable provider standards and requirements; (2) designate an individual as the agency's compliance officer who must perform the duties described in section 256B.04, subdivision 21, paragraph (g); (3) demonstrate compliance with federal and state laws for the delivery of and billing for EIDBI service; (4) verify and maintain records of a service provided to the person or the person's legal representative as required under Minnesota Rules, parts 9505.2175 and 9505.2197; (5) demonstrate that while enrolled or seeking enrollment as a Minnesota health care program provider the agency did not have a lead agency contract or provider agreement discontinued because of a conviction of fraud; or did not have an owner, board member, or manager fail a state or federal criminal background check or appear on the list of excluded individuals or entities maintained by the federal Department of Human Services Office of Inspector General; (6) have established business practices including written policies and procedures, internal controls, and a system that demonstrates the organization's ability to deliver quality EIDBI services, appropriately submit claims, conduct required staff training, document staff qualifications, document service activities, and document service quality; (7) have an office located in Minnesota or a border state; (8) initiate a background study as required under subdivision 16a; (9) report maltreatment according to section 626.557 and chapter 260E; (10) comply with any data requests consistent with the Minnesota Government Data Practices Act, sections 256B.064 and 256B.27; (11) provide training for all agency staff on the requirements and responsibilities listed in the Maltreatment of Minors Act, chapter 260E, and the Vulnerable Adult Protection Act, section 626.557, including mandated and voluntary reporting, nonretaliation, and the agency's policy for all staff on how to report suspected abuse and neglect; (12) have a written policy to resolve issues collaboratively with the person and the person's legal representative when possible. The policy must include a timeline for when the person and the person's legal representative will be notified about issues that arise in the provision of services; (13) provide the person's legal representative with prompt notification if the person is injured while being served by the agency. An incident report must be completed by the agency staff member in charge of the person. A copy of all incident and injury reports must remain on file at the agency for at least five years from the report of the incident; (14) before starting a service, provide the person or the person's legal representative a description of the treatment modality that the person shall receive, including the staffing certification levels and training of the staff who shall provide a treatment; (15) provide clinical supervision for a minimum of one hour for every 16 hours of direct treatment per person, unless otherwise authorized in the person's individual treatment plan; and (16) provide new text begin the new text end required EIDBI intervention observation and direction new text begin by a QSP or Level I provider new text end at least once per month. Notwithstanding subdivision 13, paragraph (l), required EIDBI intervention observation and direction under this clause may be conducted via telehealth provided that no more than two consecutive monthly required EIDBI intervention observation and direction sessions under this clause are conducted via telehealth. (b) Upon request of the commissioner, an agency delivering services under this section must: (1) identify the agency's controlling individuals, as defined under section 245A.02, subdivision 5a; (2) provide disclosures of the use of billing agencies and other consultants who do not provide EIDBI services; and (3) provide copies of any contracts with consultants or independent contractors who do not provide EIDBI services, including hours contracted and responsibilities. (c) When delivering the ITP, and annually thereafter, an agency must provide the person or the person's legal representative with: (1) a written copy and a verbal explanation of the person's or person's legal representative's rights and the agency's responsibilities; (2) documentation in the person's file the date that the person or the person's legal representative received a copy and explanation of the person's or person's legal representative's rights and the agency's responsibilities; and (3) reasonable accommodations to provide the information in another format or language as needed to facilitate understanding of the person's or person's legal representative's rights and the agency's responsibilities. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0949, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 19. new text end new text begin Documentation requirements. new text end new text begin (a) CMDE and EIDBI providers must ensure that all documentation, including but not limited to health service records and personnel files, complies with this subdivision, subdivision 16, and Minnesota Rules, parts 9505.2175 and 9505.2197. Documentation must be complete, legible, accurate, and readily accessible. new text end new text begin (b) All documentation must: new text end new text begin (1) be legible and understandable to individuals outside service delivery; new text end new text begin (2) include the participant's name on each health record page and the provider's name on each personnel file page; new text end new text begin (3) be signed and dated by the provider completing the documentation, with the provider's full name, title, and credentials; new text end new text begin (4) be entered within 72 hours of service, and contain a record and explanation of any delays in entry; new text end new text begin (5) clearly reflect clinical decision-making and support medical necessity; new text end new text begin (6) be securely stored in accordance with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA), Public Law 104-191; new text end new text begin (7) be stored in accordance with state and federal document retention laws; new text end new text begin (8) be available for review or audit; new text end new text begin (9) include a record of caregiver involvement where applicable; and new text end new text begin (10) include a record of supervision and oversight for staff providing services requiring supervision under EIDBI policy. new text end new text begin (c) Each EIDBI service occurrence must be documented in a progress note in a manner and with the information determined by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (d) All providers must maintain current personnel records for each employee in a manner determined by the commissioner that include: new text end new text begin (1) the employee's name, contact information, and hire date; new text end new text begin (2) the employee's completed employment application and acknowledgment of duties; new text end new text begin (3) the job description for the employee's job with the effective date; new text end new text begin (4) verification of the employee's qualifications, including but not limited to education, licenses, certifications, enrollment attestation, degrees, transcripts, and experience; new text end new text begin (5) a background check pursuant to chapter 245C; new text end new text begin (6) orientation and required training the employee attended, including but not limited to training on mandated reporting, cultural responsiveness, and EIDBI competencies; new text end new text begin (7) the dates of the employee's first supervised and unsupervised client contact following employment; new text end new text begin (8) documentation of supervision received by the employee, including but not limited to the supervisor's name and credentials, dates of supervision, and supervision content; new text end new text begin (9) the employee's CPR and emergency response training, if required; and new text end new text begin (10) the employee's annual performance evaluations. new text end Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.4905, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Informed choice policy. (a) It is the policy of this state that all adults who have disabilities and, with support from their families or legal representatives, that all children who have disabilities: (1) may make informed choices to select and utilize disability services and supports; and (2) are offered an informed decision-making process sufficient to make informed choices. (b) It is the policy of this state that disability waivers services support the presumption that adults who have disabilities and, with support from their families or legal representatives, all children who have disabilities may make informed choices; and that all adults who have disabilities and all families of children who have disabilities and are accessing waiver services under sections 256B.092 and 256B.49 are provided an informed decision-making process that satisfies the requirements of subdivision 3a. new text begin (c) Lead agencies must support individuals in making informed choices by: new text end new text begin (1) providing complete and accurate information about available home and community-based services and settings; new text end new text begin (2) providing the information in a manner that is culturally and linguistically appropriate; and new text end new text begin (3) facilitating access to services that reflect the individual's preferences and assessed needs. new text end new text begin (d) For individuals who are members of or affiliated with a federally recognized Tribal Nation located within Minnesota, informed choice includes the right to receive services administered or provided by the individual's Tribal Nation. Lead agencies must: new text end new text begin (1) inform individuals of services offered by Tribal Nations enrolled as Minnesota health care providers; new text end new text begin (2) directly coordinate with the individual's Tribal Nation human services agency when the individual seeks or may be eligible for services administered or provided by that Tribal Nation; and new text end new text begin (3) ensure that service planning and delivery respects the individual's rights as both a member of a sovereign Tribal Nation and a resident of Minnesota. new text end new text begin (e) County lead agencies and Tribal Nation human services agencies must establish and maintain procedures to share updated contact information, coordinate case management, and provide timely referrals necessary to ensure that informed choice is fully exercised. new text end new text begin (f) Nothing in this section limits the sovereignty of Tribal Nations or the authority of Tribal governments to administer home and community-based services to their members. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.4914, subdivision 10a, is amended to read: Subd. 10a. Reporting and analysis of cost data. (a) The commissioner must ensure that wage values and component values in subdivisions 5 to 9 reflect the cost to provide the service. As determined by the commissioner, in consultation with community partners identified in subdivision 17, a provider enrolled to provide services with rates determined under this section must submit requested cost data to the commissioner to support research on the cost of providing services that have rates determined by the disability waiver rates system. Requested cost data may include, but is not limited to: (1) worker wage costs; (2) benefits paid; (3) supervisor wage costs; (4) executive wage costs; (5) vacation, sick, and training time paid; (6) taxes, workers' compensation, and unemployment insurance costs paid; (7) administrative costs paid; (8) program costs paid; (9) transportation costs paid; (10) vacancy rates; and (11) other data relating to costs required to provide services requested by the commissioner. (b) At least once in any five-year period, a provider must submit cost data for a fiscal year that ended not more than 18 months prior to the submission date. The commissioner shall provide each provider a 90-day notice prior to its submission due date. new text begin The commissioner may review report submissions for inaccurate, inconclusive, incomplete, or otherwise deficient data and may remove the report from submitted status for further verification. new text end If a provider fails to submit required reporting data, the commissioner shall provide notice to providers that have not provided required data 30 days after the required submission date, and a second notice for providers who have not provided required data 60 days after the required submission date. The commissioner shall temporarily suspend payments to the provider if cost data is not received 90 days after the required submission date. Withheld payments shall be made once data is received new text begin and reviewed for compliance new text end by the commissioner. (c) The commissioner shall conduct a random validation of data submitted under paragraph (a) to ensure data accuracy.new text begin Providers selected to validate cost reports must respond to the commissioner within 30 days with the requested financial documentation. If a provider fails to respond to the commissioner with all the requested information within 30 days, the commissioner must temporarily suspend payments. The commissioner must resume payments once the requested documentation is received. If a provider is unable to validate the provider's costs with supporting documentation, the commissioner must require the provider to participate in the random validation the next year that the commissioner selects providers to report their costs.new text end The commissioner shall analyze cost documentation in paragraph (a) and provide recommendations for adjustments to cost components. (d) The commissioner shall analyze cost data submitted under paragraph (a). The commissioner shall release cost data in an aggregate form. Cost data from individual providers must not be released except as provided for in current law. (e) Beginning January 1, 2029, the commissioner shall use data collected in paragraph (a) to determine the compliance with requirements identified under subdivision 10d. The commissioner shall identify providers who have not met the thresholds identified under subdivision 10d on the Department of Human Services website for the year for which the providers reported their costs. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.5012, subdivision 21, is amended to read: Subd. 21. ICF/DD rate increases after January 1, 2025. Beginning January 1, 2025, and every year thereafter, the new text begin minimum daily operating new text end rates under this section must be updated for the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index (CPI-U) from the previous July 1 to the data available 12 months and one day prior. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.851, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Personal care provider agency; required reporting of cost data; training. (a) As determined by the commissioner and in consultation with stakeholders, agencies enrolled to provide services with rates determined under this section must submit requested cost data to the commissioner. The commissioner may request cost data, including but not limited to: (1) worker wage costs; (2) benefits paid; (3) supervisor wage costs; (4) executive wage costs; (5) vacation, sick, and training time paid; (6) taxes, workers' compensation, and unemployment insurance costs paid; (7) administrative costs paid; (8) program costs paid; (9) transportation costs paid; (10) staff vacancy rates; and (11) other data relating to costs required to provide services requested by the commissioner. (b) At least once in any three-year period, a provider must submit the required cost data for a fiscal year that ended not more than 18 months prior to the submission date. The commissioner must provide each provider a 90-day notice prior to its submission due date. new text begin The commissioner may review report submissions for inaccurate, inconclusive, incomplete, or otherwise deficient data and may remove the report from submitted status for further verification. new text end If a provider fails to submit required cost data, the commissioner must provide notice to a provider that has not provided required cost data 30 days after the required submission date and a second notice to a provider that has not provided required cost data 60 days after the required submission date. The commissioner must temporarily suspend payments to a provider if the commissioner has not received required cost data 90 days after the required submission date. The commissioner must make withheld payments when the required cost data is received new text begin and reviewed for compliance new text end by the commissioner. (c) The commissioner must conduct a random validation of data submitted under this subdivision to ensure data accuracy. new text begin A provider selected to validate the provider's cost reports must respond to the commissioner within 30 days with the requested financial documentation. If a provider fails to respond to the commissioner with the requested information within 30 days, the commissioner must temporarily suspend payments. The commissioner must resume payments once the requested documentation is received. If a provider is unable to validate the provider's costs with supporting documentation, the commissioner must require the provider to participate in the random validation the next year that the commissioner selects providers to report their costs. new text end The commissioner shall analyze cost documentation in paragraph (a) and provide recommendations for adjustments to cost components. (d) The commissioner, in consultation with stakeholders, must develop and implement a process for providing training and technical assistance necessary to support provider submission of cost data required under this subdivision. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256S.21, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Cost reporting. (a) As determined by the commissioner, in consultation with stakeholders, a provider enrolled to provide services with rates determined under this chapter must submit requested cost data to the commissioner to support evaluation of the rate methodologies in this chapter. Requested cost data may include but are not limited to: (1) worker wage costs; (2) benefits paid; (3) supervisor wage costs; (4) executive wage costs; (5) vacation, sick, and training time paid; (6) taxes, workers' compensation, and unemployment insurance costs paid; (7) administrative costs paid; (8) program costs paid; (9) transportation costs paid; (10) vacancy rates; and (11) other data relating to costs required to provide services requested by the commissioner. (b) At least once in any five-year period, a provider must submit new text begin the required new text end cost data for a fiscal year that ended not more than 18 months prior to the submission date. The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end provide each provider a 90-day notice prior to the provider's submission due date. new text begin The commissioner may review report submissions for inaccurate, inconclusive, incomplete, or otherwise deficient data and may remove the report from submitted status for further verification. new text end If by 30 days after the required submission date a provider fails to submit required reporting data, the commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end provide notice to the providerdeleted text begin , anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end If by 60 days after the required submission date a provider has not provided the required data, the commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin must new text end provide a second notice. The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end temporarily suspend payments to deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end provider if new text begin the commissioner has not received the required new text end cost data deleted text begin is not receiveddeleted text end 90 days after the required submission datenew text begin or 90 days after the Department of Human Services requests updated datanew text end . new text begin The commissioner must make new text end withheld payments deleted text begin must be made once data is receiveddeleted text end new text begin when the required cost data is received and reviewed for compliancenew text end by the commissioner. (c) The commissioner shall coordinate the cost reporting activities required under this section with the cost reporting activities directed under section 256B.4914, subdivision 10a. (d) The commissioner shall analyze cost documentation in paragraph (a) and, in consultation with stakeholders, may submit recommendations on rate methodologies in this chapter, including ways to monitor and enforce the spending requirements directed in section deleted text begin 256S.2101, subdivision 3,deleted text end new text begin 256S.211, subdivision 4,new text end through the reports directed by subdivision 2. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.557, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 1a. new text end new text begin Adult protective services. new text end new text begin Adult protective services must receive referrals from the common entry point and carry out lead investigative agency duties to investigate for a determination of responsibility for maltreatment. When the county social services agency is the lead investigative agency, or when the Department of Human Services or Department of Health in the role of the lead investigative agency request adult protective services, adult protective services must conduct assessments, develop services plans, and implement interventions to safeguard adults who are vulnerable and suspected of experiencing maltreatment. Adult protective services must conclude services following final determination of maltreatment and the adult is assessed as safe. The Department of Human Services is the state agency responsible for supervision of adult protective services administered by county social services agencies. new text end Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.557, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Common entry point designation. (a) The commissioner of human services shall establish a common entry point. The common entry point is the unit responsible for receiving the report of suspected maltreatment under this section. (b) The common entry point must be available 24 hours per day to deleted text begin take callsdeleted text end new text begin accept reports new text end from reporters of suspected maltreatmentnew text begin and make required referrals for suspected maltreatment of a vulnerable adultnew text end . The common entry point shall use a standard intake form that includes: (1) the time and date of the report; (2) the name, relationship, and identifying and contact information for the person believed to be a vulnerable adult and the individual or facility alleged responsible for maltreatment; (3) the name, relationship, and contact information for the: (i) reporter; (ii) initial reporter, witnesses, and persons who may have knowledge about the maltreatment; and (iii) legal surrogate and persons who may provide support to the vulnerable adult; (4) the basis of vulnerability for the vulnerable adult; (5) the time, date, and location of the incident; (6) the immediate safety risk to the vulnerable adult; (7) a description of the suspected maltreatment; (8) the impact of the suspected maltreatment on the vulnerable adult; (9) whether a facility was involved and, if so, which agency licenses the facility; (10) the actions taken to protect the vulnerable adult; (11) the required notifications and referrals made by the common entry point; and (12) whether the reporter wishes to receive notification of the disposition. (c) The common entry point is not required to complete each item on the form prior to dispatching the report to the appropriate lead investigative agency. (d) The common entry point shall immediately report to a law enforcement agency any incident in which there is reason to believe a crime has been committed. (e) If a report is initially made to a law enforcement agency or a lead investigative agency, those agencies shall take the report on the appropriate common entry point intake forms and immediately forward a copy to the common entry point. (f) The common entry point staff must receive training on how to screen and dispatch reports efficiently and in accordance with this section. (g) The commissioner of human services shall maintain a centralized database for the collection of common entry point data, lead investigative agency data including maltreatment report disposition, and appeals data. The common entry point shall have access to the centralized database and must log the reports into the database. (h) When appropriate, the common entry point staff must refer calls that do not allege the abuse, neglect, or exploitation of a vulnerable adult to other organizations that might resolve the reporter's concerns. (i) A common entry point must be operated in a manner that enables the commissioner of human services to: (1) track critical steps in the reporting, evaluation, referral, response, disposition, and investigative process to ensure compliance with all requirements for all reports; (2) maintain data to facilitate the production of aggregate statistical reports for monitoring patterns of abuse, neglect, or exploitation; (3) serve as a resource for the evaluation, management, and planning of preventative and remedial services for vulnerable adults who have been subject to abuse, neglect, or exploitation; (4) set standards, priorities, and policies to maximize the efficiency and effectiveness of the common entry point; and (5) track and manage consumer complaints related to the common entry point. (j) The commissioners of human services and health shall collaborate on the creation of a system for referring reports to the lead investigative agencies. This system shall enable the commissioner of human services to track critical steps in the reporting, evaluation, referral, response, disposition, investigation, notification, determination, and appeal processes. Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.557, subdivision 9a, is amended to read: Subd. 9a. Evaluation and referral of reports made to common entry point. (a) The common entry point must screen the reports of alleged or suspected maltreatment for immediate risk and make all necessary referrals deleted text begin as followsdeleted text end new text begin using the referral guidelines established by the commissioner and the followingnew text end : (1) if the common entry point determines that there is an immediate need for emergency adult protective services, the common entry point agency shall immediately notify the appropriate county agency; (2) if the report contains suspected criminal activity against a vulnerable adult, the common entry point shall immediately notify the appropriate law enforcement agency; (3) the common entry point shall refer all reports of alleged or suspected maltreatment to the appropriate lead investigative agency as soon as possible, but in any event no longer than two working days; (4) if the report contains information about a suspicious death, the common entry point shall immediately notify the appropriate law enforcement agencies, the local medical examiner, and the ombudsman for mental health and developmental disabilities established under section 245.92. Law enforcement agencies shall coordinate with the local medical examiner and the ombudsman as provided by law; and (5) for reports involving multiple locations or changing circumstances, the common entry point shall determine the county agency responsible for emergency adult protective services and the county responsible as the lead investigative agencydeleted text begin , using referral guidelines established by the commissionerdeleted text end . (b) If the lead investigative agency receiving a report believes the report was referred by the common entry point in error, the lead investigative agency shall immediately notify the common entry point of the error, including the basis for the lead investigative agency's belief that the referral was made in error. The common entry point shall review the information submitted by the lead investigative agency and immediately refer the report to the appropriate lead investigative agencynew text begin using the referral guidelines established by the commissionernew text end . Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.557, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11b. new text end new text begin County social services agency; responsibilities. new text end new text begin The county social services agency is responsible for supervision of: new text end new text begin (1) intake decisions for initial disposition of the report; new text end new text begin (2) agency prioritization used to screen out an adult meeting eligibility for adult protective services as vulnerable and maltreated; new text end new text begin (3) safety, assessment, and services plans; new text end new text begin (4) protective service interventions; new text end new text begin (5) use of guardianship and other involuntary interventions; new text end new text begin (6) final determination for maltreatment; and new text end new text begin (7) case closure decisions. new text end Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.557, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11c. new text end new text begin County social services agency; referrals. new text end new text begin (a) When the common entry point refers a report to the county social services agency as the lead investigative agency or makes a referral to the county social services agency for emergency adult protective services, or when another lead investigative agency requests adult protective services from the county social services agency for an adult referred to that lead investigative agency by the common entry point, the county social services agency must use the data report system and standardized decision and assessment tools provided by the commissioner of human services. The information entered by the county social services agency into the data system and standardized tools must be accessible to the Department of Human Services for the department to meet federal requirements, evaluate consistent application of policy, review quality of services and outcomes for adults, and meet requirements for background studies and disqualification of individuals determined responsible for vulnerable adult maltreatment under chapter 245C. new text end new text begin (b) The county social services agency must screen the report using the standardized tools provided by the commissioner to determine: new text end new text begin (1) whether the referred adult meets adult protective services eligibility as potentially vulnerable and maltreated under this section; and new text end new text begin (2) the response time required to initiate adult protective services. new text end new text begin (c) For reports referred by the common entry point for emergency adult protective services, the county social services agency must immediately screen the report to determine whether the adult should be accepted for emergency adult protective services. If the adult is accepted for emergency adult protective services, the county social services agency must immediately offer protective services to prevent further maltreatment and safeguard the welfare of the vulnerable adult. Assessment of adults accepted by the county social services agency for emergency protective services must be conducted in person by the agency or a designee within 24 hours of the agency receiving the referral. When sexual or physical abuse is suspected, the county social services agency must immediately arrange for and make available to the vulnerable adult appropriate medical examination and services. new text end new text begin (d) For reports referred by the common entry point to the county as lead investigative agency, the county social services agency must screen the report and make an initial determination within seven calendar days following receipt of the report from the common entry point on whether the adult should be accepted for adult protective services. new text end new text begin (e) For referrals made for adult protective services by the Department of Human Services or the Department of Health in the applicable department's role as the lead investigative agency responsible for reports made under this section, the county social services agency must screen the report and determine within seven calendar days following receipt of referral whether the adult should be accepted for adult protective services. new text end new text begin (f) If an adult meets eligibility requirements but is not accepted for adult protective services based on local agency prioritization, the agency must document the reason for the screening decision in the standardized tool provided by the commissioner. new text end Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.557, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11d. new text end new text begin County social services agency; assessments. new text end new text begin (a) For adults accepted into adult protective services, the county social services agency must decide, prior to initiation of assessment activities, if the agency must also conduct an investigation for final disposition for responsibility of maltreatment in addition to the assessment for adult protective services. new text end new text begin (b) The county social services agency must conduct assessments concurrently with investigations when: (1) the county is both the lead investigative agency and responsible for making a final determination of responsibility for maltreatment; or (2) another lead investigative agency responsible for the final determination of maltreatment requests assistance from the county social services agency. new text end new text begin (c) The county social services agency must conduct an in-person assessment to initiate adult protective services: new text end new text begin (1) within 24 hours of accepting a referral for emergency protective services; new text end new text begin (2) within 24 hours of making an initial disposition that the adult is in immediate need of protection, unless an in-person response would endanger the safety of the adult; or new text end new text begin (3) within 72 hours but in no instance later than seven calendar days from the first business day after receiving the report for adults accepted for adult protective services. new text end new text begin (d) The county social services agency must use the standardized decision, assessment, and service planning tools provided by the commissioner with all vulnerable adults accepted for adult protective services. The county social services agency must involve the vulnerable adult in the assessment and service plan. The county social services agency must document and update assessment and service plans consistent with significant changes in the vulnerable adult's health and safety. new text end new text begin (e) The county social services agency must notify the vulnerable adult and, if applicable, the guardian or health care agent of the vulnerable adult of the results of the assessment and service plan, including but not limited to recommendations for protective services intervention to stop or prevent maltreatment and to protect the vulnerable adult's health, safety, and comfort. When necessary to prevent further maltreatment or safeguard the vulnerable adult, the county social services agency may share the results of the assessment with the vulnerable adult's primary supports. new text end Sec. 26. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.557, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11e. new text end new text begin County social services agency; investigations. new text end new text begin (a) The county social services agency must investigate for a final disposition of responsibility for maltreatment for an allegation of: new text end new text begin (1) abuse; new text end new text begin (2) financial abuse by a fiduciary; new text end new text begin (3) financial exploitation involving a nonfiduciary that may be criminal or that involved force, coercion, harassment, deception, fraud, undue influence, or a scam; new text end new text begin (4) financial exploitation that involved another type of maltreatment; new text end new text begin (5) caregiver neglect by a paid caregiver or personal care assistance provider under chapter 256B; new text end new text begin (6) caregiver neglect by an unpaid caregiver that resulted in intentional harm to the vulnerable adult or involved another type of maltreatment; and new text end new text begin (7) a situation for which the county social services agency finds that a determination of responsibility of maltreatment may safeguard a vulnerable adult or prevent further maltreatment. new text end new text begin (b) The county social services agency must conduct an investigation for final disposition of responsibility for maltreatment if the agency receives information during an assessment that indicates the presence of any scenario listed in paragraph (a) or subdivision 11f. new text end Sec. 27. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.557, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11f. new text end new text begin County social services agency; self-neglect. new text end new text begin (a) The county social services agency may determine that an allegation that does not result in a determination of responsibility for maltreatment is: new text end new text begin (1) self-neglect; new text end new text begin (2) neglect by an unpaid caregiver that did not result in intentional harm to the vulnerable adult and did not involve another type of alleged maltreatment; or new text end new text begin (3) financial exploitation by a nonfiduciary that is consistent with the choice of the adult and not criminal or involving force, coercion, harassment, deception, fraud, undue influence, a scam, or another type of alleged maltreatment. new text end new text begin (b) An allegation of self-neglect is a substantiated determination if the county social services agency determines that adult protective services are needed. new text end Sec. 28. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.557, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11g. new text end new text begin County social services agency; initial contact. new text end new text begin (a) At the initial contact with the vulnerable adult accepted by the county social services agency, the agency must provide the vulnerable adult with information about the process for adult protective services and the vulnerable adult's rights as an adult protective client. new text end new text begin (b) At initial contact, the county social services agency must inform the individual or entity alleged responsible for maltreatment of the allegation in a manner consistent with requirements under this section to protect the identity of the reporter. The interview with the individual or entity alleged responsible for maltreatment may be postponed at the request of a law enforcement agency or if the interview may endanger the safety of the vulnerable adult. new text end Sec. 29. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.557, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11h. new text end new text begin County social services agency; agency authority. new text end new text begin (a) A county social services agency may enter all facilities and business premises of a licensed provider to inspect and copy records as part of an adult protective services assessment or investigation. The licensed provider must provide the county social services agency access to not public data as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 8a, and medical records under sections 144.291 to 144.298 that are maintained at the facilities and business premises to the extent that the data and records are necessary to conduct the agency's investigation. The licensed provider must provide the county social services agency access to all available sources of information at the facilities and business premises, not only written records. new text end new text begin (b) When necessary in order to protect a vulnerable adult from serious harm from maltreatment, the county social services agency may seek any of the following protective services interventions: new text end new text begin (1) emergency protective services; new text end new text begin (2) participation of law enforcement or emergency medical services; new text end new text begin (3) authority from a court to remove an adult from the situation in which maltreatment occurred; new text end new text begin (4) a restraining order or court order for removal of the perpetrator from the residence of the vulnerable adult pursuant to section 518.01; new text end new text begin (5) a referral for a financial transaction hold under chapter 45A or a protective arrangement under this chapter or chapter 524; new text end new text begin (6) a referral for a representative payee; new text end new text begin (7) a referral to the prosecuting attorney for possible criminal prosecution of the perpetrator under chapter 609; new text end new text begin (8) the appointment or replacement of a guardian or conservator pursuant to sections 524.5-101 to 524.5-502, or guardianship or conservatorship pursuant to chapter 252A when maltreatment has been substantiated and when less restrictive interventions are not sufficient to stop or reduce the risk of serious harm from maltreatment; and new text end new text begin (9) other interventions recommended by a multidisciplinary team under this section. new text end new text begin (c) The county social services agency may seek the protective services interventions under paragraph (b) regardless of the vulnerable adult's voluntary or involuntary participation. new text end new text begin (d) The county social services agency may offer voluntary service interventions to support the vulnerable adult or primary supports to stop, reduce the risk for, or prevent subsequent maltreatment. new text end Sec. 30. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.557, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11i. new text end new text begin County social services agency; legal intervention. new text end new text begin (a) In proceedings under sections 524.5-101 to 524.5-502, if a suitable relative or other person is not available to petition for guardianship or conservatorship, a county employee must present the petition with representation by the county attorney. The county must contract with or arrange for a suitable person or organization to provide ongoing guardianship services. If the county presents evidence to the court exercising probate jurisdiction that the county has made diligent effort and no other suitable person can be found, a county employee may serve as guardian or conservator. new text end new text begin (b) The county must not retaliate against the employee for any action taken on behalf of the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship, even if the action is adverse to the county's interests. Any person retaliated against in violation of this subdivision shall have a cause of action against the county and is entitled to reasonable attorney fees and costs of the action if the action is upheld by the court. new text end new text begin (c) The expenses of a legal intervention must be paid by the county in the case of indigent persons under section 524.5-502 and chapter 563. new text end Sec. 31. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.557, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 11j. new text end new text begin County social services agency; conflict of interest. new text end new text begin (a) A county that identifies a potential conflict of interest under paragraph (c) related to an investigation, assessment, or protective services intervention must coordinate with another county social services agency to delegate the initial county's authority as the lead investigative agency to remediate the potential conflict. County social services agencies must cooperate and accept jurisdiction when an initial county social services agency identifies a potential conflict of interest and requests the other county's assistance. new text end new text begin (b) The initial county must notify the commissioner of human services when no other county is available to accept delegation of adult protective services duties. If the commissioner is notified that no other county is available, the commissioner may use the authority under subdivision 9a to determine the county social services agency responsible as lead investigative agency and for adult protective services. new text end new text begin (c) A county social services agency employee or designee must not have: new text end new text begin (1) a personal or family relationship with a party in the investigation or assessment; new text end new text begin (2) a dual relationship, as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 45, section 1324.401, with the vulnerable adult; new text end new text begin (3) a personal financial interest or financial relationship with a provider receiving referrals from the employee; or new text end new text begin (4) any other appearance of conflict of interest as determined by the county social services agency. new text end Sec. 32. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.557, subdivision 12b, is amended to read: Subd. 12b. Data management. (a) In performing any of the duties of this section as a lead investigative agency, the county social deleted text begin servicedeleted text end new text begin servicesnew text end agency shall maintain appropriate records. Data collected by the county social deleted text begin servicedeleted text end new text begin servicesnew text end agency under this section while providing adult protective services are welfare data under section 13.46. Investigative data collected under this section are confidential data on individuals or protected nonpublic data as defined under section 13.02. Notwithstanding section 13.46, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), data under this paragraph that are inactive investigative data on an individual who is a vendor of services are private data on individuals, as defined in section 13.02. The identity of the reporter may only be disclosed as provided in paragraph (c). Data maintained by the common entry point are confidential data on individuals or protected nonpublic data as defined in section 13.02. Notwithstanding section 138.163, the common entry point shall maintain data for three calendar years after date of receipt and then destroy the data unless otherwise directed by federal requirements. (b) The commissioners of health and human services shall prepare an investigation memorandum for each report alleging maltreatment investigated under this section. County social deleted text begin servicedeleted text end new text begin servicesnew text end agencies must maintain private data on individuals but are not required to prepare an investigation memorandum. During an investigation by the commissioner of health or the commissioner of human services, data collected under this section are confidential data on individuals or protected nonpublic data as defined in section 13.02. Upon completion of the investigation, the data are classified as provided in clauses (1) to (3) and paragraph (c). (1) The investigation memorandum must contain the following data, which are public: (i) the name of the facility investigated; (ii) a statement of the nature of the alleged maltreatment; (iii) pertinent information obtained from medical or other records reviewed; (iv) the identity of the investigator; (v) a summary of the investigation's findings; (vi) statement of whether the report was found to be substantiated, inconclusive, false, or that no determination will be made; (vii) a statement of any action taken by the facility; (viii) a statement of any action taken by the lead investigative agency; and (ix) when a lead investigative agency's determination has substantiated maltreatment, a statement of whether an individual, individuals, or a facility were responsible for the substantiated maltreatment, if known. The investigation memorandum must be written in a manner which protects the identity of the reporter and of the vulnerable adult and may not contain the names or, to the extent possible, data on individuals or private data listed in clause (2). (2) Data on individuals collected and maintained in the investigation memorandum are private data, including: (i) the name of the vulnerable adult; (ii) the identity of the individual alleged to be the perpetrator; (iii) the identity of the individual substantiated as the perpetrator; and (iv) the identity of all individuals interviewed as part of the investigation. (3) Other data on individuals maintained as part of an investigation under this section are private data on individuals upon completion of the investigation. (c) The name of the reporter must be confidential. The subject of the report may compel disclosure of the name of the reporter only with the consent of the reporter or upon a written finding by a court that the report was false and there is evidence that the report was made in bad faith. This subdivision does not alter disclosure responsibilities or obligations under the Rules of Criminal Procedure, except that where the identity of the reporter is relevant to a criminal prosecution, the district court shall do an in-camera review prior to determining whether to order disclosure of the identity of the reporter. (d) Notwithstanding section 138.163, data maintained under this section by the commissioners of health and human services new text begin and county adult protective services new text end must be maintained under the following schedule and then destroyed unless otherwise directed by federal requirements: (1) data from reports determined to be false, maintained for three years after the finding was madenew text begin for reports under the jurisdiction of the Department of Human Services or the Department of Health and five years after the finding was made for reports under the jurisdiction of county adult protective servicesnew text end ; (2) data from reports determined to be inconclusive, maintained for four years after the finding was madenew text begin for reports under the jurisdiction of the Department of Human Services or the Department of Health and five years after the finding was made for reports under the jurisdiction of county adult protective servicesnew text end ; (3) data from reports determined to be substantiated, maintained for seven years after the finding was made; and (4) data from reports which were not investigated by a lead investigative agency and for which there is no final disposition, maintained for three years from the date of the reportnew text begin for reports under the jurisdiction of the Department of Human Services or the Department of Health and five years from the date of the report for reports under the jurisdiction of county adult protective servicesnew text end . (e) The commissioners of health and human services shall annually publish on their websites the number and type of reports of alleged maltreatment involving licensed facilities reported under this section, the number of those requiring investigation under this section, and the resolution of those investigations. deleted text begin (f) Each lead investigative agency must have a record retention policy. deleted text end deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end Lead investigative agencies, county agencies responsible for adult protective services, prosecuting authorities, and law enforcement agencies may exchange not public data, as defined in section 13.02, with a tribal agency, facility, service provider, vulnerable adult, primary support person for a vulnerable adult, new text begin emergency management service, financial institution, medical examiner, new text end state licensing board, federal or state agency, the ombudsman for long-term care, or the ombudsman for mental health and developmental disabilities, if the agency or authority providing the data determines that the data are pertinent and necessary to prevent further maltreatment of a vulnerable adult, to safeguard a vulnerable adult, or for an investigation under this section. Data collected under this section must be made available to prosecuting authorities and law enforcement officials, local county agencies, new text begin the commissioner of human services as the state Medicaid agency, new text end and licensing agencies investigating the alleged maltreatment under this section. The lead investigative agency shall exchange not public data with the vulnerable adult maltreatment review panel established in section 256.021 if the data are pertinent and necessary for a review requested under that section. Notwithstanding section 138.17, upon completion of the review, not public data received by the review panel must be destroyed. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end Each lead investigative agency shall keep records of the length of time it takes to complete its investigations. deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end A lead investigative agency may notify other affected parties and their authorized representative if the lead investigative agency has reason to believe maltreatment has occurred and determines the information will safeguard the well-being of the affected parties or dispel widespread rumor or unrest in the affected facility. deleted text begin (j)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end Under any notification provision of this section, where federal law specifically prohibits the disclosure of patient identifying information, a lead investigative agency may not provide any notice unless the vulnerable adult has consented to disclosure in a manner which conforms to federal requirements. new text begin (j) When a county agency acting as the lead investigative agency is aware the person determined responsible for maltreatment is a guardian or conservator appointed under chapter 524, the county agency must share the final determination with the Minnesota Judicial Branch within 14 calendar days of the determination. new text end Sec. 33. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.5572, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Abuse. "Abuse" means: (a) An act against a vulnerable adult that constitutes a violation of, an attempt to violate, or aiding and abetting a violation of: (1) assault in the first through fifth degrees as defined in sections 609.221 to 609.224; (2) the use of drugs to injure or facilitate crime as defined in section 609.235; (3) the solicitation, inducement, and promotion of prostitution as defined in section 609.322; and (4) criminal sexual conduct in the first through fifth degrees as defined in sections 609.342 to 609.3451. A violation includes any action that meets the elements of the crime, regardless of whether there is a criminal proceeding or conviction. (b) Conduct which is not an accident or therapeutic conduct as defined in this section, which produces or could reasonably be expected to produce physical pain or injury or emotional distress including, but not limited to, the following: (1) hitting, slapping, kicking, pinching, biting, or corporal punishment of a vulnerable adult; (2) use of repeated or malicious oral, written, or gestured language toward a vulnerable adult or the treatment of a vulnerable adult which would be considered by a reasonable person to be disparaging, derogatory, humiliating, harassing, or threatening; or (3) use of any aversive or deprivation procedure, unreasonable confinement, or involuntary seclusion, including the forced separation of the vulnerable adult from other persons against the will of the vulnerable adult or the legal representative of the vulnerable adult unless authorized under applicable licensing requirements or Minnesota Rules, chapter 9544. new text begin (c) Any contact with the vulnerable adult that is not therapeutic conduct and a reasonable person would consider a sexual act or any nonconsensual sexual interaction with the vulnerable adult, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) making, viewing, or sharing sexual images or videos with or of the vulnerable adult; and new text end new text begin (2) using oral, written, gestured, or electronic communication that is sexually harassing, including but not limited to unwelcome sexual advances or requests for sexual favors. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end Any sexual contact or penetration as defined in section 609.341, between a facility staff person or a person providing services in the facility and a resident, patient, or client of that facility. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end The act of forcing, compelling, coercing, or enticing a vulnerable adult against the vulnerable adult's will to perform services for the advantage of another. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end For purposes of this section, a vulnerable adult is not abused for the sole reason that the vulnerable adult or a person with authority to make health care decisions for the vulnerable adult under sections 144.651, 144A.44, chapter 145B, 145C or 252A, or section 253B.03 or 524.5-313, refuses consent or withdraws consent, consistent with that authority and within the boundary of reasonable medical practice, to any therapeutic conduct, including any care, service, or procedure to diagnose, maintain, or treat the physical or mental condition of the vulnerable adult or, where permitted under law, to provide nutrition and hydration parenterally or through intubation. This paragraph does not enlarge or diminish rights otherwise held under law by: (1) a vulnerable adult or a person acting on behalf of a vulnerable adult, including an involved family member, to consent to or refuse consent for therapeutic conduct; or (2) a caregiver to offer or provide or refuse to offer or provide therapeutic conduct. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end For purposes of this section, a vulnerable adult is not abused for the sole reason that the vulnerable adult, a person with authority to make health care decisions for the vulnerable adult, or a caregiver in good faith selects and depends upon spiritual means or prayer for treatment or care of disease or remedial care of the vulnerable adult in lieu of medical care, provided that this is consistent with the prior practice or belief of the vulnerable adult or with the expressed intentions of the vulnerable adult. deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end For purposes of this section, a vulnerable adult is not abused for the sole reason that the vulnerable adult, who is not impaired in judgment or capacity by mental or emotional dysfunction or undue influence, engages in consensual sexual contact with: (1) a person, including a facility staff person, when a consensual sexual personal relationship existed prior to the caregiving relationship; or (2) a personal care attendant, regardless of whether the consensual sexual personal relationship existed prior to the caregiving relationship. Sec. 34. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.5572, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3a. new text end new text begin Adult protective services. new text end new text begin "Adult protective services" means an adult protection program administered by a county social services agency under the authority of the agency's governing body or delegated to a Tribal government by the commissioner of human services to support adults referred for maltreatment to live safely and with dignity. new text end Sec. 35. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.5572, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3b. new text end new text begin Assessment. new text end new text begin "Assessment" means a structured process conducted by a county social services agency to review the safety, strengths, and needs of an adult referred as vulnerable and maltreated and accepted by the agency for adult protective services and to develop a service plan to stop, prevent, and reduce risk of maltreatment for the adult using standardized tools provided by the Department of Human Services. new text end Sec. 36. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.5572, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Financial exploitation. "Financial exploitation" means: (a) In breach of a fiduciary obligation recognized elsewhere in law, including pertinent regulations, contractual obligations, documented consent by a competent person, or the obligations of a responsible party under section 144.6501, a person: (1) engages in unauthorized expenditure of funds entrusted to the actor by the vulnerable adult which results or is likely to result in detriment to the vulnerable adult; or (2) fails to use the financial resources of the vulnerable adult to provide food, clothing, shelter, health care, therapeutic conduct or supervision for the vulnerable adult, and the failure results or is likely to result in detriment to the vulnerable adult. (b) In the absence of legal authority a person: (1) willfully uses, withholds, or disposes of funds or property of a vulnerable adult; (2) obtains for the actor or another the performance of services by deleted text begin a third persondeleted text end new text begin the vulnerable adultnew text end for the wrongful profit or advantage of the actor or another to the detriment of the vulnerable adult; (3) acquires possession or control of, or an interest in, funds or property of a vulnerable adult through the use of undue influence, harassment, duress, deception, or fraud; or (4) forces, compels, coerces, or entices a vulnerable adult against the vulnerable adult's will to perform services for the profit or advantage of another. (c) Nothing in this definition requires a facility or caregiver to provide financial management or supervise financial management for a vulnerable adult except as otherwise required by law. Sec. 37. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.5572, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 12a. new text end new text begin Investigation. new text end new text begin "Investigation" means activities for fact gathering conducted by the lead investigative agency to make a final determination of maltreatment. new text end Sec. 38. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 626.5572, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Lead investigative agency. "Lead investigative agency" is the primary administrative agency responsible for investigating reports made under section 626.557. (a) The Department of Health is the lead investigative agency for facilities or services licensed or required to be licensed as hospitals, home care providers, nursing homes, boarding care homes, hospice providers, residential facilities that are also federally certified as intermediate care facilities that serve people with developmental disabilities, or any other facility or service not listed in this subdivision that is licensed or required to be licensed by the Department of Health for the care of vulnerable adults. "Home care provider" has the meaning provided in section 144A.43, subdivision 4, and applies when care or services are delivered in the vulnerable adult's home. (b) The Department of Human Services is the lead investigative agency for facilities or services licensed or required to be licensed as adult day care, adult foster care, community residential settings, programs for people with disabilities, EIDBI agencies, family adult day services, mental health programs, mental health clinics, substance use disorder programs, the Minnesota Sex Offender Program, or any other facility or service not listed in this subdivision that is licensed or required to be licensed by the Department of Human Services. The Department of Human Services is also the lead investigative agency for unlicensed EIDBI agencies under section 256B.0949. (c) The county social deleted text begin servicedeleted text end new text begin servicesnew text end agency new text begin adult protective services new text end or deleted text begin itsdeleted text end new text begin the agency'snew text end designee new text begin or a federally recognized Indian Tribe that entered into a contractual agreement with the commissioner of human services to operate adult protective services new text end is the lead investigative agency for all other reports, including but not limited to reports involving vulnerable adults receiving services from a personal care provider organization under section 256B.0659new text begin or 256B.85new text end . Sec. 39. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 626.5572, subdivision 17, is amended to read: Subd. 17. Neglect. (a) "Neglect" means neglect by a caregiver or self-neglect. (b) "Caregiver neglect" means the failure or omission by a caregiver to supply a vulnerable adult with care or services, including but not limited to, food, clothing, shelter, health care, or supervision which is: (1) reasonable and necessary to obtain or maintain the vulnerable adult's physical or mental health or safety, considering the physical and mental capacity or dysfunction of the vulnerable adult; and (2) which is not the result of an accident or therapeutic conduct. (c) "Self-neglect" means neglect by a vulnerable adult of the vulnerable adult's own food, clothing, shelter, health care, new text begin financial management, new text end or other services that are not the responsibility of a caregiver which a reasonable person would deem essential to obtain or maintain the vulnerable adult's health, safety, or comfort. (d) For purposes of this section, a vulnerable adult is not neglected for the sole reason that: (1) the vulnerable adult or a person with authority to make health care decisions for the vulnerable adult under sections 144.651, 144A.44, chapter 145B, 145C, or 252A, or sections 253B.03 or 524.5-101 to 524.5-502, refuses consent or withdraws consent, consistent with that authority and within the boundary of reasonable medical practice, to any therapeutic conduct, including any care, service, or procedure to diagnose, maintain, or treat the physical or mental condition of the vulnerable adult, or, where permitted under law, to provide nutrition and hydration parenterally or through intubation; this paragraph does not enlarge or diminish rights otherwise held under law by: (i) a vulnerable adult or a person acting on behalf of a vulnerable adult, including an involved family member, to consent to or refuse consent for therapeutic conduct; or (ii) a caregiver to offer or provide or refuse to offer or provide therapeutic conduct; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (2) the vulnerable adult, a person with authority to make health care decisions for the vulnerable adult, or a caregiver in good faith selects and depends upon spiritual means or prayer for treatment or care of disease or remedial care of the vulnerable adult in lieu of medical care, provided that this is consistent with the prior practice or belief of the vulnerable adult or with the expressed intentions of the vulnerable adult; (3) the vulnerable adult, who is not impaired in judgment or capacity by mental or emotional dysfunction or undue influence, engages in consensual sexual contact with: (i) a person including a facility staff person when a consensual sexual personal relationship existed prior to the caregiving relationship; or (ii) a personal care attendant, regardless of whether the consensual sexual personal relationship existed prior to the caregiving relationship; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (4) an individual makes an error in the provision of therapeutic conduct to a vulnerable adult which does not result in injury or harm which reasonably requires medical or mental health care; or (5) an individual makes an error in the provision of therapeutic conduct to a vulnerable adult that results in injury or harm, which reasonably requires the care of a physician, and: (i) the necessary care is provided in a timely fashion as dictated by the condition of the vulnerable adult; (ii) if after receiving care, the health status of the vulnerable adult can be reasonably expected, as determined by the attending physician, to be restored to the vulnerable adult's preexisting condition; (iii) the error is not part of a pattern of errors by the individual; (iv) if in a facility, the error is immediately reported as required under section 626.557, and recorded internally in the facility; (v) if in a facility, the facility identifies and takes corrective action and implements measures designed to reduce the risk of further occurrence of this error and similar errors; and (vi) if in a facility, the actions required under items (iv) and (v) are sufficiently documented for review and evaluation by the facility and any applicable licensing, certification, and ombudsman agency. (e) Nothing in this definition requires a caregiver, if regulated, to provide services in excess of those required by the caregiver's license, certification, registration, or other regulation. (f) If the findings of an investigation by a lead investigative agency result in a determination of substantiated maltreatment for the sole reason that the actions required of a facility under paragraph (d), clause (5), item (iv), (v), or (vi), were not taken, then the facility is subject to a correction order. An individual will not be found to have neglected or maltreated the vulnerable adult based solely on the facility's not having taken the actions required under paragraph (d), clause (5), item (iv), (v), or (vi). This must not alter the lead investigative agency's determination of mitigating factors under section 626.557, subdivision 9c, paragraph (f). Sec. 40. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 256B.5012, subdivisions 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 14, 15, and 16; and 626.557, subdivision 10, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end ARTICLE 2 BEHAVIORAL HEALTH Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245.469, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Availability of emergency services. (a) County boards must provide or contract for enough emergency services within the county to meet the needs of adults, children, and families in the county who are experiencing an emotional crisis or mental illness. Clients must not be charged for services provided. Emergency service providers mustnew text begin not delay or deny the timely provision of emergency services to a client due to payor source for services and mustnew text end meet the qualifications under section 256B.0624, subdivision 4. Emergency services must include assessment, crisis intervention, and appropriate case disposition. Emergency services must: (1) promote the safety and emotional stability of each client; (2) minimize further deterioration of each client; (3) help each client to obtain ongoing care and treatment; (4) prevent placement in settings that are more intensive, costly, or restrictive than necessary and appropriate to meet client needs; and (5) provide support, psychoeducation, and referrals to each client's family members, service providers, and other third parties on behalf of the client in need of emergency services. (b) If a county provides engagement services under section 253B.041, the county's emergency service providers must refer clients to engagement services when the client meets the criteria for engagement services. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245F.02, subdivision 17, is amended to read: Subd. 17. Peer recovery support services. "Peer recovery support services" means services provided according to deleted text begin section 245F.08, subdivision 3deleted text end new text begin sections 245G.07, subdivision 2a, paragraph (b), clause (2), and 254B.052new text end . Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245F.08, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Peer recovery support services. Peer recovery support services must meet the requirements in section deleted text begin 245G.07, subdivision 2a, paragraph (b), clause (2)deleted text end new text begin 254B.052new text end , and must be provided by a person who is qualified according to the requirements in section deleted text begin 245F.15, subdivision 7deleted text end new text begin 245I.04, subdivisions 18 and 19new text end . Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245F.15, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Recovery peer qualifications. Recovery peers must: (1) meet the qualifications in section 245I.04, subdivision 18; and (2) provide services according to the scope of practice established in section 245I.04, subdivision 19deleted text begin , under the supervision of an alcohol and drug counselordeleted text end . Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.04, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Tobacco educational material. new text end new text begin A license holder must provide tobacco and nicotine educational material to a client on the day of service initiation. The license holder must use educational material approved by the commissioner that contains information on: new text end new text begin (1) risks associated with use of tobacco or nicotine products; new text end new text begin (2) types of tobacco or nicotine products, including differentiating between commercial versus traditional or sacred tobacco; new text end new text begin (3) treatment options, including the use of medication for tobacco use disorder; and new text end new text begin (4) benefits of receiving treatment for tobacco or nicotine use while attending substance use disorder treatment for another primary substance. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245G.11, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Treatment coordination provider qualifications. (a) Treatment coordination must be provided by qualified staff. An individual is qualified to provide treatment coordination if the individual meets the qualifications of an alcohol and drug counselor under subdivision 5 or if the individual: (1) is skilled in the process of identifying and assessing a wide range of client needs; (2) is knowledgeable about local community resources and how to use those resources for the benefit of the client; (3) has completed 15 hours of education or training on substance use disorder, co-occurring conditions, and care coordination for individuals with substance use disorder or co-occurring conditions that is consistent with national evidence-based standards; (4) meets one of the following criteria: deleted text begin (i) has a bachelor's degree in one of the behavioral sciences or related fields; deleted text end deleted text begin (ii)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end has a high school diploma or equivalent; or deleted text begin (iii)deleted text end new text begin (ii)new text end is a mental health practitioner who meets the qualifications under section 245I.04, subdivision 4; and (5) either has at least 1,000 hours of supervised experience working with individuals with substance use disorder or co-occurring conditions or receives treatment supervision at least once per week until obtaining 1,000 hours of supervised experience working with individuals with substance use disorder or co-occurring conditions. (b) A treatment coordinator must receive the following levels of supervision from an alcohol and drug counselor or a mental health professional whose scope of practice includes substance use disorder treatment and assessments: (1) for a treatment coordinator that has not obtained 1,000 hours of supervised experience under paragraph (a), clause (5), at least one hour of supervision per week; or (2) for a treatment coordinator that has obtained at least 1,000 hours of supervised experience under paragraph (a), clause (5), at least one hour of supervision per month. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245G.11, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Recovery peer qualifications. A recovery peer must: (1) meet the qualifications in section 245I.04, subdivision 18; and (2) provide services according to the scope of practice established in section 245I.04, subdivision 19deleted text begin , under the supervision of an alcohol and drug counselordeleted text end . Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245I.04, subdivision 17, is amended to read: Subd. 17. Mental health behavioral aide scope of practice. While under the treatment supervision of a mental health professional, a mental health behavioral aide may practice psychosocial skills with a child client according to the child's treatment plan deleted text begin and individual behavior plandeleted text end that a mental health professional, clinical trainee, or behavioral health practitioner has previously taught to the child. Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245I.04, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 20. new text end new text begin Limitation on affiliation across service lines. new text end new text begin (a) A mental health professional, as defined in subdivision 3, may not simultaneously serve in a clinical, supervisory, or designated role for more than ten distinct licensed provider organizations or service lines delivering Medicaid-funded services. A mental health professional may not provide clinical or administrative supervision to more than 20 direct care or clinical staff across all affiliated provider organizations and service lines unless an exception is granted by the commissioner under paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner shall establish criteria and a standardized process for evaluating exception requests under paragraph (a). new text end new text begin (c) Upon written request, the commissioner may grant an exception if the requester demonstrates that: new text end new text begin (1) the mental health professional can effectively meet all clinical, supervisory, and administrative responsibilities across affiliated programs; new text end new text begin (2) the oversight of client care will not be compromised; and new text end new text begin (3) the proposed arrangement complies with all applicable supervision, documentation, and service delivery requirements. new text end new text begin (d) In determining whether to grant an exception under paragraph (c), the commissioner shall consider: new text end new text begin (1) the geographic distribution of services; new text end new text begin (2) the complexity and acuity of client needs; new text end new text begin (3) the mental health professional's other responsibilities, including direct service provision; and new text end new text begin (4) whether adequate supervision can be maintained in compliance with program standards. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner shall rescind approval of the exception granted under paragraph (c) if the requester fails to comply with applicable program standards or with the terms of the exception. new text end new text begin (f) The commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement and enforce this subdivision. new text end new text begin (g) A mental health professional determined to be in violation of this subdivision may be subject to corrective action, licensing sanctions, or administrative penalties in accordance with chapter 245A and other applicable law. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245I.08, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Progress notes. A license holder must use a progress note to document each occurrence of a mental health service that a staff person provides to a client. A progress note must include the following: (1) the type of service; (2) the date of service; (3) the start and stop time of the service unless the license holder is licensed as a residential program; (4) the location of the service; (5) the scope of the service, including: (i) the targeted goal and objective; (ii) the intervention that the staff person provided to the client and the methods that the staff person used; (iii) the client's response to the intervention; and (iv) the staff person's plan to take future actions, including changes in treatment that the staff person will implement if the intervention was ineffective; (6) the signature and credentials of the staff person who provided the service to the client; new text begin (7) the dated signature and credentials of the treatment supervisor; new text end deleted text begin (7)deleted text end new text begin (8)new text end the mental health provider travel documentation required by section 256B.0625, if applicable; and deleted text begin (8)deleted text end new text begin (9)new text end significant observations by the staff person, if applicable, including: (i) the client's current risk factors; (ii) emergency interventions by staff persons; (iii) consultations with or referrals to other professionals, family, or significant others; and (iv) changes in the client's mental or physical symptoms. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245I.10, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Standard diagnostic assessment; required elements. (a) Only a mental health professional or a clinical trainee may complete a standard diagnostic assessment of a client. A standard diagnostic assessment of a client must include a face-to-face interview with a client and a written evaluation of the client. The assessor must complete a client's standard diagnostic assessment within the client's cultural context. An alcohol and drug counselor may gather and document the information in paragraphs (b) and (c) when completing a comprehensive assessment according to section 245G.05. (b) When completing a standard diagnostic assessment of a client, the assessor must gather and document information about the client's current life situation, including the following information: (1) the client's age; (2) the client's current living situation, including the client's housing status and household members; (3) the status of the client's basic needs; (4) the client's education level and employment status; (5) the client's current medications; (6) any immediate risks to the client's health and safety, including withdrawal symptoms, medical conditions, and behavioral and emotional symptoms; (7) the client's perceptions of the client's condition; (8) the client's description of the client's symptoms, including the reason for the client's referral; (9) the client's history of mental health and substance use disorder treatmentnew text begin , including treatment for tobacco or nicotine usenew text end ; (10) cultural influences on the client; and (11) substance use history, if applicable, including: (i) amounts and types of substances, new text begin including tobacco and nicotine products; new text end frequency and durationdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end route of administrationdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end periods of abstinencedeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end and circumstances of relapse; and (ii) the impact to functioning when under the influence of substances, including legal interventions. (c) If the assessor cannot obtain the information that this paragraph requires without retraumatizing the client or harming the client's willingness to engage in treatment, the assessor must identify which topics will require further assessment during the course of the client's treatment. The assessor must gather and document information related to the following topics: (1) the client's relationship with the client's family and other significant personal relationships, including the client's evaluation of the quality of each relationship; (2) the client's strengths and resources, including the extent and quality of the client's social networks; (3) important developmental incidents in the client's life; (4) maltreatment, trauma, potential brain injuries, and abuse that the client has suffered; (5) the client's history of or exposure to alcohol and drug usage and treatment; and (6) the client's health history and the client's family health history, including the client's physical, chemical, and mental health history. (d) When completing a standard diagnostic assessment of a client, an assessor must use a recognized diagnostic framework. (1) When completing a standard diagnostic assessment of a client who is five years of age or younger, the assessor must use the current edition of the DC: 0-5 Diagnostic Classification of Mental Health and Development Disorders of Infancy and Early Childhood published by Zero to Three. (2) When completing a standard diagnostic assessment of a client who is six years of age or older, the assessor must use the current edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders published by the American Psychiatric Association. (3) When completing a standard diagnostic assessment of a client who is 18 years of age or older, an assessor must use either (i) the CAGE-AID Questionnaire or (ii) the criteria in the most recent edition of the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders published by the American Psychiatric Association to screen and assess the client for a substance use disordernew text begin , including tobacco use disordernew text end . (e) When completing a standard diagnostic assessment of a client, the assessor must include and document the following components of the assessment: (1) the client's mental status examination; (2) the client's baseline measurements; symptoms; behavior; skills; abilities; resources; vulnerabilities; safety needs, including client information that supports the assessor's findings after applying a recognized diagnostic framework from paragraph (d); and any differential diagnosis of the client; and (3) an explanation of: (i) how the assessor diagnosed the client using the information from the client's interview, assessment, psychological testing, and collateral information about the client; (ii) the client's needs; (iii) the client's risk factors; (iv) the client's strengths; and (v) the client's responsivity factors. (f) When completing a standard diagnostic assessment of a client, the assessor must consult the client and the client's family about which services that the client and the family prefer to treat the client. The assessor must make referrals for the client as to services required by law. (g) Information from other providers and prior assessments may be used to complete the diagnostic assessment if the source of the information is documented in the diagnostic assessment. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 254A.03, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Rules for substance use disorder care. (a) An eligible vendor of comprehensive assessments under section 254B.0501 may determine the appropriate level of substance use disorder treatment for a recipient of public assistance. The process for determining an individual's financial eligibility for the behavioral health fund or determining an individual's enrollment in or eligibility for a publicly subsidized health plan is not affected by the individual's choice to access a comprehensive assessment for placement. deleted text begin (b) The commissioner shall develop and implement a utilization review process for publicly funded treatment placements to monitor and review the clinical appropriateness and timeliness of all publicly funded placements in treatment. deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end If a screen result is positive for alcohol or substance misuse, a brief screening for alcohol or substance use disorder that is provided to a recipient of public assistance within a primary care clinic, hospital, or other medical setting or school setting establishes medical necessity and approval for an initial set of substance use disorder services identified in section 254B.0505. The initial set of services approved for a recipient whose screen result is positive may include any combination of up to four hours of individual or group substance use disorder treatment, two hours of substance use disorder treatment coordination, or two hours of substance use disorder peer support services provided by a qualified individual according to chapter 245G. A recipient must obtain an assessment pursuant to paragraph (a) to be approved for additional treatment services. A comprehensive assessment pursuant to section 245G.05 is not required to receive the initial set of services allowed under this subdivision. A positive screen result establishes eligibility for the initial set of services allowed under this subdivision. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end An individual may choose to obtain a comprehensive assessment as provided in section 245G.05. Individuals obtaining a comprehensive assessment may access any enrolled provider that is licensed to provide the level of service authorized pursuant to section 254A.19, subdivision 3. If the individual is enrolled in a prepaid health plan, the individual must comply with any provider network requirements or limitations. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 254B.0505, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. deleted text begin Peer recovery support servicesdeleted text end new text begin Utilization reviewnew text end requirements. new text begin (a) new text end Eligible vendors of deleted text begin peer recovery supportdeleted text end services new text begin in subdivision 1, clauses (1), (4) to (8), and (10), new text end mustdeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end submit to a review by the commissioner of up to ten percent of all medical assistance and behavioral health fund claims to determine the medical necessity of peer recovery support services deleted text begin for entities billing for peer recovery support services individually and not receiving a daily rate; anddeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end new text begin (b) Entities billing for peer recovery support services individually and not receiving a daily rate must new text end limit an individual client to 14 hours per week for peer recovery support services from an individual provider of peer recovery support services. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 254B.052, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Peer recovery support services; service requirements. (a) Peer recovery support services are face-to-face interactions between a recovery peer and a client, on a one-on-one basis, in which specific goals identified in an individual recovery plan, treatment plan, or stabilization plan are discussed and addressed. Peer recovery support services are provided to promote a client's recovery goals, self-sufficiency, self-advocacy, and development of natural supports and to support maintenance of a client's recovery. (b) Peer recovery support services must be provided according tonew text begin (1)new text end an individual recovery plan if provided by a recovery community organization or county, a treatment plan if provided in new text begin either new text end a substance use disorder treatment program under chapter 245Gdeleted text begin ,deleted text end ornew text begin a Tribally licensed substance use disorder treatment program, or (2)new text end a stabilization plan if provided by a withdrawal management program under chapter 245F. (c) A client receiving peer recovery support services must participate in the services voluntarily. Any program that incorporates peer recovery support services must provide written notice to the client that peer recovery support services will be provided. (d) Peer recovery support services may not be provided to a client residing with or employed by a recovery peer from whom deleted text begin they receivedeleted text end new text begin the client receivesnew text end services. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 254B.052, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Monetary recovery. deleted text begin Peer recovery supportdeleted text end Servicesnew text begin subject to section 254B.0505, subdivision 8, that arenew text end not provided in accordance with this section are subject to monetary recovery under section 256B.064 as money improperly paid. Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0624, subdivision 6b, is amended to read: Subd. 6b. Crisis intervention services. (a) If the crisis assessment determines mobile crisis intervention services are needed, the crisis intervention services must be provided promptly. As opportunity presents during the intervention, at least two members of the mobile crisis intervention team must confer directly or by telephone about the crisis assessment, crisis treatment plan, and actions taken and needed. At least one of the team members must be providing face-to-face crisis intervention services. If providing crisis intervention services, a clinical trainee or mental health practitioner must seek treatment supervision as required in subdivision 9. (b) If a provider delivers crisis intervention services while the recipient is absent, the provider must document the reason for delivering services while the recipient is absent. (c) The mobile crisis intervention team must develop a crisis treatment plan according to subdivision 11. (d) The mobile crisis intervention team must document which crisis treatment plan goals and objectives have been met and when no further crisis intervention services are required. (e) If the recipient's mental health crisis is stabilized, but the recipient needs a referral to other services, the team must provide referrals to these services. If the recipient has a case manager, planning for other services must be coordinated with the case manager. If the recipient is unable to follow up on the referral, the team must link the recipient to the service and follow up to ensure the recipient is receiving the service. deleted text begin (f) If the recipient's mental health crisis is stabilized and the recipient does not have an advance directive, the case manager or crisis team shall offer to work with the recipient to develop one. deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon federal approval. new text end Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0624, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Crisis stabilization services. (a) Crisis stabilization services must be provided by qualified staff of a crisis stabilization services provider entity and must meet the following standards: (1) a crisis treatment plan must be developed that meets the criteria in subdivision 11; (2) staff must be qualified as defined in subdivision 8; (3) crisis stabilization services must be delivered according to the crisis treatment plan and include face-to-face contact with the recipient by qualified staff for further assessment, help with referrals, updating of the crisis treatment plan, skills training, and collaboration with other service providers in the community; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (4) if a provider delivers crisis stabilization services while the recipient is absent, the provider must document the reason for delivering services while the recipient is absentdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (5) if the recipient is an adult and the recipient's mental health crisis is stabilized and the recipient does not have a health care directive as defined by section 145C.01, subdivision 5a, or psychiatric declaration as defined by section 253B.03, subdivision 6d, the case manager or crisis team must offer to work with the recipient to develop a directive or declaration. new text end (b) If crisis stabilization services are provided in a supervised, licensed residential setting that serves no more than four adult residents, and one or more individuals are present at the setting to receive residential crisis stabilization, the residential staff must include, for at least eight hours per day, at least one mental health professional, clinical trainee, certified rehabilitation specialist, or mental health practitioner. The commissioner shall establish a statewide per diem rate for crisis stabilization services provided under this paragraph to medical assistance enrollees. The rate for a provider shall not exceed the rate charged by that provider for the same service to other payers. Payment shall not be made to more than one entity for each individual for services provided under this paragraph on a given day. The commissioner shall set rates prospectively for the annual rate period. The commissioner shall require providers to submit annual cost reports on a uniform cost reporting form and shall use submitted cost reports to inform the rate-setting process. The commissioner shall recalculate the statewide per diem every year. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon federal approval. new text end Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0625, subdivision 47, is amended to read: Subd. 47. Treatment foster care services. deleted text begin Effective July 1, 2011, and subject to federal approval,deleted text end Medical assistance covers deleted text begin treatment foster caredeleted text end new text begin children's intensive behavioral healthnew text end services according to section 256B.0946. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0759, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Provider standards. (a) The commissioner must establish requirements for deleted text begin participatingdeleted text end providers that are consistent with the federal requirements of the demonstration project.new text begin The following programs licensed by the Department of Human Services that receive payment for substance use disorder treatment services under section 256B.0625 must certify that the program meets the applicable American Society of Addiction Medicine (ASAM) levels of care according to section 254B.19: new text end new text begin (1) nonresidential substance use disorder treatment programs and residential treatment programs licensed under chapter 245G as licensed substance use disorder treatment facilities; new text end new text begin (2) withdrawal management programs licensed under chapter 245F; and new text end new text begin (3) out-of-state residential substance use disorder treatment programs. new text end new text begin Programs that do not meet the requirements of this paragraph are ineligible for payment for services provided under section 256B.0625. new text end deleted text begin (b) A participating residential provider must obtain applicable licensure under chapter 245F or 245G or other applicable standards for the services provided and must: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) deliver services in accordance with standards published by the commissioner pursuant to paragraph (d); deleted text end deleted text begin (2) maintain formal patient referral arrangements with providers delivering step-up or step-down levels of care in accordance with ASAM standards; and deleted text end deleted text begin (3) offer substance use disorder treatment services with medications for opioid use disorder on site or facilitate access to substance use disorder treatment services with medications for opioid use disorder off site. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) A participating outpatient provider must obtain applicable licensure under chapter 245G or other applicable standards for the services provided and must: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) deliver services in accordance with standards published by the commissioner pursuant to paragraph (d); and deleted text end deleted text begin (2) maintain formal patient referral arrangements with providers delivering step-up or step-down levels of care in accordance with ASAM standards. deleted text end deleted text begin (d) If the provider standards under chapter 245G or other applicable standards conflict or are duplicative, the commissioner may grant variances to the standards if the variances do not conflict with federal requirements. The commissioner must publish service components, service standards, and staffing requirements for participating providers that are consistent with ASAM standards and federal requirements by October 1, 2020. deleted text end new text begin (b) Programs licensed by the Department of Human Services as residential treatment programs according to section 245G.21 that (1) receive payment under this chapter, (2) are licensed as a hospital under sections 144.50 to 144.581, and (3) provide only ASAM level 3.7 medically monitored inpatient level of care are not required to enroll as demonstration project providers. Programs meeting the criteria in this paragraph must submit evidence of providing the required level of care to the commissioner to be exempt from enrolling in the demonstration. new text end new text begin (c) Tribally licensed programs that otherwise meet the requirements of subdivision 3 may elect to participate in the demonstration project. The Department of Human Services must consult with Tribal Nations to discuss participation in the substance use disorder demonstration project. new text end new text begin (d) Programs subject to this section must: new text end new text begin (1) deliver services in accordance with section 254B.19; and new text end new text begin (2) offer substance use disorder treatment services with medications for opioid use disorder on site or facilitate timely access to medications for opioid use disorder off site. new text end Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.0759, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Provider payment rates. (a) deleted text begin Payment rates for participatingdeleted text end Providers must deleted text begin be increased for services provided to medical assistance enrollees. To receive a rate increase, participating providers must meet demonstration project requirements and provide evidence of formal referral arrangements with providers delivering step-up or step-down levels of care. Providers that have enrolled in the demonstration project but have not met the provider standards under subdivision 3 as of July 1, 2022, are not eligible for a rate increase under this subdivision until the date that the provider meets the provider standards in subdivision 3. Services provided from July 1, 2022, to the date that the provider meets the provider standards under subdivision 3 shalldeleted text end be reimbursed at rates according to section 254B.0505, subdivision 1. deleted text begin Rate increases paid under this subdivision to a provider for services provided between July 1, 2021, and July 1, 2022, are not subject to recoupment when the provider is taking meaningful steps to meet demonstration project requirements that are not otherwise required by law, and the provider provides documentation to the commissioner, upon request, of the steps being taken.deleted text end deleted text begin (b) The commissioner may temporarily suspend payments to the provider according to section 256B.04, subdivision 21, paragraph (d), if the provider does not meet the requirements in paragraph (a). Payments withheld from the provider must be made once the commissioner determines that the requirements in paragraph (a) are met. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) For outpatient individual and group substance use disorder services under section 254B.0505, subdivision 1, clause (1), and adolescent treatment programs that are licensed as outpatient treatment programs according to sections 245G.01 to 245G.18, provided on or after January 1, 2021, payment rates must be increased by 20 percent over the rates in effect on December 31, 2020. deleted text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end Effective January 1, 2021, and contingent on annual federal approval, managed care plans and county-based purchasing plans must reimburse providers of the substance use disorder services meeting the deleted text begin criteria described in paragraph (a) whodeleted text end new text begin requirements of section 254B.19 thatnew text end are employed by or under contract with the plan an amount that is at least equal to the fee-for-service base rate payment for the substance use disorder services described in paragraph deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (a)new text end . The commissioner must monitor the effect of this requirement on the rate of access to substance use disorder services and residential substance use disorder rates. Capitation rates paid to managed care organizations and county-based purchasing plans must reflect the impact of this requirement. This paragraph expires if federal approval is not received at any time as required under this paragraph. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end Effective July 1, 2021, contracts between managed care plans and county-based purchasing plans and providers to whom paragraph deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end applies must allow recovery of payments from those providers if, for any contract year, federal approval for the provisions of paragraph deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end is not received, and capitation rates are adjusted as a result. Payment recoveries must not exceed the amount equal to any decrease in rates that results from this provision. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end For substance use disorder services with medications for opioid use disorder under section 254B.0505, subdivision 1, clause (7), provided on or after January 1, 2021, payment rates must be increased by 20 percent over the rates in effect on December 31, 2020. Upon implementation of new rates according to section 254B.121, the 20 percent increase will no longer apply. Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.0943, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given deleted text begin themdeleted text end . (b) "Children's therapeutic services and supports" means the flexible package of mental health services for children who require varying therapeutic and rehabilitative levels of intervention to treat a diagnosed mental illness, as defined in section 245.462, subdivision 20, or 245.4871, subdivision 15. The services are time-limited interventions that are delivered using various treatment modalities and combinations of services designed to reach treatment outcomes identified in the individual treatment plan. (c) "Clinical trainee" means a staff person who is qualified according to section 245I.04, subdivision 6. (d) "Crisis planning" has the meaning given in section 245.4871, subdivision 9a. (e) "Culturally competent provider" means a provider who understands and can utilize to a client's benefit the client's culture when providing services to the client. A provider may be culturally competent because the provider is of the same cultural or ethnic group as the client or the provider has developed the knowledge and skills through training and experience to provide services to culturally diverse clients. (f) "Day treatment program" for children means a site-based structured mental health program consisting of psychotherapy for three or more individuals and individual or group skills training provided by a team, under the treatment supervision of a mental health professional. (g) "Direct service time" means the time that a mental health professional, clinical trainee, mental health practitioner, or mental health behavioral aide spends face-to-face with a client and the client's family or providing covered services through telehealth as defined under section 256B.0625, subdivision 3b. Direct service time includes time in which the provider obtains a client's history, develops a client's treatment plan, records individual treatment outcomes, or provides service components of children's therapeutic services and supports. Direct service time does not include time doing work before and after providing direct services, including scheduling or maintaining clinical records. (h) "Direction of mental health behavioral aide" means the activities of a mental health professional, clinical trainee, or mental health practitioner in guiding the mental health behavioral aide in providing services to a client. The direction of a mental health behavioral aide must be based on the client's individual treatment plan and meet the requirements in subdivision 6, paragraph (b), clause (7). (i) "Individual treatment plan" means the plan described in section 245I.10, subdivisions 7 and 8. (j) "Mental health behavioral aide services" means medically necessary one-on-one activities performed by a mental health behavioral aide qualified according to section 245I.04, subdivision 16, to assist a child retain or generalize psychosocial skills as previously trained by a mental health professional, clinical trainee, or mental health practitioner and as described in the child's individual treatment plan deleted text begin and individual behavior plandeleted text end . Activities involve working directly with the child or child's family as provided in subdivision 9, paragraph (b), clause (4). (k) "Mental health certified family peer specialist" means a staff person who is qualified according to section 245I.04, subdivision 12. (l) "Mental health practitioner" means a staff person who is qualified according to section 245I.04, subdivision 4. (m) "Mental health professional" means a staff person who is qualified according to section 245I.04, subdivision 2. (n) "Mental health service plan development" includes: (1) development and revision of a child's individual treatment plan; and (2) administering and reporting standardized outcome measurements approved by the commissioner, as periodically needed to evaluate the effectiveness of treatment. (o) "Mental illness" has the meaning given in section 245.462, subdivision 20, paragraph (a), for persons at least 18 years of age but under 21 years of age, and has the meaning given in section 245.4871, subdivision 15, for children under 18 years of age. (p) "Psychotherapy" means the treatment described in section 256B.0671, subdivision 11. (q) "Rehabilitative services" or "psychiatric rehabilitation services" means interventions to: (1) restore a child or adolescent to an age-appropriate developmental trajectory that had been disrupted by a psychiatric illness; or (2) enable the child to self-monitor, compensate for, cope with, counteract, or replace psychosocial skills deficits or maladaptive skills acquired over the course of a psychiatric illness. Psychiatric rehabilitation services for children combine coordinated psychotherapy to address internal psychological, emotional, and intellectual processing deficits, and skills training to restore personal and social functioning. Psychiatric rehabilitation services establish a progressive series of goals with each achievement building upon a prior achievement. (r) "Skills training" means individual, family, or group training, delivered by or under the supervision of a mental health professional, designed to facilitate the acquisition of psychosocial skills that are medically necessary to rehabilitate the child to an age-appropriate developmental trajectory heretofore disrupted by a psychiatric illness or to enable the child to self-monitor, compensate for, cope with, counteract, or replace skills deficits or maladaptive skills acquired over the course of a psychiatric illness. Skills training is subject to the service delivery requirements under subdivision 9, paragraph (b), clause (2). (s) "Standard diagnostic assessment" means the assessment described in section 245I.10, subdivision 6. (t) "Treatment supervision" means the supervision described in section 245I.06. Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0943, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Provider entity clinical infrastructure requirements. (a) To be an eligible provider entity under this section, a provider entity must have a clinical infrastructure that utilizes diagnostic assessment, individual treatment plans, service delivery, and individual treatment plan review that are culturally competent, child-centered, and family-driven to achieve maximum benefit for the client. The provider entity must review, and update as necessary, the clinical policies and procedures every deleted text begin threedeleted text end new text begin twonew text end years, must distribute the policies and procedures to staff initially and upon each subsequent update, and must train staff accordingly. (b) The clinical infrastructure written policies and procedures must include policies and procedures for meeting the requirements in this subdivision: (1) providing or obtaining a client's standard diagnostic assessment, including a standard diagnostic assessment. When required components of the standard diagnostic assessment are not provided in an outside or independent assessment or cannot be attained immediately, the provider entity must determine the missing information within 30 days and amend the child's standard diagnostic assessment or incorporate the information into the child's individual treatment plan; (2) developing an individual treatment plan; (3) providing treatment supervision plans for staff according to section 245I.06. Treatment supervision does not include the authority to make or terminate court-ordered placements of the child. A treatment supervisor must be available for urgent consultation as required by the individual client's needs or the situation; (4) requiring a mental health professional to determine the level of supervision for a behavioral health aide and to document and sign the supervision determination in the behavioral health aide's supervision plan; (5) ensuring the immediate accessibility of a mental health professional, clinical trainee, or mental health practitioner to the behavioral aide during service delivery; (6) providing service delivery that implements the individual treatment plan and meets the requirements under subdivision 9; and (7) individual treatment plan review. The review must determine the extent to which the services have met each of the goals and objectives in the treatment plan. The review must assess the client's progress and ensure that services and treatment goals continue to be necessary and appropriate to the client and the client's family or foster family. Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0946, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Service delivery payment requirements. (a) To be eligible for payment under this section, a provider must develop and practice written policies and procedures for children's intensive behavioral health services, consistent with subdivision 1, paragraph (b), and comply with the following requirements in paragraphs (b) to (n). (b) Each previous and current mental health, school, and physical health treatment provider must be contacted to request documentation of treatment and assessments that the eligible client has received. This information must be reviewed and incorporated into the standard diagnostic assessment and team consultation and treatment planning review process. (c) Each client receiving treatment must be assessed for a trauma history, and the client's treatment plan must document how the results of the assessment will be incorporated into treatment. (d) The level of care assessment as defined in section 245I.02, subdivision 19, and functional assessment as defined in section 245I.02, subdivision 17, must be updated at least every 180 days or prior to discharge from the service, whichever comes first. (e) Each client receiving treatment services must have an individual treatment plan that is reviewed, evaluated, and approved every 180 days using the team consultation and treatment planning process. (f) Clinical care consultation must be provided in accordance with the client's individual treatment plan. (g) Each client must have a crisis plan within ten days of initiating services and must have access to clinical phone support 24 hours per day, seven days per week, during the course of treatment. The crisis plan must demonstrate coordination with the local or regional mobile crisis intervention team. (h) Services must be delivered and documented at least three days per week, equaling at least six hours of treatment per week. If the mental health professional, client, and family agree, service units may be temporarily reduced for a period of no more than 60 days in order to meet the needs of the client and family, or as part of transition or on a discharge plan to another service or level of care. The reasons for service reduction must be identifieddeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin andnew text end documenteddeleted text begin , and includeddeleted text end in the treatment plannew text begin or case filenew text end . Billing and payment are prohibited for days on which no services are delivered and documented. (i) Location of service delivery must be in the client's home, day care setting, school, or other community-based setting that is specified on the client's individualized treatment plan. (j) Treatment must be developmentally and culturally appropriate for the client. (k) Services must be delivered in continual collaboration and consultation with the client's medical providers and, in particular, with prescribers of psychotropic medications, including those prescribed on an off-label basis. Members of the service team must be aware of the medication regimen and potential side effects. (l) Parents, siblings, foster parents, legal guardians, and members of the child's permanency plan must be involved in treatment and service delivery unless otherwise noted in the treatment plan. (m) Transition planning for the child must be conducted starting with the first treatment plan and must be addressed throughout treatment to support the child's permanency plan and postdischarge mental health service needs. (n) In order for a provider to receive the daily per-client encounter rate, at least one of the services listed in subdivision 1, paragraph (b), clauses (1) to (3), must be provided. The services listed in subdivision 1, paragraph (b), clauses (4) and (5), may be included as part of the daily per-client encounter rate. Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.0947, subdivision 3a, is amended to read: Subd. 3a. Required service components. (a) Intensive nonresidential rehabilitative mental health services, supports, and ancillary activities that are covered by a single daily rate per client must include the following, as needed by the individual client: (1) individual, family, and group psychotherapy; (2) individual, family, and group skills training, as defined in section 256B.0943, subdivision 1, paragraph (r); (3) crisis planning as defined in section 245.4871, subdivision 9a; (4) medication management provided by a deleted text begin physician, an advanced practice registered nurse with certification in psychiatric and mental health care, or a physician assistantdeleted text end new text begin qualified providernew text end ; (5) mental health case management as provided in section 256B.0625, subdivision 20; (6) medication education services as defined in this section; (7) care coordination by a client-specific lead worker assigned by and responsible to the treatment team; (8) psychoeducation of and consultation and coordination with the client's biological, adoptive, or foster family and, in the case of a youth living independently, the client's immediate nonfamilial support network; (9) clinical consultation to a client's employer or school or to other service agencies or to the courts to assist in managing the mental illness or co-occurring disorder and to develop client support systems; (10) coordination with, or performance of, crisis intervention and stabilization services as defined in section 256B.0624; (11) transition services; (12) co-occurring substance use disorder treatment as defined in section 245I.02, subdivision 11; and (13) housing access support that assists clients to find, obtain, retain, and move to safe and adequate housing. Housing access support does not provide monetary assistance for rent, damage deposits, or application fees. (b) The provider shall ensure and document the following by means of performing the required function or by contracting with a qualified person or entity: client access to crisis intervention services, as defined in section 256B.0624, and available 24 hours per day and seven days per week. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. new text end Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0947, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Standards for intensive nonresidential rehabilitative providers. (a) Services must meet the standards in this section and chapter 245I as required in section 245I.011, subdivision 5. (b) The treatment team must have specialized training in providing services to the specific age group of youth that the team serves. An individual treatment team must serve youth who are: (1) at least eight years of age or older and under 16 years of age, or (2) at least 14 years of age or older and under 21 years of age. (c) The treatment team for intensive nonresidential rehabilitative mental health services comprises both permanently employed core team members and client-specific team members as follows: (1) Based on professional qualifications and client needs, clinically qualified core team members are assigned on a rotating basis as the client's lead worker to coordinate a client's care. The core team must comprise at least four full-time equivalent direct care staff and must minimally include: (i) a mental health professional who serves as team leader to provide administrative direction and treatment supervision to the team; (ii) deleted text begin an advanced-practice registered nurse with certification in psychiatric or mental health care or a board-certified child and adolescent psychiatrist, either of which must be credentialed to prescribe medicationsdeleted text end new text begin a psychiatric care provider credentialed to prescribe medications who is either an advanced practice registered nurse with advanced education and training in psychiatric and mental health care or a board-certified psychiatrist. The psychiatric care provider must have demonstrated clinical experience and qualifications for working with children and adolescents with serious mental illness and co-occurring mental illness and substance use disordernew text end ; (iii) a mental health certified peer specialist who is qualified according to section 245I.04, subdivision 10, and is also a former children's mental health consumer; and (iv) a co-occurring disorder specialist who meets the requirements under section 256B.0622, subdivision 7a, paragraph (a), clause (4), who will provide or facilitate the provision of co-occurring disorder treatment to clients. (2) The core team may also include any of the following: (i) additional mental health professionals; (ii) a vocational specialist; (iii) an educational specialist with knowledge and experience working with youth regarding special education requirements and goals, special education plans, and coordination of educational activities with health care activities; (iv) a child and adolescent psychiatrist who may be retained on a consultant basis; (v) a clinical trainee qualified according to section 245I.04, subdivision 6; (vi) a mental health practitioner qualified according to section 245I.04, subdivision 4; (vii) a case management service provider, as defined in section 245.4871, subdivision 4; (viii) a housing access specialist; and (ix) a family peer specialist as defined in subdivision 2, paragraph (j). (3) A treatment team may include, in addition to those in clause (1) or (2), ad hoc members not employed by the team who consult on a specific client and who must accept overall clinical direction from the treatment team for the duration of the client's placement with the treatment team and must be paid by the provider agency at the rate for a typical session by that provider with that client or at a rate negotiated with the client-specific member. Client-specific treatment team members may include: (i) the mental health professional treating the client prior to placement with the treatment team; (ii) the client's current substance use counselor, if applicable; (iii) a lead member of the client's individualized education program team or school-based mental health provider, if applicable; (iv) a representative from the client's health care home or primary care clinic, as needed to ensure integration of medical and behavioral health care; (v) the client's probation officer or other juvenile justice representative, if applicable; and (vi) the client's current vocational or employment counselor, if applicable. (d) The treatment supervisor shall be an active member of the treatment team and shall function as a practicing clinician at least on a part-time basis. The treatment team shall meet with the treatment supervisor at least weekly to discuss recipients' progress and make rapid adjustments to meet recipients' needs. The team meeting must include client-specific case reviews and general treatment discussions among team members. Client-specific case reviews and planning must be documented in the individual client's treatment record. (e) The staffing ratio must not exceed ten clients to one full-time equivalent treatment team position. (f) The treatment team shall serve no more than 80 clients at any one time. Should local demand exceed the team's capacity, an additional team must be established rather than exceed this limit. (g) Nonclinical staff shall have prompt access in person or by telephone to a mental health practitioner, clinical trainee, or mental health professional. The provider shall have the capacity to promptly and appropriately respond to emergent needs and make any necessary staffing adjustments to ensure the health and safety of clients. (h) The intensive nonresidential rehabilitative mental health services provider shall participate in evaluation of the assertive community treatment for youth (Youth ACT) model as conducted by the commissioner, including the collection and reporting of data and the reporting of performance measures as specified by contract with the commissioner. (i) A regional treatment team may serve multiple counties. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. new text end Sec. 26. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256L.03, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Cost-sharing. (a) Co-payments, coinsurance, and deductibles do not apply to children under the age of 21 and to American Indians as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 600.5. (b) The commissioner must adjust co-payments, coinsurance, and deductibles for covered services in a manner sufficient to maintain the actuarial value of the benefit to 94 percent. The cost-sharing changes described in this paragraph do not apply to eligible recipients or services exempt from cost-sharing under state law. The cost-sharing changes described in this paragraph shall not be implemented prior to January 1, 2016. (c) The cost-sharing changes authorized under paragraph (b) must satisfy the requirements for cost-sharing under the Basic Health Program as set forth in Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, sections 600.510 and 600.520. (d) Cost-sharing for prescription drugs and related medical supplies to treat chronic disease must comply with the requirements of section 62Q.481. (e) Co-payments, coinsurance, and deductibles do not apply to additional diagnostic services or testing that a health care provider determines an enrollee requires after a mammogram, as specified under section 62A.30, subdivision 5. (f) Cost-sharing must not apply to drugs used for tobacco and nicotine cessation or to tobacco and nicotine cessation services covered under section 256B.0625, subdivision 68. (g) Co-payments, coinsurance, and deductibles do not apply to pre-exposure prophylaxis (PrEP) and postexposure prophylaxis (PEP) medications when used for the prevention or treatment of the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). (h) Co-payments, coinsurance, and deductibles do not apply to mobile crisis interventionnew text begin , crisis stabilization provided in a community setting,new text end or crisis assessment as defined in section 256B.0624, subdivision 2. Sec. 27. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0759, subdivisions 2 and 5, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end ARTICLE 3 HEALTH CARE Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.01, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Controlling individual. (a) "Controlling individual" means an owner of a program or service provider licensed under this chapter and the following individuals, if applicable: (1) each officer of the organization, including the chief executive officer and chief financial officer; (2) the individual designated as the authorized agent under section 142B.10, subdivision 1, paragraph (b); (3) the individual designated as the compliance officer under section deleted text begin 256B.04, deleted text begin subdivision deleted text end 21, paragraph (g)deleted text end new text begin 256B.044, subdivision 7, paragraph (b)new text end ; (4) each managerial official whose responsibilities include the direction of the management or policies of a program; (5) the individual designated as the primary provider of care for a special family child care program under section 142B.41, subdivision 4, paragraph (d); and (6) the president and treasurer of the board of directors of a nonprofit corporation. (b) Controlling individual does not include: (1) a bank, savings bank, trust company, savings association, credit union, industrial loan and thrift company, investment banking firm, or insurance company unless the entity operates a program directly or through a subsidiary; (2) an individual who is a state or federal official, or state or federal employee, or a member or employee of the governing body of a political subdivision of the state or federal government that operates one or more programs, unless the individual is also an officer, owner, or managerial official of the program; receives remuneration from the program; or owns any of the beneficial interests not excluded in this subdivision; (3) an individual who owns less than five percent of the outstanding common shares of a corporation: (i) whose securities are exempt under section 80A.45, clause (6); or (ii) whose transactions are exempt under section 80A.46, clause (2); (4) an individual who is a member of an organization exempt from taxation under section 290.05, unless the individual is also an officer, owner, or managerial official of the program or owns any of the beneficial interests not excluded in this subdivision. This clause does not exclude from the definition of controlling individual an organization that is exempt from taxation; or (5) an employee stock ownership plan trust, or a participant or board member of an employee stock ownership plan, unless the participant or board member is a controlling individual according to paragraph (a). (c) For purposes of this subdivision, "managerial official" means an individual who has the decision-making authority related to the operation of the program, and the responsibility for the ongoing management of or direction of the policies, services, or employees of the program. A site director who has no ownership interest in the program is not considered to be a managerial official for purposes of this definition. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245A.02, subdivision 5a, is amended to read: Subd. 5a. Controlling individual. (a) "Controlling individual" means an owner of a program or service provider licensed under this chapter and the following individuals, if applicable: (1) each officer of the organization, including the chief executive officer and chief financial officer; (2) the individual designated as the authorized agent under section 245A.04, subdivision 1, paragraph (b); (3) the individual designated as the compliance officer under section deleted text begin 256B.04, subdivision 21, paragraph (g)deleted text end new text begin 256B.044, subdivision 7, paragraph (b)new text end ; (4) each managerial official whose responsibilities include the direction of the management or policies of a program; and (5) the president and treasurer of the board of directors of a nonprofit corporation. (b) Controlling individual does not include: (1) a bank, savings bank, trust company, savings association, credit union, industrial loan and thrift company, investment banking firm, or insurance company unless the entity operates a program directly or through a subsidiary; (2) an individual who is a state or federal official, or state or federal employee, or a member or employee of the governing body of a political subdivision of the state or federal government that operates one or more programs, unless the individual is also an officer, owner, or managerial official of the program, receives remuneration from the program, or owns any of the beneficial interests not excluded in this subdivision; (3) an individual who owns less than five percent of the outstanding common shares of a corporation: (i) whose securities are exempt under section 80A.45, clause (6); or (ii) whose transactions are exempt under section 80A.46, clause (2); (4) an individual who is a member of an organization exempt from taxation under section 290.05, unless the individual is also an officer, owner, or managerial official of the program or owns any of the beneficial interests not excluded in this subdivision. This clause does not exclude from the definition of controlling individual an organization that is exempt from taxation; or (5) an employee stock ownership plan trust, or a participant or board member of an employee stock ownership plan, unless the participant or board member is a controlling individual according to paragraph (a). (c) For purposes of this subdivision, "managerial official" means an individual who has the decision-making authority related to the operation of the program, and the responsibility for the ongoing management of or direction of the policies, services, or employees of the program. A site director who has no ownership interest in the program is not considered to be a managerial official for purposes of this definition. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245D.081, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Program management and oversight. (a) The license holder must designate a managerial staff person or persons to provide program management and oversight of the services provided by the license holder. The designated manager is responsible for the following: (1) maintaining a current understanding of the licensing requirements sufficient to ensure compliance throughout the program as identified in section 245A.04, subdivision 1, paragraph (e), and when applicable, as identified in section deleted text begin 256B.04, subdivision 21, paragraph (g)deleted text end new text begin 256B.044, subdivision 7new text end ; (2) ensuring the duties of the designated coordinator are fulfilled according to the requirements in subdivision 2; (3) ensuring the program implements corrective action identified as necessary by the program following review of incident and emergency reports according to the requirements in section 245D.11, subdivision 2, clause (7). An internal review of incident reports of alleged or suspected maltreatment must be conducted according to the requirements in section 245A.65, subdivision 1, paragraph (b); (4) evaluation of satisfaction of persons served by the program, the person's legal representative, if any, and the case manager, with the service delivery and progress toward accomplishing outcomes identified in sections 245D.07 and 245D.071, and ensuring and protecting each person's rights as identified in section 245D.04; (5) ensuring staff competency requirements are met according to the requirements in section 245D.09, subdivision 3, and ensuring staff orientation and training is provided according to the requirements in section 245D.09, subdivisions 4, 4a, and 5; (6) ensuring corrective action is taken when ordered by the commissioner and that the terms and conditions of the license and any variances are met; and (7) evaluating the information identified in clauses (1) to (6) to develop, document, and implement ongoing program improvements. (b) The designated manager must be competent to perform the duties as required and must minimally meet the education and training requirements identified in subdivision 2, paragraph (b), and have a minimum of three years of supervisory level experience in a program that provides care or education to vulnerable adults or children. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.04, subdivision 21, is amended to read: Subd. 21. Provider enrollment. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end The commissioner shall enroll providers and conduct screening activities as required by new text begin sections 256B.044 to 256B.0444 and new text end Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 455, subpart E. deleted text begin A provider must enroll each provider-controlled location where direct services are provided. The commissioner may deny a provider's incomplete application if a provider fails to respond to the commissioner's request for additional information within 60 days of the request. The commissioner must conduct a background study under chapter deleted text end deleted text begin 245C deleted text end deleted text begin , including a review of databases in section 245C.08, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (5), for a provider described in this paragraph. The background study requirement may be satisfied if the commissioner conducted a fingerprint-based background study on the provider that includes a review of databases in section 245C.08, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (5). deleted text end deleted text begin (b) The commissioner shall revalidate: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) each provider under this subdivision at least once every five years; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) each personal care assistance agency, CFSS provider-agency, and CFSS financial management services provider under this subdivision at least once every three years; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) each EIDBI agency under this subdivision at least once every three years; and deleted text end deleted text begin (4) at the commissioner's discretion, any medical-assistance-only provider type the commissioner deems "high-risk" under this subdivision. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) The commissioner shall conduct revalidation as follows: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) provide 30-day notice of the revalidation due date including instructions for revalidation and a list of materials the provider must submit; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) if a provider fails to submit all required materials by the due date, notify the provider of the deficiency within 30 days after the due date and allow the provider an additional 30 days from the notification date to comply; and deleted text end deleted text begin (3) if a provider fails to remedy a deficiency within the 30-day time period, give 60-day notice of termination and immediately suspend the provider's ability to bill. The provider does not have the right to appeal suspension of ability to bill. deleted text end deleted text begin (d) If a provider fails to comply with any individual provider requirement or condition of participation, the commissioner may suspend the provider's ability to bill until the provider comes into compliance. The commissioner's decision to suspend the provider is not subject to an administrative appeal. deleted text end deleted text begin (e) Correspondence and notifications, including notifications of termination and other actions, may be delivered electronically to a provider's MN-ITS mailbox. This paragraph does not apply to correspondences and notifications related to background studies. deleted text end deleted text begin (f) If the commissioner or the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services determines that a provider is designated "high-risk," the commissioner may withhold payment from providers within that category upon initial enrollment for a 90-day period. The withholding for each provider must begin on the date of the first submission of a claim. deleted text end deleted text begin (g) An enrolled provider that is also licensed by the commissioner under chapter deleted text end deleted text begin 245A deleted text end deleted text begin , is licensed as a home care provider by the Department of Health under chapter 144A, or is licensed as an assisted living facility under chapter deleted text end deleted text begin 144G deleted text end deleted text begin and has a home and community-based services designation on the home care license under section 144A.484, must designate an individual as the entity's compliance officer. The compliance officer must: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) develop policies and procedures to assure adherence to medical assistance laws and regulations and to prevent inappropriate claims submissions; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) train the employees of the provider entity, and any agents or subcontractors of the provider entity including billers, on the policies and procedures under clause (1); deleted text end deleted text begin (3) respond to allegations of improper conduct related to the provision or billing of medical assistance services, and implement action to remediate any resulting problems; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) use evaluation techniques to monitor compliance with medical assistance laws and regulations; deleted text end deleted text begin (5) promptly report to the commissioner any identified violations of medical assistance laws or regulations; and deleted text end deleted text begin (6) within 60 days of discovery by the provider of a medical assistance reimbursement overpayment, report the overpayment to the commissioner and make arrangements with the commissioner for the commissioner's recovery of the overpayment. deleted text end deleted text begin The commissioner may require, as a condition of enrollment in medical assistance, that a provider within a particular industry sector or category establish a compliance program that contains the core elements established by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services. deleted text end deleted text begin (h) The commissioner may revoke the enrollment of an ordering or rendering provider for a period of not more than one year, if the provider fails to maintain and, upon request from the commissioner, provide access to documentation relating to written orders or requests for payment for durable medical equipment, certifications for home health services, or referrals for other items or services written or ordered by such provider, when the commissioner has identified a pattern of a lack of documentation. A pattern means a failure to maintain documentation or provide access to documentation on more than one occasion. Nothing in this paragraph limits the authority of the commissioner to sanction a provider under the provisions of section 256B.064. deleted text end deleted text begin (i) The commissioner shall terminate or deny the enrollment of any individual or entity if the individual or entity has been terminated from participation in Medicare or under the Medicaid program or Children's Health Insurance Program of any other state. The commissioner may exempt a rehabilitation agency from termination or denial that would otherwise be required under this paragraph, if the agency: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) is unable to retain Medicare certification and enrollment solely due to a lack of billing to the Medicare program; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) meets all other applicable Medicare certification requirements based on an on-site review completed by the commissioner of health; and deleted text end deleted text begin (3) serves primarily a pediatric population. deleted text end deleted text begin (j) As a condition of enrollment in medical assistance, the commissioner shall require that a provider designated "moderate" or "high-risk" by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or the commissioner permit the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, its agents, or its designated contractors and the state agency, its agents, or its designated contractors to conduct unannounced on-site inspections of any provider location. The commissioner shall publish in the Minnesota Health Care Program Provider Manual a list of provider types designated "limited," "moderate," or "high-risk," based on the criteria and standards used to designate Medicare providers in Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 424.518. The list and criteria are not subject to the requirements of chapter deleted text end deleted text begin 14 deleted text end deleted text begin . The commissioner's designations are not subject to administrative appeal. deleted text end deleted text begin (k) As a condition of enrollment in medical assistance, the commissioner shall require that a high-risk provider, or a person with a direct or indirect ownership interest in the provider of five percent or higher, consent to criminal background checks, including fingerprinting, when required to do so under state law or by a determination by the commissioner or the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services that a provider is designated high-risk for fraud, waste, or abuse. deleted text end deleted text begin (l)(1) Upon initial enrollment, reenrollment, and notification of revalidation, all durable medical equipment, prosthetics, orthotics, and supplies (DMEPOS) medical suppliers meeting the durable medical equipment provider and supplier definition in clause (3), operating in Minnesota and receiving Medicaid funds must purchase a surety bond that is annually renewed and designates the Minnesota Department of Human Services as the obligee, and must be submitted in a form approved by the commissioner. For purposes of this clause, the following medical suppliers are not required to obtain a surety bond: a federally qualified health center, a home health agency, the Indian Health Service, a pharmacy, and a rural health clinic. deleted text end deleted text begin (2) At the time of initial enrollment or reenrollment, durable medical equipment providers and suppliers defined in clause (3) must purchase a surety bond of $50,000. If a revalidating provider's Medicaid revenue in the previous calendar year is up to and including $300,000, the provider agency must purchase a surety bond of $50,000. If a revalidating provider's Medicaid revenue in the previous calendar year is over $300,000, the provider agency must purchase a surety bond of $100,000. The surety bond must allow for recovery of costs and fees in pursuing a claim on the bond. Any action to obtain monetary recovery or sanctions from a surety bond must occur within six years from the date the debt is affirmed by a final agency decision. An agency decision is final when the right to appeal the debt has been exhausted or the time to appeal has expired under section 256B.064. deleted text end deleted text begin (3) "Durable medical equipment provider or supplier" means a medical supplier that can purchase medical equipment or supplies for sale or rental to the general public and is able to perform or arrange for necessary repairs to and maintenance of equipment offered for sale or rental. deleted text end deleted text begin (m) The Department of Human Services may require a provider to purchase a surety bond as a condition of initial enrollment, reenrollment, reinstatement, or continued enrollment if: (1) the provider fails to demonstrate financial viability, (2) the department determines there is significant evidence of or potential for fraud and abuse by the provider, or (3) the provider or category of providers is designated high-risk pursuant to paragraph (f) and as per Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 455.450. The surety bond must be in an amount of $100,000 or ten percent of the provider's payments from Medicaid during the immediately preceding 12 months, whichever is greater. The surety bond must name the Department of Human Services as an obligee and must allow for recovery of costs and fees in pursuing a claim on the bond. This paragraph does not apply if the provider currently maintains a surety bond under the requirements in section 256B.051, 256B.0659, 256B.0701, or 256B.85. deleted text end Sec. 5. new text begin [256B.044] PROVIDER ENROLLMENT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Designating categorical risk levels. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must designate provider types as "limited-risk," "moderate-risk," or "high-risk," based on the criteria and standards used to designate Medicare providers in Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 424.518. The commissioner must publish a list of provider types and designated categorical risk levels in the Minnesota Health Care Program Provider Manual. new text end new text begin (b) The list and criteria are not subject to the requirements of chapter 14, and section 14.386 does not apply. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner's designations are not subject to administrative appeal. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Service location enrollment. new text end new text begin A provider must enroll each provider-controlled location where direct services are provided. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Incomplete provider enrollment applications. new text end new text begin The commissioner may deny a provider's incomplete enrollment application if a provider fails to respond to the commissioner's request for additional information within 60 days of the request. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Required background studies. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must conduct a background study under chapter 245C, including a review of databases in section 245C.08, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (5), for a provider applying for enrollment under section 256B.04, subdivision 21. The background study requirement may be satisfied if the commissioner conducted a fingerprint-based background study on the provider that included a review of databases in section 245C.08, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (5). new text end new text begin (b) As a condition of enrollment in medical assistance, the commissioner must require that a high-risk provider, or a person with a direct or indirect ownership interest in the provider of five percent or higher, consent to criminal background checks, including fingerprinting, when required to do so under state law or by a determination by the commissioner or the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS) that a provider is designated high-risk. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Surety bonds. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may require a provider to purchase a surety bond as a condition of initial enrollment, revalidation, reenrollment, reinstatement, or continued enrollment if: new text end new text begin (1) the provider fails to demonstrate financial viability; new text end new text begin (2) the commissioner determines there is significant evidence of or potential for fraud and abuse by the provider; or new text end new text begin (3) the provider or category of providers is designated high-risk pursuant to subdivision 1 and Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 455.450. new text end new text begin (b) The surety bond must be in an amount of $100,000 or ten percent of the provider's payments from Medicaid during the immediately preceding 12 months, whichever is greater. The surety bond must name the Department of Human Services as an obligee and must allow for recovery of costs and fees in pursuing a claim on the bond. new text end new text begin (c) This subdivision does not apply if the provider currently maintains a surety bond under the requirements in section 256B.051, 256B.0659, 256B.0701, or 256B.85. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Required permission to conduct on-site inspection. new text end new text begin As a condition of enrollment in medical assistance, the commissioner shall require that a provider designated moderate-risk or high-risk by CMS or the commissioner permit CMS, CMS's agents, or CMS's designated contractors and the state agency, the state agency's agents, or the state agency's designated contractors to conduct unannounced on-site inspections of any provider location. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Compliance programs. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may require, as a condition of enrollment in medical assistance, that a provider within a particular industry sector or category establish a compliance program that contains the core elements established by CMS. new text end new text begin (b) If an enrolled provider is required by the commissioner or by law to designate an individual as the provider's compliance officer, the compliance officer must: new text end new text begin (1) develop policies and procedures to ensure adherence to medical assistance laws and regulations and to prevent inappropriate claims submissions; new text end new text begin (2) train the employees of the provider entity and any agents or subcontractors of the provider entity, including billers, on the policies and procedures under clause (1); new text end new text begin (3) respond to allegations of improper conduct related to the provision or billing of medical assistance services and implement action to remediate any resulting problems; new text end new text begin (4) use evaluation techniques to monitor compliance with medical assistance laws and regulations; new text end new text begin (5) promptly report to the commissioner any identified violations of medical assistance laws or regulations; and new text end new text begin (6) within 60 days of discovery by the provider of a medical assistance reimbursement overpayment, report the overpayment to the commissioner and make arrangements with the commissioner for the commissioner's recovery of the overpayment. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Correspondence and notification. new text end new text begin The commissioner may deliver correspondence and notifications, including notifications of termination and other actions, electronically to a provider's MN-ITS mailbox. This subdivision does not apply to correspondence and notifications related to background studies. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [256B.0441] PROVIDER REVALIDATION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Provider revalidation schedule. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall revalidate: new text end new text begin (1) each provider at least once every five years; new text end new text begin (2) each personal care assistance agency, community first services and supports (CFSS) agency-provider, and CFSS financial management services provider at least once every three years; new text end new text begin (3) each early intensive developmental and behavioral intervention agency at least once every three years; and new text end new text begin (4) at the commissioner's discretion, any medical-assistance-only provider type the commissioner deems high-risk under section 256B.044, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Revalidation procedures. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall conduct revalidation as follows: new text end new text begin (1) provide 30 days' notice of the revalidation due date including instructions for revalidation and a list of materials the provider must submit; new text end new text begin (2) if a provider fails to submit all required materials by the due date, notify the provider of the deficiency within 30 days after the due date and allow the provider an additional 30 days from the notification date to comply; and new text end new text begin (3) if a provider fails to remedy a deficiency within the 30-day time period, give 60 days' notice of termination and immediately suspend the provider's ability to bill. The provider does not have the right to appeal suspension of ability to bill. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [256B.0442] PROVIDER ENROLLMENT SUSPENSIONS AND TERMINATIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Commissioner's general authority to suspend individual provider's enrollment. new text end new text begin (a) If a provider fails to comply with any individual provider requirement or condition of participation, the commissioner may suspend the provider's ability to bill until the provider comes into compliance. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner's decision to suspend the provider is not subject to an administrative appeal. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Commissioner's authority to revoke enrollment of certain providers for lack of documentation. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner may revoke the enrollment of an ordering or rendering provider for a period of not more than one year, if the provider fails to maintain and, upon request from the commissioner, provide access to documentation relating to written orders or requests for payment for durable medical equipment, certifications for home health services, or referrals for other items or services written or ordered by the provider, when the commissioner has identified a pattern of a lack of documentation. A pattern means a failure to maintain documentation or provide access to documentation on more than one occasion. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this subdivision limits the authority of the commissioner to sanction a provider under section 256B.064. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Commissioner's duty to terminate provider enrollment. new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), the commissioner must terminate or deny the enrollment of any individual or entity if the individual or entity has been terminated from participation in Medicare or under the Medicaid program or Children's Health Insurance Program of any other state. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may exempt a rehabilitation agency from termination or denial that would otherwise be required under paragraph (a), if the agency: new text end new text begin (1) is unable to retain Medicare certification and enrollment solely due to a lack of billing to the Medicare program; new text end new text begin (2) meets all other applicable Medicare certification requirements based on an on-site review completed by the commissioner of health; and new text end new text begin (3) serves primarily a pediatric population. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Commissioner's authority to terminate provider enrollment for lack of submitted claims. new text end new text begin The commissioner may terminate the enrollment of an individual or entity provider if the individual or entity provider has not submitted any claims in the previous 12 consecutive calendar months. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [256B.0443] PROVIDER PAYMENT WITHHOLDS. new text end new text begin (a) If the commissioner or the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services designates a provider type as high-risk under section 256B.044, subdivision 1, the commissioner may withhold payment from providers within that category upon initial enrollment for a 90-day period. new text end new text begin (b) The withholding for each provider must begin on the date of the first submission of a claim. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [256B.0444] ADDITIONAL PROVIDER ENROLLMENT REQUIREMENTS FOR SPECIFIC PROVIDER TYPES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Durable medical equipment provider or supplier. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "durable medical equipment provider or supplier" means a medical supplier that can purchase medical equipment or supplies for sale or rent to the general public and is able to perform or arrange for necessary repairs to and maintenance of equipment offered for sale or rent. new text end new text begin (b) Upon initial enrollment, reenrollment, and notification of revalidation, all durable medical equipment, prosthetics, orthotics, and supplies medical suppliers meeting the durable medical equipment provider or supplier definition in paragraph (a), operating in Minnesota, and receiving Medicaid money must purchase a surety bond that is annually renewed, designates the Department of Human Services as the obligee, and is submitted in a form approved by the commissioner. For purposes of this paragraph, the following medical suppliers are not required to obtain a surety bond: a federally qualified health center, a home health agency, the Indian Health Service, a pharmacy, and a rural health clinic. new text end new text begin (c) At the time of initial enrollment or reenrollment, durable medical equipment providers or suppliers defined in paragraph (a) must purchase a surety bond of $50,000. If a revalidating provider's Medicaid revenue in the previous calendar year is up to and including $300,000, the provider agency must purchase a surety bond of $50,000. If a revalidating provider's Medicaid revenue in the previous calendar year is over $300,000, the provider agency must purchase a surety bond of $100,000. The surety bond must allow for recovery of costs and fees in pursuing a claim on the bond. Any action to obtain monetary recovery or sanctions from a surety bond must occur within six years from the date the debt is affirmed by a final agency decision. An agency decision is final when the right to appeal the debt has been exhausted or the time to appeal has expired under section 256B.064. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Providers licensed by the commissioner of human services. new text end new text begin An enrolled provider that is also licensed by the commissioner under chapter 245A must designate an individual as the licensee's compliance officer under section 256B.044, subdivision 7, paragraph (b). new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Providers licensed by the commissioner of health. new text end new text begin An enrolled provider that is also licensed by the commissioner of health as a home care provider under chapter 144A with a home and community-based services designation under section 144A.484 on the home care license, or as an assisted living facility under chapter 144G, must designate an individual as the licensee's compliance officer under section 256B.044, subdivision 7, paragraph (b). new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.057, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Employed persons with disabilities. (a) Medical assistance may be paid for a person who is employed and who: (1) but for excess earnings or assets meets the definition of disabled under the Supplemental Security Income program; and (2) pays a premium and other obligations under paragraph (d). (b) For purposes of eligibility, there is a $65 earned income disregard. To be eligible for medical assistance under this subdivision, a person must have more than $65 of earned income, be receiving an unemployment insurance benefit under chapter 268 that the person began receiving while eligible under this subdivision, or be receiving family and medical leave benefits under chapter 268B that the person began receiving while eligible under this subdivision. A person who is self-employed must file and pay all applicable taxes. Any spousal income shall be disregarded for purposes of eligibility and premium determinations. (c) After the month of enrollment, a person enrolled in medical assistance under this subdivision who would otherwise be ineligible and be disenrolled due to one of the following circumstances may retain eligibility for up to four consecutive months after a month of job loss if the person: (1) is temporarily unable to work and without receipt of earned income due to a medical condition, as verified by a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant; or (2) loses employment for reasons not attributable to the enrollee, and is without receipt of earned income. To receive a four-month extension of continued eligibility under this paragraph, enrollees must verify the medical condition or provide notification of job loss, continue to meet all other eligibility requirements, and continue to pay all calculated premium costs. (d) All enrollees must pay a premium to be eligible for medical assistance under this subdivision, except as provided under clause (5). (1) An enrollee must pay the greater of a $35 premium or the premium calculated based on the person's gross earned and unearned income and the applicable family size using a sliding fee scale established by the commissioner, which begins at one percent of income at 100 percent of the federal poverty guidelines and increases to 7.5 percent of income for those with incomes at or above 300 percent of the federal poverty guidelines. (2) Annual adjustments in the premium schedule based upon changes in the federal poverty guidelines shall be effective for premiums due in July of each year. (3) All enrollees who receive unearned income must pay one-half of one percent of unearned income in addition to the premium amount, except as provided under clause (5). (4) Increases in benefits under title II of the Social Security Act shall not be counted as income for purposes of this subdivision until July 1 of each year. (5) Effective July 1, 2009, American Indians are exempt from paying premiums as required by section 5006 of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009, Public Law 111-5. For purposes of this clause, an American Indian is any person who meets the definition of Indian according to Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 447.50. (e) A person's eligibility and premium shall be determined by the local county agency. Premiums must be paid to the commissioner. All premiums are dedicated to the commissioner. (f) Any required premium shall be determined at application and redetermined at the enrollee's 12-month income review or when a change in income or household size is reported. Enrollees must report any change in income or household size within 30 days of when the change occurs. A decreased premium resulting from a reported change in income or household size shall be effective the first day of the next available billing month after the change is reported. Except for changes occurring from annual cost-of-living increases, a change resulting in an increased premium shall not affect the premium amount until the next 12-month review. (g) Premium payment is due upon notification from the commissioner of the premium amount required. Premiums may be paid in installments at the discretion of the commissioner. (h) Nonpayment of the premium shall result in denial or termination of medical assistance unless the person demonstrates good cause for nonpayment. "Good cause" means an excuse for the enrollee's failure to pay the required premium when due because the circumstances were beyond the enrollee's control or not reasonably foreseeable. The commissioner shall determine whether good cause exists based on the weight of the supporting evidence submitted by the enrollee to demonstrate good cause.new text begin The commissioner must not determine that good cause exists for a month for which the premium has already been paid.new text end Except when an installment agreement is accepted by the commissioner, all persons disenrolled for nonpayment of a premium must pay any past due premiums as well as current premiums due prior to being reenrolled. Nonpayment shall include payment with a returned, refused, or dishonored instrument. The commissioner may require a guaranteed form of payment as the only means to replace a returned, refused, or dishonored instrument. (i) For enrollees whose income does not exceed 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelines and who are also enrolled in Medicare, the commissioner shall reimburse the enrollee for Medicare part B premiums under section 256B.0625, subdivision 15, paragraph (a). (j) The commissioner is authorized to determine that a premium amount was calculated or billed in error, make corrections to financial records and billing systems, and refund premiums collected in error. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0625, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Outpatient and physician-directed clinic services. Medical assistance covers outpatient hospital or physician-directed clinic services. deleted text begin Thedeleted text end new text begin All services provided bynew text end physician-directed clinic staff deleted text begin shall include at least two physicians and all services shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be deleted text begin provideddeleted text end under the deleted text begin direct supervisiondeleted text end new text begin directionnew text end of a physician. Hospital outpatient departments are subject to the same limitations and reimbursements as other enrolled vendors for all services, except initial triage, emergency services, and services not provided or immediately available in clinics, physicians' offices, or by other enrolled providers. "Emergency services" means those medical services required for the immediate diagnosis and treatment of medical conditions that, if not immediately diagnosed and treated, could lead to serious physical or mental disability or death or are necessary to alleviate severe pain. Neither the hospital, its employees, nor any physician or dentist, shall be liable in any action arising out of a determination not to render emergency services or care if reasonable care is exercised in determining the condition of the person, or in determining the appropriateness of the facilities, or the qualifications and availability of personnel to render these services consistent with this section. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon federal approval. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.0759, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Provider payment rates. (a) Payment rates for participating providers must be increased for services provided to medical assistance enrollees. To receive a rate increase, participating providers must meet demonstration project requirements and provide evidence of formal referral arrangements with providers delivering step-up or step-down levels of care. Providers that have enrolled in the demonstration project but have not met the provider standards under subdivision 3 as of July 1, 2022, are not eligible for a rate increase under this subdivision until the date that the provider meets the provider standards in subdivision 3. Services provided from July 1, 2022, to the date that the provider meets the provider standards under subdivision 3 shall be reimbursed at rates according to section 254B.0505, subdivision 1. Rate increases paid under this subdivision to a provider for services provided between July 1, 2021, and July 1, 2022, are not subject to recoupment when the provider is taking meaningful steps to meet demonstration project requirements that are not otherwise required by law, and the provider provides documentation to the commissioner, upon request, of the steps being taken. (b) The commissioner may temporarily suspend payments to the provider according to section deleted text begin 256B.04, subdivision 21, paragraph (d)deleted text end new text begin 256B.0442, subdivision 1new text end , if the provider does not meet the requirements in paragraph (a). Payments withheld from the provider must be made once the commissioner determines that the requirements in paragraph (a) are met. (c) For outpatient individual and group substance use disorder services under section 254B.0505, subdivision 1, clause (1), and adolescent treatment programs that are licensed as outpatient treatment programs according to sections 245G.01 to 245G.18, provided on or after January 1, 2021, payment rates must be increased by 20 percent over the rates in effect on December 31, 2020. (d) Effective January 1, 2021, and contingent on annual federal approval, managed care plans and county-based purchasing plans must reimburse providers of the substance use disorder services meeting the criteria described in paragraph (a) who are employed by or under contract with the plan an amount that is at least equal to the fee-for-service base rate payment for the substance use disorder services described in paragraph (c). The commissioner must monitor the effect of this requirement on the rate of access to substance use disorder services and residential substance use disorder rates. Capitation rates paid to managed care organizations and county-based purchasing plans must reflect the impact of this requirement. This paragraph expires if federal approval is not received at any time as required under this paragraph. (e) Effective July 1, 2021, contracts between managed care plans and county-based purchasing plans and providers to whom paragraph (d) applies must allow recovery of payments from those providers if, for any contract year, federal approval for the provisions of paragraph (d) is not received, and capitation rates are adjusted as a result. Payment recoveries must not exceed the amount equal to any decrease in rates that results from this provision. (f) For substance use disorder services with medications for opioid use disorder under section 254B.0505, subdivision 1, clause (7), provided on or after January 1, 2021, payment rates must be increased by 20 percent over the rates in effect on December 31, 2020. Upon implementation of new rates according to section 254B.121, the 20 percent increase will no longer apply. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 256B.0949, subdivision 16, is amended to read: Subd. 16. Agency duties. (a) An agency delivering an EIDBI service under this section must: (1) enroll as a medical assistance Minnesota health care program provider according to Minnesota Rules, part 9505.0195, and deleted text begin section 256B.04, subdivision 21deleted text end new text begin sections 256B.044 to 256B.0444new text end , and meet all applicable provider standards and requirements; (2) designate an individual as the agency's compliance officer who must perform the duties described in section deleted text begin 256B.04, subdivision 21, paragraph (g)deleted text end new text begin 256B.044, subdivision 7, paragraph (b)new text end ; (3) demonstrate compliance with federal and state laws for the delivery of and billing for EIDBI service; (4) verify and maintain records of a service provided to the person or the person's legal representative as required under Minnesota Rules, parts 9505.2175 and 9505.2197; (5) demonstrate that while enrolled or seeking enrollment as a Minnesota health care program provider the agency did not have a lead agency contract or provider agreement discontinued because of a conviction of fraud; or did not have an owner, board member, or manager fail a state or federal criminal background check or appear on the list of excluded individuals or entities maintained by the federal Department of Human Services Office of Inspector General; (6) have established business practices including written policies and procedures, internal controls, and a system that demonstrates the organization's ability to deliver quality EIDBI services, appropriately submit claims, conduct required staff training, document staff qualifications, document service activities, and document service quality; (7) have an office located in Minnesota or a border state; (8) initiate a background study as required under subdivision 16a; (9) report maltreatment according to section 626.557 and chapter 260E; (10) comply with any data requests consistent with the Minnesota Government Data Practices Act, sections 256B.064 and 256B.27; (11) provide training for all agency staff on the requirements and responsibilities listed in the Maltreatment of Minors Act, chapter 260E, and the Vulnerable Adult Protection Act, section 626.557, including mandated and voluntary reporting, nonretaliation, and the agency's policy for all staff on how to report suspected abuse and neglect; (12) have a written policy to resolve issues collaboratively with the person and the person's legal representative when possible. The policy must include a timeline for when the person and the person's legal representative will be notified about issues that arise in the provision of services; (13) provide the person's legal representative with prompt notification if the person is injured while being served by the agency. An incident report must be completed by the agency staff member in charge of the person. A copy of all incident and injury reports must remain on file at the agency for at least five years from the report of the incident; (14) before starting a service, provide the person or the person's legal representative a description of the treatment modality that the person shall receive, including the staffing certification levels and training of the staff who shall provide a treatment; (15) provide clinical supervision for a minimum of one hour for every 16 hours of direct treatment per person, unless otherwise authorized in the person's individual treatment plan; and (16) provide required EIDBI intervention observation and direction at least once per month. Notwithstanding subdivision 13, paragraph (l), required EIDBI intervention observation and direction under this clause may be conducted via telehealth provided that no more than two consecutive monthly required EIDBI intervention observation and direction sessions under this clause are conducted via telehealth. (b) Upon request of the commissioner, an agency delivering services under this section must: (1) identify the agency's controlling individuals, as defined under section 245A.02, subdivision 5a; (2) provide disclosures of the use of billing agencies and other consultants who do not provide EIDBI services; and (3) provide copies of any contracts with consultants or independent contractors who do not provide EIDBI services, including hours contracted and responsibilities. (c) When delivering the ITP, and annually thereafter, an agency must provide the person or the person's legal representative with: (1) a written copy and a verbal explanation of the person's or person's legal representative's rights and the agency's responsibilities; (2) documentation in the person's file the date that the person or the person's legal representative received a copy and explanation of the person's or person's legal representative's rights and the agency's responsibilities; and (3) reasonable accommodations to provide the information in another format or language as needed to facilitate understanding of the person's or person's legal representative's rights and the agency's responsibilities. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.0949, subdivision 17, is amended to read: Subd. 17. Provider shortage; authority for exceptions. (a) In consultation with the Early Intensive Developmental and Behavioral Intervention Advisory Council and stakeholders, including agencies, professionals, parents of people with ASD or a related condition, and advocacy organizations, the commissioner shall determine if a shortage of EIDBI providers exists. For the purposes of this subdivision, "shortage of EIDBI providers" means a lack of availability of providers who meet the EIDBI provider qualification requirements under subdivision 15 that results in the delay of access to timely services under this section, or that significantly impairs the ability of a provider agency to have sufficient providers to meet the requirements of this section. The commissioner shall consider geographic factors when determining the prevalence of a shortage. The commissioner may determine that a shortage exists only in a specific region of the state, multiple regions of the state, or statewide. The commissioner shall also consider the availability of various types of treatment modalities covered under this section. (b) The commissioner, in consultation with the Early Intensive Developmental and Behavioral Intervention Advisory Council and stakeholders, must establish processes and criteria for granting an exception under this paragraph. The commissioner may grant an exception only if the exception would not compromise a person's safety and not diminish the effectiveness of the treatment. The commissioner may establish an expiration date for an exception granted under this paragraph. The commissioner may grant an exception for the following: (1) EIDBI provider qualifications under this section; (2) medical assistance provider enrollment requirements under deleted text begin section 256B.04, subdivision 21deleted text end new text begin sections 256B.044 to 256B.0444new text end ; or (3) EIDBI provider or agency standards or requirements. (c) If the commissioner, in consultation with the Early Intensive Developmental and Behavioral Intervention Advisory Council and stakeholders, determines that a shortage no longer exists, the commissioner must submit a notice that a shortage no longer exists to the chairs and ranking minority members of the senate and the house of representatives committees with jurisdiction over health and human services. The commissioner must post the notice for public comment for 30 days. The commissioner shall consider public comments before submitting to the legislature a request to end the shortage declaration. The commissioner shall not declare the shortage of EIDBI providers ended without direction from the legislature to declare it ended. Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256L.05, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Effective date of coverage. (a) The effective date of coverage is the first day of the month following the month in which eligibility is approved and the first premium payment has been received. The effective date of coverage for new members added to the family is the first day of the month following the month in which the change is reported. All eligibility criteria must be met by the family at the time the new family member is added. The income of the new family member is included with the family's modified adjusted gross income and the adjusted premium begins in the month the new family member is added. (b) The initial premium must be received by the last working day of the month for coverage to begin the first day of the following month. (c) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, benefits under sections 256L.01 to 256L.18 are secondary to a plan of insurance or benefit program under which an eligible person may have coverage and the commissioner shall use cost avoidance techniques to ensure coordination of any other health coverage for eligible persons. The commissioner shall identify eligible persons who may have coverage or benefits under other plans of insurance or who become eligible for medical assistance. (d) The effective date of coverage for individuals or families who are exempt from paying premiums under section 256L.15, deleted text begin subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin subdivisionsnew text end 1deleted text begin , paragraph (c)deleted text end new text begin and 2new text end , is the first day of the month following the month in which eligibility is approved. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256L.06, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Commissioner's duties and payment. (a) Premiums are dedicated to the commissioner for MinnesotaCare. (b) The commissioner shall develop and implement procedures to: (1) require enrollees to report changes in income; (2) adjust sliding scale premium payments, based upon both increases and decreases in enrollee income, at the time the change in income is reported; and (3) disenroll enrollees from MinnesotaCare for failure to pay required premiums. Failure to pay includes payment with a dishonored check, a returned automatic bank withdrawal, or a refused credit card or debit card payment. The commissioner may demand a guaranteed form of payment, including a cashier's check or a money order, as the only means to replace a dishonored, returned, or refused payment. (c) Premiums are calculated on a calendar month basis and may be paid on a monthly, quarterly, or semiannual basis, with the first payment due upon notice from the commissioner of the premium amount required. The commissioner shall inform applicants and enrollees of these premium payment options. Premium payment is required before enrollment is complete and to maintain deleted text begin eligibilitydeleted text end new text begin coveragenew text end in MinnesotaCare. Premium payments received before noon are credited the same day. Premium payments received after noon are credited on the next working day. (d) Nonpayment of the premium will result in disenrollment from the plan effective for the calendar month following the month for which the premium was due. Persons disenrolled for nonpayment may not reenroll prior to the first day of the month following the payment of an amount equal to deleted text begin two months' premiumsdeleted text end new text begin one monthly premiumnew text end . (e) The commissioner shall forgive the past-due premium for persons disenrolled under paragraph (d) prior to issuing a premium invoice for the deleted text begin fourthdeleted text end new text begin next new text end month deleted text begin following disenrollmentdeleted text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 17. Laws 2024, chapter 125, article 4, section 12, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Report. By deleted text begin December 15, 2025deleted text end new text begin November 30, 2026new text end , the commissioner must provide a summary report on the pilot program to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over mental health and county correctional facilities. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from December 15, 2025. new text end ARTICLE 4 HOUSING AND ECONOMIC SUPPORTS Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245.991, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Allowable grant activities. Grantees must provide homeless outreach and case management services. Projects may provide clinical assessment, habilitation and rehabilitation services, community mental health services, substance use disorder treatment, housing transition and sustaining services, or direct assistance funding. Services must be provided to individuals with a serious mental illness,new text begin substance use disorder,new text end or deleted text begin with adeleted text end co-occurring substance use disorderdeleted text begin , anddeleted text end who are homeless or at imminent risk of homelessness. Individuals receiving homeless outreach services may be presumed eligible until a serious mental illness can be verified. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245.992, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Eligible beneficiaries. Program activities must be provided to people with a serious mental illness,new text begin substance use disorder,new text end or deleted text begin with adeleted text end co-occurring substance use disorderdeleted text begin ,deleted text end who meet homeless criteria determined by the commissioner. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256D.05, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Eligibility. (a) Each assistance unit with income and resources less than the standard of assistance established by the commissioner and with a member who is a resident of the state shall be eligible for and entitled to general assistance if the assistance unit is: (1) a person who is suffering from a professionally certified permanent or temporary illness, injury, or incapacity which is expected to continue for more than 45 days and which prevents the person from obtaining or retaining employment; (2) a person whose presence in the home on a substantially continuous basis is required because of the professionally certified illness, injury, incapacity, or the age of another member of the household; (3) a person who has been placed in, and is residing in, a licensed or certified facility for purposes of physical or mental health or rehabilitation, or in an approved substance use disorder domiciliary facility, if the placement is based on illness or incapacity and is according to a plan developed or approved by the county agency through its director or designated representative; (4) a person not described in clause (1) or (3) who is diagnosed by a licensed physician, psychological practitioner, or other qualified professional, as developmentally disabled or mentally ill, and that condition prevents the person from obtaining or retaining employment; (5) a person who has an application pending for, or is appealing termination of benefits from, the Social Security disability program or the program of Supplemental Security Income for the aged, blind, and disabled, provided the person has a professionally certified permanent or temporary illness, injury, or incapacity which is expected to continue for more than 30 days and which prevents the person from obtaining or retaining employment; (6) a person who is unable to obtain or retain employment because advanced age significantly affects the person's ability to seek or engage in substantial work; (7) a person who has been assessed by a vocational specialist and, in consultation with the county agency, has been determined to be unemployable for purposes of this clause; a person is considered employable if there exist positions of employment in the local labor market, regardless of the current availability of openings for those positions, that the person is capable of performing. The person's eligibility under this category must be reassessed at least annually. The county agency must provide notice to the person not later than 30 days before annual eligibility under this item ends, informing the person of the date annual eligibility will end and the need for vocational assessment if the person wishes to continue eligibility under this clause. For purposes of establishing eligibility under this clause, it is the applicant's or recipient's duty to obtain any needed vocational assessment; (8) a person who is determined by the county agency, according to permanent rules adopted by the commissioner, to have a condition that qualifies under Minnesota's special education rules as a specific learning disability, provided that a rehabilitation plan for the person is developed or approved by the county agency, and the person is following the plan; (9) a child under the age of 18 who is not living with a parent, stepparent, or legal custodian, and only if: the child is legally emancipated or living with an adult with the consent of an agency acting as a legal custodian; the child is at least 16 years of age and the general assistance grant is approved by the director of the county agency or a designated representative as a component of a social services case plan for the child; or the child is living with an adult with the consent of the child's legal custodian and the county agency. For purposes of this clause, "legally emancipated" means a person under the age of 18 years who: (i) has been married; (ii) is on active duty in the uniformed services of the United States; (iii) has been emancipated by a court of competent jurisdiction; or (iv) is otherwise considered emancipated under Minnesota law, and for whom county social services has not determined that a social services case plan is necessary, for reasons other than the child has failed or refuses to cooperate with the county agency in developing the plan; (10) a person who is eligible for displaced homemaker services, programs, or assistance under section 116L.96, but only if that person is enrolled as a full-time student; (11) a person who is involved with protective or court-ordered services that prevent the applicant or recipient from working at least four hours per day; (12) a person over age 18 whose primary language is not English and who is attending high school at least half time; or (13) a person whose alcohol and drug addiction is a material factor that contributes to the person's disabilitydeleted text begin ; applicants who assert this clause as a basis for eligibility must be assessed by the county agency to determine if they are amenable to treatment; if the applicant is determined to be not amenable to treatment, but is otherwise eligible for benefits, then general assistance must be paid in vendor form, for the individual's shelter costs up to the limit of the grant amount, with the residual, if any, paid according to section 256D.09, subdivision 2a; if the applicant is determined to be amenable to treatment, then in order to receive benefits, the applicant must be in a treatment program or on a waiting list and the benefits must be paid in vendor form, for the individual's shelter costs, up to the limit of the grant amount, with the residual, if any, paid according to section 256D.09, subdivision 2adeleted text end . (b) As a condition of eligibility under paragraph (a), clauses (1), (3), (4), (7), and (8), the recipient must complete an interim assistance agreement and must apply for other maintenance benefits as specified in section 256D.06, subdivision 5, and must comply with efforts to determine the recipient's eligibility for those other maintenance benefits. (c) The burden of providing documentation for a county agency to use to verify eligibility for general assistance or for exemption from the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) employment and training program is upon the applicant or recipient. The county agency shall use documents already in its possession to verify eligibility, and shall help the applicant or recipient obtain other existing verification necessary to determine eligibility which the applicant or recipient does not have and is unable to obtain. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256D.06, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Emergency need. (a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision 1, a grant of emergency general assistance shall, to the extent funds are available, be made to an eligible single adult, married couple, or family for an emergency need where the recipient requests temporary assistance not exceeding 30 days if an emergency situation appears to exist under written criteria adopted by the county agencynew text begin and provided to the commissioner annuallynew text end . If an applicant or recipient relates facts to the county agency which may be sufficient to constitute an emergency situation, the county agency shall, to the extent funds are available, advise the person of the procedure for applying for assistance according to this subdivision. (b) The applicant must be ineligible for assistance under chapter 142G, must have annual net income no greater than 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelines for the previous calendar year, and may receive an emergency assistance grant not more than once in any 12-month period. (c) Funding for an emergency general assistance program is limited to the appropriation. Each fiscal year, the commissioner shall allocate to counties the money appropriated for emergency general assistance grants based on each county agency's average share of state's emergency general expenditures for the immediate past three fiscal years as determined by the commissioner, and may reallocate any unspent amounts to other counties. No county shall be allocated less than $1,000 for a fiscal year. (d) Any emergency general assistance expenditures by a county above the amount of the commissioner's allocation to the county must be made from county funds. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256D.54, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Potential eligibility. An applicant or recipient who is otherwise eligible for supplemental aid and who is potentially eligible for maintenance benefits from any other source shall (1) apply for those benefits within deleted text begin 30deleted text end new text begin 90new text end days of the county's determination of potential eligibility for those benefits; and (2) execute an interim assistance authorization agreement on a form as directed by the commissioner. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256I.04, subdivision 2b, is amended to read: Subd. 2b. Housing support agreements. (a) Agreements between agencies and providers of housing support must be in writing on a form developed and approved by the commissioner and must specify the name and address under which the establishment subject to the agreement does business and under which the establishment, or service provider, if different from the establishment, is licensed by the Department of Health or the Department of Human Services; the specific license or registration from the Department of Health or the Department of Human Services held by the provider and the number of beds subject to that license; the address of the location or locations at which housing support is provided under this agreement; the per diem and monthly rates that are to be paid from housing support funds for each eligible resident at each location; the number of beds at each location which are subject to the agreement; whether the license holder is a not-for-profit corporation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and a statement that the agreement is subject to the provisions of sections 256I.01 to 256I.06 and subject to any changes to those sections. (b) Providers are required to verify the following minimum requirements in the agreement: (1) current license or registration, including authorization if managing or monitoring medications; (2) all staff who have direct contact with recipients meet the staff qualifications; (3) the provision of housing support; (4) the provision of supplementary services, if applicable; (5) reports of adverse events, including recipient death or serious injury; (6) submission of residency requirements that could result in recipient eviction; and (7) confirmation that the provider will not limit or restrict the number of hours an applicant or recipient chooses to be employed, as specified in subdivision 5. (c) Agreements may be terminated with or without cause by the commissioner, the agency, or the provider with two calendar months prior notice. The commissioner may immediately terminate an agreement under subdivision 2d. new text begin (d) Agencies must develop and make available to prospective housing support providers a process by which the agency seeks, reviews, and approves housing support agreements and must report processes and results to the commissioner in a format defined by the commissioner. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256K.46, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Reporting. Grant recipients shall report annually on the use of shelter-linked youth mental health grants to the commissioner by December 31, beginning in 2020. Each report shall include the name and location of the grant recipient, the amount of each grant, the youth mental health services provided, and the number of youth receiving services. The commissioner shall determine the form required for the reports and may specify additional reporting requirements. deleted text begin The commissioner shall include the shelter-linked youth mental health services program in the biennial report required under section 256K.45, subdivision 2.deleted text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, sections 256D.09, subdivisions 2a and 2b; and 256K.45, subdivision 2, new text end new text begin are repealed. new text end ARTICLE 5 OFFICE OF THE INSPECTOR GENERAL Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13A.03, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Exception. new text end new text begin Law enforcement may delay notification under section 13A.02, subdivision 3, or authorize another government authority to delay notification to a customer without a court order if law enforcement determines in writing that notification would compromise the integrity of a current and ongoing criminal investigation. The written determination from law enforcement must be renewed every 90 days. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245.095, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Definitions. (a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions have the meanings given. (b) "Associated entity" means a provider or vendor owned or controlled by an excluded individual. (c) "Associated individual" means an individual or entity that has a relationship with the business or its owners or controlling individuals, such that the individual or entity would have knowledge of the financial practices of the program in question. new text begin (d) "Convicted" means a judgment of conviction has been entered by a federal, state, or local court, regardless of whether an appeal from the judgment is pending, and includes a stay of adjudication, a court-ordered diversion program, or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere. new text end new text begin (e) "Credible allegation of fraud" means an allegation that has been verified by the commissioner from any source, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) fraud hotline complaints; new text end new text begin (2) claims data mining; new text end new text begin (3) patterns identified through provider audits, civil false claims cases, and law enforcement investigations; and new text end new text begin (4) court filings and other legal documents, including but not limited to police reports, complaints, indictments, informations, affidavits, declarations, and search warrants. new text end deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end "Excluded" means removed under other authorities from a program administered by a Minnesota state or federal agencydeleted text begin , includingdeleted text end new text begin . Excluded includes but is not limited to:new text end new text begin (1)new text end a final determination to stop paymentsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) a conclusive background study disqualification, except for a disqualification issued under section 245C.15, subdivision 4c, that has not been set aside or had a variance granted under section 245C.15; and new text end new text begin (3) a final agency decision regarding a denial of a license application. new text end new text begin (g) "Fraud" has the meaning given in section 256B.02, subdivision 20. new text end deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end "Individual" means a natural person providing products or services as a provider or vendor. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end "Provider" means any entity, individual, owner, controlling individual, license holder, director, or managerial official of an entity receiving payment from a program administered by a Minnesota state or federal agency. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245.095, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Withholding of payments. (a) Except as otherwise provided by state or federal law, the commissioner may withhold payments to a provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity in any program administered by the commissioner if the commissioner determinesnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1)new text end there is a credible allegation of fraud for which an investigation is pending for a program administered by a Minnesota state or federal agencydeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) the individual, the entity, or an associated individual or entity was convicted of a crime, in state or federal court, for an offense that involves fraud or theft against a program administered by the commissioner or another state or federal agency; new text end new text begin (3) the provider is operating after a state or federal agency orders the suspension, revocation, or decertification of the provider's license or certification, or if the provider is subject to a temporary immediate suspension, regardless of whether the action is under appeal; or new text end new text begin (4) the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity, including those receiving funds under any contract or registered program, has a background study disqualification under section 245C.15, subdivisions 1 to 4b, that has not been set aside and for which no variance has been issued. new text end deleted text begin (b) For purposes of this subdivision, "credible allegation of fraud" means an allegation that has been verified by the commissioner from any source, including but not limited to: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) fraud hotline complaints; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) claims data mining; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) patterns identified through provider audits, civil false claims cases, and law enforcement investigations; and deleted text end deleted text begin (4) court filings and other legal documents, including but not limited to police reports, complaints, indictments, informations, affidavits, declarations, and search warrants. deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (b)new text end The commissioner must send notice of the withholding of payments within five days of taking such action. The notice must: (1) state that payments are being withheld according to this subdivision; (2) set forth the general allegations related to the withholding action, except the notice need not disclose specific information concerning an ongoing investigation; (3) state that the withholding is for a temporary period and cite the circumstances under which the withholding will be terminated; and (4) inform the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity of the right to submit written evidence to contest the withholding action for consideration by the commissioner. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end If the commissioner withholds payments under this subdivision, the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity has a right to request administrative reconsideration. A request for administrative reconsideration must be made in writing, state with specificity the reasons the payment withholding decision is in error, and include documents to support the request. Within 60 days from receipt of the request, the commissioner shall judiciously review allegations, facts, evidence available to the commissioner, and information submitted by the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity to determine whether the payment withholding should remain in place. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end The commissioner shall stop withholding payments if the commissioner determines there is insufficient evidence of fraud by the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity or when legal proceedings relating to the alleged fraud are completed, unless the commissioner has sent notice under subdivision 3 to the provider, vendor, individual, associated individual, or associated entity. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end The withholding of payments new text begin under this section new text end is a temporary action and is not subject to appeal under section 256.045 or chapter 14. new text begin (f) Section 15.013 does not apply to the commissioner taking action under this section. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245A.02, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Individual who is related. "Individual who is related" means a spouse, a parent, a birth or adopted child or stepchild, a stepparent, a stepbrother, a stepsister, a niece, a nephew, an adoptive parent, a grandparent, a sibling, an aunt, an uncle, new text begin a cousin, new text end or a legal guardiannew text begin , including an individual who has a relationship named in this subdivision through marriagenew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245A.03, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Exclusion from licensure. (a) This chapter does not apply to: (1) residential or nonresidential programs that are provided to a person by an individual who is related; (2) nonresidential programs that are provided by an unrelated individual to persons from a single related family; (3) residential or nonresidential programs that are provided to adults who do not misuse substances or have a substance use disorder, a mental illness, a developmental disability, a functional impairment, or a physical disability; (4) sheltered workshops or work activity programs that are certified by the commissioner of employment and economic development; (5) programs operated by a public school for children 33 months or older; (6) nonresidential programs primarily for children that provide care or supervision for periods of less than three hours a day while the child's parent or legal guardian is in the same building as the nonresidential program or present within another building that is directly contiguous to the building in which the nonresidential program is located; (7) nursing homes or hospitals licensed by the commissioner of health except as specified under section 245A.02; (8) board and lodge facilities licensed by the commissioner of health that do not provide children's residential services under Minnesota Rules, chapter 2960, mental health or substance use disorder treatment; (9) programs licensed by the commissioner of corrections; (10) recreation programs for children or adults that are operated or approved by a park and recreation board whose primary purpose is to provide social and recreational activities; (11) noncertified boarding care homes unless they provide services for five or more persons whose primary diagnosis is mental illness or a developmental disability; (12) programs for children such as scouting, boys clubs, girls clubs, and sports and art programs, and nonresidential programs for children provided for a cumulative total of less than 30 days in any 12-month period; (13) residential programs for persons with mental illness, that are located in hospitals; (14) camps licensed by the commissioner of health under Minnesota Rules, chapter 4630; (15) mental health outpatient services for adults with mental illness or children with mental illness; (16) residential programs serving school-age children whose sole purpose is cultural or educational exchange, until the commissioner adopts appropriate rules; (17) community support services programs as defined in section 245.462, subdivision 6, and family community support services as defined in section 245.4871, subdivision 17; (18) assisted living facilities licensed by the commissioner of health under chapter 144G; (19) substance use disorder treatment activities of licensed professionals in private practice as defined in section 245G.01, subdivision 17; (20) consumer-directed community support service funded under the Medicaid waiver for persons with developmental disabilities when the individual who provided the service is: (i) the same individual who is the direct payee of these specific waiver funds or paid by a fiscal agent, fiscal intermediary, or employer of record; and (ii) not otherwise under the control of a residential or nonresidential program that is required to be licensed under this chapter when providing the service; (21) a county that is an eligible vendor under section 254B.0501 to provide care coordination and comprehensive assessment services; (22) a recovery community organization that is an eligible vendor under section 254B.0501 to provide peer recovery support services; or (23) programs licensed by the commissioner of children, youth, and families in chapter 142B. (b) For purposes of paragraph (a), clause (6), a building is directly contiguous to a building in which a nonresidential program is located if it shares a common wall with the building in which the nonresidential program is located or is attached to that building by skyway, tunnel, atrium, or common roof. (c) Except for the home and community-based services identified in section 245D.03, subdivision 1, nothing in this chapter shall be construed to require licensure for any services provided and funded according to an approved federal waiver plan where licensure is specifically identified as not being a condition for the services and funding. new text begin (d) Notwithstanding section 245A.02, subdivision 13, programs initially licensed prior to July 1, 2026, may continue to operate under the definition of related individual in Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245A.02, subdivision 13, until the service recipient related to the license holder by marriage or as a cousin is no longer receiving services licensed under this chapter. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245A.043, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Change in ownership. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end If the commissioner determines that there is a change in ownership, the commissioner shall require submission of a new license application. This subdivision does not apply to a licensed program or service located in a home where the license holder resides. A change in ownership occurs when: (1) deleted text begin except as provided in paragraph (b),deleted text end the license holder sells or transfers 100 percent of the property, stock, or assets; (2) the license holder merges with another organization; (3) the license holder consolidates with two or more organizations, resulting in the creation of a new organization; (4) there is a change to the federal tax identification number associated with the license holder; or (5) deleted text begin except as provided in paragraph (b),deleted text end all controlling individuals for the original license have changed. deleted text begin (b) For changes under paragraph (a), clause (1) or (5), no change in ownership has occurred and a new license application is not required if at least one controlling individual has been affiliated as a controlling individual for the license for at least the previous 12 months immediately preceding the change. deleted text end Sec. 7. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245A.043, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Review of change in ownership. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end After a change in ownership under subdivision 2, deleted text begin paragraph (a),deleted text end the commissioner may complete a review for all new license holders within 12 months after the new license is issued. deleted text begin (b) For all license holders subject to the exception in subdivision 2, paragraph (b), the license holder must notify the commissioner of the date of the change in controlling individuals pursuant to section 245A.04, subdivision 7a, and the commissioner may complete a review within 12 months following the change. deleted text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245A.07, subdivision 2a, is amended to read: Subd. 2a. Immediate suspension expedited hearing. (a) Within five working days of receipt of the license holder's timely appeal, the commissioner shall request assignment of an administrative law judge. The request must include a proposed date, time, and place of a hearing. A hearing must be conducted by an administrative law judge within 30 calendar days of the request for assignment, unless an extension is requested by either party and granted by the administrative law judge for good cause. The commissioner shall issue a notice of hearing by certified mail or personal service at least ten working days before the hearing. The scope of the hearing shall be limited solely to the issue of whether the temporary immediate suspension should remain in effect pending the commissioner's final order under section 245A.08, regarding a licensing sanction issued under subdivision 3 following the immediate suspension. For suspensions under subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (1), the burden of proof in expedited hearings under this subdivision deleted text begin shall be limited todeleted text end new text begin is met only ifnew text end the deleted text begin commissioner's demonstrationdeleted text end new text begin commissioner demonstratesnew text end that reasonable cause exists to believe that the license holder's new text begin or controlling individual's new text end actions or failure to comply with applicable law or rule poses, or the actions of other individuals or conditions in the program poses an imminent risk of harm to the health, safety, or rights of persons served by the program. "Reasonable cause" means there exist specific articulable facts or circumstances which provide the commissioner with a reasonable suspicion that there is an imminent risk of harm to the health, safety, or rights of persons served by the program. When the commissioner has determined there is reasonable cause to order the temporary immediate suspension of a license based on a violation of safe sleep requirements, as defined in section 245A.1435, the commissioner is not required to demonstrate that an infant died or was injured as a result of the safe sleep violations. For suspensions under subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (2), the burden of proof in expedited hearings under this subdivision deleted text begin shall be limited todeleted text end new text begin is met only ifnew text end the deleted text begin commissioner's demonstrationdeleted text end new text begin commissioner demonstratesnew text end by a preponderance of the evidence that, since the license was revoked, the license holder committed additional violations of law or rule which may adversely affect the health or safety of persons served by the program. (b) The administrative law judge shall issue findings of fact, conclusions, and a recommendation within ten working days from the date of hearing. The parties shall have ten calendar days to submit exceptions to the administrative law judge's report. The record shall close at the end of the ten-day period for submission of exceptions. The commissioner's final order shall be issued within ten working days from the close of the record. When an appeal of a temporary immediate suspension is withdrawn or dismissed, the commissioner shall issue a final order affirming the temporary immediate suspension within ten calendar days of the commissioner's receipt of the withdrawal or dismissal. Within 90 calendar days after an immediate suspension has been issued and the license holder has not submitted a timely appeal under subdivision 2, paragraph (b), or within 90 calendar days after a final order affirming an immediate suspension, the commissioner shall determine: (1) whether a final licensing sanction shall be issued under subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end . The license holder shall continue to be prohibited from operation of the program during this 90-day period; or (2) whether the outcome of related, ongoing investigations or judicial proceedings are necessary to determine if a final licensing sanction under subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (5)new text end , will be issued and whether persons served by the program remain at an imminent risk of harm during the investigation period or proceedings. If so, the commissioner shall issue a suspension order under subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause deleted text begin (7).deleted text end new text begin (6); ornew text end new text begin (3) whether the license holder or controlling individual remains the subject of a pending administrative, civil, or criminal investigation or subject to an administrative or civil action related to fraud against a program administered by a state or federal agency. If so, the commissioner shall issue a suspension order under subdivision 3, paragraph (a), clause (6). new text end (c) When the final order under paragraph (b) affirms an immediate suspension, or the license holder does not submit a timely appeal of the immediate suspension, and a final licensing sanction is issued under subdivision 3 and the license holder appeals that sanction, the license holder continues to be prohibited from operation of the program pending a final commissioner's order under section 245A.08, subdivision 5, regarding the final licensing sanction. (d) The license holder shall continue to be prohibited from operation of the program while a suspension order issued under paragraph (b), clause (2)new text begin or (3)new text end , remains in effect. (e) For suspensions under subdivision 2, paragraph (a), clause (3), the burden of proof in expedited hearings under this subdivision deleted text begin shall be limited todeleted text end new text begin is met only ifnew text end the deleted text begin commissioner's demonstrationdeleted text end new text begin commissioner demonstratesnew text end by a preponderance of the evidence that a criminal complaint and warrant or summons was issued for the license holder new text begin or controlling individual new text end that was not dismissed, and that the criminal charge is an offense that involves fraud or theft against a program administered by the commissioner. new text begin (f) For suspensions under subdivision 2, paragraph (c), the burden of proof in expedited hearings under this subdivision is met only if the commissioner demonstrates by a preponderance of the evidence that the license holder or controlling individual is the subject of a pending administrative, civil, or criminal investigation or is subject to an administrative or civil action related to fraud against a program administered by a state or federal agency. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245A.07, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. License suspension, revocation, or fine. (a) The commissioner may suspend or revoke a license, or impose a fine if: (1) a license holder fails to comply fully with applicable laws or rules including but not limited to the requirements of this chapter and chapter 245C; (2) a license holder, a controlling individual, or an individual living in the household where the licensed services are provided or is otherwise subject to a background study has been disqualified and the disqualification was not set aside and no variance has been granted; (3) a license holder knowingly withholds relevant information from or gives false or misleading information to the commissioner in connection with an application for a license, in connection with the background study status of an individual, during an investigation, or regarding compliance with applicable laws or rules; (4) a license holder is excluded from any program administered by the commissioner under section 245.095; (5) revocation is required under section 245A.04, subdivision 7, paragraph (d); or (6) suspension is necessary under subdivision 2a, paragraph (b), clause (2)new text begin or (3)new text end . A license holder who has had a license issued under this chapter suspended, revoked, or has been ordered to pay a fine must be given notice of the action by certified mail, by personal service, or through the provider licensing and reporting hub. If mailed, the notice must be mailed to the address shown on the application or the last known address of the license holder. The notice must state in plain language the reasons the license was suspended or revoked, or a fine was ordered. (b) If the license was suspended or revoked, the notice must inform the license holder of the right to a contested case hearing under chapter 14 and Minnesota Rules, parts 1400.8505 to 1400.8612. The license holder may appeal an order suspending or revoking a license. The appeal of an order suspending or revoking a license must be made in writing by certified mail, by personal service, or through the provider licensing and reporting hub. If mailed, the appeal must be postmarked and sent to the commissioner within ten calendar days after the license holder receives notice that the license has been suspended or revoked. If a request is made by personal service, it must be received by the commissioner within ten calendar days after the license holder received the order. If the order is issued through the provider hub, the appeal must be received by the commissioner within ten calendar days from the date the commissioner issued the order through the hub. Except as provided in subdivision 2a, paragraph (c), if a license holder submits a timely appeal of an order suspending or revoking a license, the license holder may continue to operate the program as provided in section 245A.04, subdivision 7, paragraphs (i) and (j), until the commissioner issues a final order on the suspension or revocation. (c)(1) If the license holder was ordered to pay a fine, the notice must inform the license holder of the responsibility for payment of fines and the right to a contested case hearing under chapter 14 and Minnesota Rules, parts 1400.8505 to 1400.8612. The appeal of an order to pay a fine must be made in writing by certified mail, by personal service, or through the provider licensing and reporting hub. If mailed, the appeal must be postmarked and sent to the commissioner within ten calendar days after the license holder receives notice that the fine has been ordered. If a request is made by personal service, it must be received by the commissioner within ten calendar days after the license holder received the order. If the order is issued through the provider hub, the appeal must be received by the commissioner within ten calendar days from the date the commissioner issued the order through the hub. (2) The license holder shall pay the fines assessed on or before the payment date specified. If the license holder fails to fully comply with the order, the commissioner may issue a second fine or suspend the license until the license holder complies. If the license holder receives state funds, the state, county, or municipal agencies or departments responsible for administering the funds shall withhold payments and recover any payments made while the license is suspended for failure to pay a fine. A timely appeal shall stay payment of the fine until the commissioner issues a final order. (3) A license holder shall promptly notify the commissioner of human services, in writing, when a violation specified in the order to forfeit a fine is corrected. If upon reinspection the commissioner determines that a violation has not been corrected as indicated by the order to forfeit a fine, the commissioner may issue a second fine. The commissioner shall notify the license holder by certified mail, by personal service, or through the provider licensing and reporting hub that a second fine has been assessed. The license holder may appeal the second fine as provided under this subdivision. (4) Fines shall be assessed as follows: (i) the license holder shall forfeit $1,000 for each determination of maltreatment of a child under chapter 260E or the maltreatment of a vulnerable adult under section 626.557 for which the license holder is determined responsible for the maltreatment under section 260E.30, subdivision 4, paragraphs (a) and (b), or 626.557, subdivision 9c, paragraph (c); (ii) if the commissioner determines that a determination of maltreatment for which the license holder is responsible is the result of maltreatment that meets the definition of serious maltreatment as defined in section 245C.02, subdivision 18, the license holder shall forfeit $5,000; (iii) the license holder shall forfeit $200 for each occurrence of a violation of law or rule governing matters of health, safety, or supervision, including but not limited to the provision of adequate staff-to-child or adult ratios, and failure to comply with background study requirements under chapter 245C; and (iv) the license holder shall forfeit $100 for each occurrence of a violation of law or rule other than those subject to a $5,000, $1,000, or $200 fine in items (i) to (iii). For purposes of this section, "occurrence" means each violation identified in the commissioner's fine order. Fines assessed against a license holder that holds a license to provide home and community-based services, as identified in section 245D.03, subdivision 1, and a community residential setting or day services facility license under chapter 245D where the services are provided, may be assessed against both licenses for the same occurrence, but the combined amount of the fines shall not exceed the amount specified in this clause for that occurrence. (5) When a fine has been assessed, the license holder may not avoid payment by closing, selling, or otherwise transferring the licensed program to a third party. In such an event, the license holder will be personally liable for payment. In the case of a corporation, each controlling individual is personally and jointly liable for payment. (d) Except for background study violations involving the failure to comply with an order to immediately remove an individual or an order to provide continuous, direct supervision, the commissioner shall not issue a fine under paragraph (c) relating to a background study violation to a license holder who self-corrects a background study violation before the commissioner discovers the violation. A license holder who has previously exercised the provisions of this paragraph to avoid a fine for a background study violation may not avoid a fine for a subsequent background study violation unless at least 365 days have passed since the license holder self-corrected the earlier background study violation. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245A.10, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. License or certification fee for certain programs. (a)(1) A program licensed to provide one or more of the home and community-based services and supports identified under chapter 245D to persons with disabilities or age 65 and older, shall pay an annual nonrefundable license fee based on revenues derived from the provision of services that would require licensure under chapter 245D during the calendar year immediately preceding the year in which the license fee is paid, according to the following schedule: License Holder Annual Revenue License Fee less than or equal to $10,000 $250 greater than $10,000 but less than or equal to $25,000 $375 greater than $25,000 but less than or equal to $50,000 $500 greater than $50,000 but less than or equal to $100,000 $625 greater than $100,000 but less than or equal to $150,000 $750 greater than $150,000 but less than or equal to $200,000 $1,000 greater than $200,000 but less than or equal to $250,000 $1,250 greater than $250,000 but less than or equal to $300,000 $1,500 greater than $300,000 but less than or equal to $350,000 $1,750 greater than $350,000 but less than or equal to $400,000 $2,000 greater than $400,000 but less than or equal to $450,000 $2,250 greater than $450,000 but less than or equal to $500,000 $2,500 greater than $500,000 but less than or equal to $600,000 $2,850 greater than $600,000 but less than or equal to $700,000 $3,200 greater than $700,000 but less than or equal to $800,000 $3,600 greater than $800,000 but less than or equal to $900,000 $3,900 greater than $900,000 but less than or equal to $1,000,000 $4,250 greater than $1,000,000 but less than or equal to $1,250,000 $4,550 greater than $1,250,000 but less than or equal to $1,500,000 $4,900 greater than $1,500,000 but less than or equal to $1,750,000 $5,200 greater than $1,750,000 but less than or equal to $2,000,000 $5,500 greater than $2,000,000 but less than or equal to $2,500,000 $5,900 greater than $2,500,000 but less than or equal to $3,000,000 $6,200 greater than $3,000,000 but less than or equal to $3,500,000 $6,500 greater than $3,500,000 but less than or equal to $4,000,000 $7,200 greater than $4,000,000 but less than or equal to $4,500,000 $7,800 greater than $4,500,000 but less than or equal to $5,000,000 $9,000 greater than $5,000,000 but less than or equal to $7,500,000 $10,000 greater than $7,500,000 but less than or equal to $10,000,000 $14,000 greater than $10,000,000 but less than or equal to $12,500,000 $18,000 greater than $12,500,000 but less than or equal to $15,000,000 $25,000 greater than $15,000,000 but less than or equal to $17,500,000 $28,000 greater than $17,500,000 but less than new text begin or equal to new text end $20,000,000 $32,000 greater than $20,000,000 but less than new text begin or equal to new text end $25,000,000 $36,000 greater than $25,000,000 but less than new text begin or equal to new text end $30,000,000 $45,000 greater than $30,000,000 but less than new text begin or equal to new text end $35,000,000 $55,000 greater than $35,000,000 $75,000 (2) If requested, the license holder shall provide the commissioner information to verify the license holder's annual revenues or other information as needed, including copies of documents submitted to the Department of Revenue. (3) At each annual renewal, a license holder may elect to pay the highest renewal fee, and not provide annual revenue information to the commissioner. (4) A license holder that knowingly provides the commissioner incorrect revenue amounts for the purpose of paying a lower license fee shall be subject to a civil penalty in the amount of double the fee the provider should have paid. (b) A substance use disorder treatment program licensed under chapter 245G, to provide substance use disorder treatment shall pay an annual nonrefundable license fee based on the following schedule: Licensed Capacity License Fee 1 to 24 persons $2,600 25 to 49 persons $3,000 50 to 74 persons $5,000 75 to 99 persons $10,000 100 to 199 persons $15,000 200 or more persons $20,000 (c) A detoxification program licensed under Minnesota Rules, parts 9530.6510 to 9530.6590, or a withdrawal management program licensed under chapter 245F shall pay an annual nonrefundable license fee based on the following schedule: Licensed Capacity License Fee 1 to 24 persons $2,600 25 to 49 persons $3,000 50 or more persons $5,000 A detoxification program that also operates a withdrawal management program at the same location shall only pay one fee based upon the licensed capacity of the program with the higher overall capacity. (d) A children's residential facility licensed under Minnesota Rules, chapter 2960, to serve children shall pay an annual nonrefundable license fee based on the following schedule: Licensed Capacity License Fee 1 to 24 persons $1,000 25 to 49 persons $1,100 50 to 74 persons $1,200 75 to 99 persons $1,300 100 or more persons $1,400 (e) A residential facility licensed under section 245I.23 or Minnesota Rules, parts 9520.0500 to 9520.0670, to serve persons with mental illness shall pay an annual nonrefundable license fee based on the following schedule: Licensed Capacity License Fee 1 to 24 persons $2,600 25 to 49 persons $3,000 50 or more persons $20,000 (f) A residential facility licensed under Minnesota Rules, parts 9570.2000 to 9570.3400, to serve persons with physical disabilities shall pay an annual nonrefundable license fee based on the following schedule: Licensed Capacity License Fee 1 to 24 persons $450 25 to 49 persons $650 50 to 74 persons $850 75 to 99 persons $1,050 100 or more persons $1,250 (g) A program licensed as an adult day care center licensed under Minnesota Rules, parts 9555.9600 to 9555.9730, shall pay an annual nonrefundable license fee based on the following schedule: Licensed Capacity License Fee 1 to 24 persons $2,600 25 to 49 persons $3,000 50 to 74 persons $5,000 75 to 99 persons $10,000 100 to 199 persons $15,000 200 or more persons $20,000 (h) A program licensed to provide treatment services to persons with sexual psychopathic personalities or sexually dangerous persons under Minnesota Rules, parts 9515.3000 to 9515.3110, shall pay an annual nonrefundable license fee of $20,000. (i) A mental health clinic certified under section 245I.20 shall pay an annual nonrefundable certification fee of $1,550. If the mental health clinic provides services at a primary location with satellite facilities, the satellite facilities shall be certified with the primary location without an additional charge. (j) If a program subject to annual fees under paragraph (b) provides services at a primary location with satellite facilities, the satellite facilities must be licensed with the primary location and must be subject to an additional $500 annual nonrefundable license fee per satellite facility. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245A.142, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Provisional license. (a) Beginning January 1, 2026, the commissioner shall begin issuing provisional licenses to agencies enrolled under chapter 256B to provide EIDBI services. (b) Agencies enrolled before July 1, 2025, have until May 31, 2026, to submit an application for provisional licensure on the forms and in the manner prescribed by the commissioner. (c) Beginning June 1, 2026, an agency must not operate if it has not submitted an application for provisional licensure under this section. The commissioner shall disenroll an agency from providing EIDBI services under chapter 256B if the agency fails to submit an application for provisional licensure by May 31, 2026. (d) The commissioner must determine whether a provisional license applicant complies with all applicable rules and laws and either issue a provisional license to the applicant or deny the application by December 31, 2026. (e) A provisional license is effective until comprehensive EIDBI agency licensure standards are in effect unless the provisional license is suspended or revoked. new text begin (f) Initial provisional license applications are subject to the $2,100 application fee under section 245A.10, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245A.242, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Emergency overdose treatment. (a) A license holder must maintain a supply of opiate antagonists as defined in section 604A.04, subdivision 1, available for emergency treatment of opioid overdose deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin . For administration via intramuscular injection, a license holdernew text end must have a written standing order protocol by a physician who is licensed under chapter 147, advanced practice registered nurse who is licensed under chapter 148, or physician assistant who is licensed under chapter 147A, that permits the license holder to maintain a supply of new text begin intramuscular injection new text end opiate antagonists on site. A license holder must require staff to undergo training in the specific mode of administration used at the program, which may include intranasal administration, intramuscular injection, or both, before the staff has direct contact, as defined in section 245C.02, subdivision 11, with a person served by the program. (b) Notwithstanding any requirements to the contrary in Minnesota Rules, chapters 2960 and 9530, and Minnesota Statutes, chapters 245F, 245G, and 245I: (1) emergency opiate antagonist medications are not required to be stored in a locked area and staff and adult clients may carry this medication on them and store it in an unlocked location; (2) staff persons who only administer emergency opiate antagonist medications only require the training required by paragraph (a), which any knowledgeable trainer may provide. The trainer is not required to be a registered nurse or part of an accredited educational institution; and (3) nonresidential substance use disorder treatment programs that do not administer client medications beyond emergency opiate antagonist medications are not required to have the policies and procedures required in section 245G.08, subdivisions 5 and 6, and must instead describe the program's procedures for administering opiate antagonist medications in the license holder's description of health care services under section 245G.08, subdivision 1. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245C.02, subdivision 18, is amended to read: Subd. 18. Serious maltreatment. (a) "Serious maltreatment" means sexual abuse, maltreatment resulting in death, neglect resulting in serious injury which reasonably requires the care of a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant whether or not the care of a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant was sought, deleted text begin ordeleted text end abuse resulting in serious injurynew text begin , or financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult if the value of the funds or property is $1,000 or greaternew text end . (b) For purposes of this definition, "care of a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant" is treatment received or ordered by a physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse, but does not include: (1) diagnostic testing, assessment, or observation; (2) the application of, recommendation to use, or prescription solely for a remedy that is available over the counter without a prescription; or (3) a prescription solely for a topical antibiotic to treat burns when there is no follow-up appointment. (c) For purposes of this definition, "abuse resulting in serious injury" means: bruises, bites, skin laceration, or tissue damage; fractures; dislocations; evidence of internal injuries; head injuries with loss of consciousness; extensive second-degree or third-degree burns and other burns for which complications are present; extensive second-degree or third-degree frostbite and other frostbite for which complications are present; irreversible mobility or avulsion of teeth; injuries to the eyes; ingestion of foreign substances and objects that are harmful; near drowning; and heat exhaustion or sunstroke. (d) Serious maltreatment includes neglect when it results in criminal sexual conduct against a child or vulnerable adult. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245C.03, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Programs licensed by the commissioner. (a) The commissioner shall conduct a background study on: (1) the person or persons applying for a license; (2) an individual age 13 and over living in the household where the licensed program will be provided who is not receiving licensed services from the program; (3) current or prospective employees of the applicant or license holder who will have direct contact with persons served by the facility, agency, or program; (4) volunteers or student volunteers who will have direct contact with persons served by the program to provide program services if the contact is not under the continuous, direct supervision by an individual listed in clause (1) or (3); (5) an individual age ten to 12 living in the household where the licensed services will be provided when the commissioner has reasonable cause as defined in section 245C.02, subdivision 15; (6) an individual who, without providing direct contact services at a licensed program, may have unsupervised access to children or vulnerable adults receiving services from a program, when the commissioner has reasonable cause as defined in section 245C.02, subdivision 15; and (7) all controlling individuals as defined in section 245A.02, subdivision 5a; (8) notwithstanding clause (3), for children's residential facilities and foster residence settings, any adult working in the facility, whether or not the individual will have direct contact with persons served by the facility. (b) For child foster care when the license holder resides in the home where foster care services are provided, a short-term substitute caregiver providing direct contact services for a child for less than 72 hours of continuous care is not required to receive a background study under this chapter. (c) This subdivision applies to the following programs that must be licensed under chapter 245A: (1) adult foster care; (2) children's residential facilities; (3) licensed home and community-based services under chapter 245D; (4) residential mental health programs for adults; (5) substance use disorder treatment programs under chapter 245G; (6) withdrawal management programs under chapter 245F; (7) adult day care centers; (8) family adult day services; (9) detoxification programs; (10) community residential settings; (11) intensive residential treatment services and residential crisis stabilization under chapter 245I; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (12) treatment programs for persons with sexual psychopathic personality or sexually dangerous persons, licensed under chapter 245A and according to Minnesota Rules, parts 9515.3000 to 9515.3110deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (13) children's foster residence settings. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective November 3, 2026. new text end Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245C.04, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Licensed programs; other child care programs. (a) The commissioner shall conduct a background study of an individual required to be studied under section 245C.03, subdivision 1, at least upon application for initial license for all license types. (b) The commissioner shall conduct a background study of an individual required to be studied under section 245C.03, subdivision 1, including a child care background study subject as defined in section 245C.02, subdivision 6a, in a family child care program, licensed child care center, certified license-exempt child care center, or legal nonlicensed child care provider, on a schedule determined by the commissioner. Except as provided in section 245C.05, subdivision 5a, a child care background study must include submission of fingerprints for a national criminal history record check and a review of the information under section 245C.08. A background study for a child care program must be repeated within five years from the most recent study conducted under this paragraph. (c) At reauthorization or when a new background study is needed under section 142E.16, subdivision 2, for a legal nonlicensed child care provider authorized under chapter 142E: (1) for a background study affiliated with a legal nonlicensed child care provider, the individual shall provide information required under section 245C.05, subdivision 1, paragraphs (a), (b), and (d), to the commissioner and be fingerprinted and photographed under section 245C.05, subdivision 5; and (2) the commissioner shall verify the information received under clause (1) and submit the request in NETStudy 2.0 to complete the background study. (d) At reapplication for a family child care license: (1) for a background study affiliated with a licensed family child care center, the individual shall provide information required under section 245C.05, subdivision 1, paragraphs (a), (b), and (d), to the county agency, and be fingerprinted and photographed under section 245C.05, subdivision 5; (2) the county agency shall verify the information received under clause (1) and forward the information to the commissioner and submit the request in NETStudy 2.0 to complete the background study; and (3) the background study conducted by the commissioner under this paragraph must include a review of the information required under section 245C.08. deleted text begin (e) The commissioner is not required to conduct a study of an individual at the time of reapplication for a license if the individual's background study was completed by the commissioner of human services and the following conditions are met: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) a study of the individual was conducted either at the time of initial licensure or when the individual became affiliated with the license holder; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) the individual has been continuously affiliated with the license holder since the last study was conducted; and deleted text end deleted text begin (3) the last study of the individual was conducted on or after October 1, 1995. deleted text end deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end The commissioner of human services shall conduct a background study of an individual specified under section 245C.03, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clauses (2) to (6), who is newly affiliated with a child foster family setting license holder: (1) the county or private agency shall collect and forward to the commissioner the information required under section 245C.05, subdivisions 1 and 5, when the child foster family setting applicant or license holder resides in the home where child foster care services are provided; and (2) the background study conducted by the commissioner of human services under this paragraph must include a review of the information required under section 245C.08, subdivisions 1, 3, and 4. deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end The commissioner shall conduct a background study of an individual specified under section 245C.03, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clauses (2) to (6), who is newly affiliated with an adult foster care or family adult day services and with a family child care license holder or a legal nonlicensed child care provider authorized under chapter 142E and: (1) except as provided in section 245C.05, subdivision 5a, the county shall collect and forward to the commissioner the information required under section 245C.05, subdivision 1, paragraphs (a) and (b), and subdivision 5, paragraph (b), for background studies conducted by the commissioner for all family adult day services, for adult foster care when the adult foster care license holder resides in the adult foster care residence, and for family child care and legal nonlicensed child care authorized under chapter 142E; (2) the license holder shall collect and forward to the commissioner the information required under section 245C.05, subdivisions 1, paragraphs (a) and (b); and 5, paragraphs (a) and (b), for background studies conducted by the commissioner for adult foster care when the license holder does not reside in the adult foster care residence; and (3) the background study conducted by the commissioner under this paragraph must include a review of the information required under section 245C.08, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), and subdivisions 3 and 4. deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end Applicants for licensure, license holders, and other entities as provided in this chapter must submit completed background study requests to the commissioner using the electronic system known as NETStudynew text begin 2.0new text end before individuals specified in section 245C.03, subdivision 1, begin positions allowing direct contact in any licensed program. deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end For an individual who is not on the entity's active roster, the entity must initiate a new background study through NETStudy when: (1) an individual returns to a position requiring a background study following an absence of 120 or more consecutive days; or (2) a program that discontinued providing licensed direct contact services for 120 or more consecutive days begins to provide direct contact licensed services again. The license holder shall maintain a copy of the notification provided to the commissioner under this paragraph in the program's files. If the individual's disqualification was previously set aside for the license holder's program and the new background study results in no new information that indicates the individual may pose a risk of harm to persons receiving services from the license holder, the previous set-aside shall remain in effect. deleted text begin (j)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end For purposes of this section, a physician licensed under chapter 147, advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 148, or physician assistant licensed under chapter 147A is considered to be continuously affiliated upon the license holder's receipt from the commissioner of health or human services of the physician's, advanced practice registered nurse's, or physician assistant's background study results. deleted text begin (k)deleted text end new text begin (j)new text end For purposes of family child care, a substitute caregiver must receive repeat background studies at the time of each license renewal. deleted text begin (l)deleted text end new text begin (k)new text end A repeat background study at the time of license renewal is not required if the family child care substitute caregiver's background study was completed by the commissioner on or after October 1, 2017, and the substitute caregiver is on the license holder's active roster in NETStudy 2.0. deleted text begin (m)deleted text end new text begin (l)new text end Before and after school programs authorized under chapter 142E, are exempt from the background study requirements under section 123B.03, for an employee for whom a background study under this chapter has been completed. Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245C.07, is amended to read: 245C.07 STUDY SUBJECT AFFILIATED WITH MULTIPLE FACILITIES. (a) Subject to the conditions in paragraph (d), when a license holder, applicant, or other entity owns multiple programs or services that are licensed by the Department of Human Services; Department of Children, Youth, and Families; Department of Health; or Department of Corrections, only one background study is required for an individual who provides direct contact services in one or more of the licensed programs or services if: (1) the license holder designates one individual with one address and telephone number as the person to receive sensitive background study information for the multiple licensed programs or services that depend on the same background study; and (2) the individual designated to receive the sensitive background study information is capable of determining, upon request of the department, whether a background study subject is providing direct contact services in one or more of the license holder's programs or services and, if so, at which location or locations. (b) When a license holder maintains background study compliance for multiple licensed programs according to paragraph (a), and one or more of the licensed programs closes, the license holder shall immediately notify the commissioner which staff must be transferred to an active license so that the background studies can be electronically paired with the license holder's active program. (c) When a background study is being initiated by a licensed program or service or a foster care provider that is also licensed under chapter 144G, a study subject affiliated with multiple licensed programs or services may attach to the background study form a cover letter indicating the additional names of the programs or services, addresses, and background study identification numbers. When the commissioner receives a notice, the commissioner shall notify each program or service identified by the background study subject of the study results. The background study notice the commissioner sends to the subsequent agencies shall satisfy those programs' or services' responsibilities for initiating a background study on that individual. (d) deleted text begin If a background study was conducted on an individual related to child foster care and the requirements under paragraph (a) are met, the background study is transferable across all licensed programs.deleted text end If a background study was conducted on an individual under a license other than child foster care and the requirements under paragraph (a) are met, the background study is transferable to all licensed programs except child foster care. (e) The provisions of this section that allow a single background study in one or more licensed programs or services do not apply to background studies submitted by adoption agencies, supplemental nursing services agencies, personnel pool agencies, educational programs, professional services agencies, temporary personnel agencies, and unlicensed personal care provider organizations. (f) For an entity operating under NETStudy 2.0, the entity's active roster must be the system used to document when a background study subject is affiliated with multiple entities. For a background study to be transferable: (1) the background study subject must be on and moving to a roster for which the person designated to receive sensitive background study information is the same; and (2) the same entity must own or legally control both the roster from which the transfer is occurring and the roster to which the transfer is occurring. For an entity that holds or controls multiple licenses, or unlicensed personal care provider organizations, there must be a common highest level entity that has a legally identifiable structure that can be verified through records available from the secretary of state. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245C.13, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Activities pending completion of background study. The subject of a background study may not perform any activity requiring a background study under paragraph (c) until the commissioner has issued one of the notices under paragraph (a). (a) Notices from the commissioner required prior to activity under paragraph (c) include: (1) a notice of the study results under section 245C.17 stating that: (i) the individual is not disqualified; or (ii) more time is needed to complete the study but the individual is not required to be removed from direct contact or access to people receiving services prior to completion of the study as provided under section 245C.17, subdivision 1, paragraph (b) or (c). The notice that more time is needed to complete the study must also indicate whether the individual is required to be under continuous direct supervision prior to completion of the background study. When more time is necessary to complete a background study of an individual affiliated with a Title IV-E eligible children's residential facility or foster residence setting, the individual may not work in the facility or setting regardless of whether or not the individual is supervised; (2) a notice that a disqualification has been set aside under section 245C.23; or (3) a notice that a variance has been granted related to the individual under section 245C.30. (b) For a new text begin child care new text end background study deleted text begin affiliated with a licensed child care center or certified license-exempt child care centerdeleted text end new text begin subject required to submit fingerprints for a national criminal history check, except as provided in section 245C.05, subdivision 5anew text end , the notice sent under paragraph (a), clause (1), item (ii), must not be issued until the commissioner receives a qualifying result for the individual for the fingerprint-based national criminal history record check or the fingerprint-based criminal history information from the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension. The notice must require the individual to be under continuous direct supervision prior to completion of the remainder of the background study except as permitted in subdivision 3. (c) Activities prohibited prior to receipt of notice under paragraph (a) include: (1) being issued a license; (2) living in the household where the licensed program will be provided; (3) providing direct contact services to persons served by a program unless the subject is under continuous direct supervision; (4) having access to persons receiving services if the background study was completed under section 144.057, subdivision 1, or 245C.03, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2), (5), or (6), unless the subject is under continuous direct supervision; (5) for deleted text begin licensed child care centers and certified license-exempt child care centersdeleted text end new text begin a child care background study subjectnew text end , deleted text begin providing direct contact services to persons served by the programdeleted text end new text begin performing any act listed in section 245C.02, subdivision 6a, unless the study is being renewed under section 245C.04, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), and it has been less than five years since the child care background study subject was previously disqualified or provided notice under paragraph (a), clause (1), item (i)new text end ; (6) for children's residential facilities or foster residence settings, working in the facility or setting; (7) for background studies affiliated with a personal care provider organization, except as provided in section 245C.03, subdivision 3b, before a personal care assistant provides services, the personal care assistance provider agency must initiate a background study of the personal care assistant under this chapter and the personal care assistance provider agency must have received a notice from the commissioner that the personal care assistant is: (i) not disqualified under section 245C.14; or (ii) disqualified, but the personal care assistant has received a set aside of the disqualification under section 245C.22; or (8) for background studies affiliated with an early intensive developmental and behavioral intervention provider, before an individual provides services, the early intensive developmental and behavioral intervention provider must initiate a background study for the individual under this chapter and the early intensive developmental and behavioral intervention provider must have received a notice from the commissioner that the individual is: (i) not disqualified under section 245C.14; or (ii) disqualified, but the individual has received a set-aside of the disqualification under section 245C.22. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245C.15, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. 15-year disqualification. (a) An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if: (1) less than 15 years have passed since the discharge of the sentence imposed, if any, for the offense; and (2) the individual has committed a felony-level violation of any of the following offenses: sections 152.021, subdivision 1 or 2b, (aggravated controlled substance crime in the first degree; sale crimes); 152.022, subdivision 1 (controlled substance crime in the second degree; sale crimes); 152.023, subdivision 1 (controlled substance crime in the third degree; sale crimes); 152.024, subdivision 1 (controlled substance crime in the fourth degree; sale crimes); 256.98 (wrongfully obtaining assistance); 268.182 (fraud); 393.07, subdivision 10, paragraph (c) (federal SNAP fraud); 518B.01, subdivision 14 (violation of an order for protection); 609.165 (felon ineligible to possess firearm); 609.2112, 609.2113, or 609.2114 (criminal vehicular homicide or injury); 609.215 (suicide); 609.223 or 609.2231 (assault in the third or fourth degree); repeat offenses under 609.224 (assault in the fifth degree); 609.229 (crimes committed for benefit of a gang); 609.2325 (criminal abuse of a vulnerable adult); new text begin 609.2334 (violation of an order for protection against financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult); new text end 609.2335 (financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult); 609.235 (use of drugs to injure or facilitate crime); 609.24 (simple robbery); 609.247, subdivision 4 (carjacking in the third degree); 609.255 (false imprisonment); 609.2664 (manslaughter of an unborn child in the first degree); 609.2665 (manslaughter of an unborn child in the second degree); 609.267 (assault of an unborn child in the first degree); 609.2671 (assault of an unborn child in the second degree); 609.268 (injury or death of an unborn child in the commission of a crime); 609.27 (coercion); 609.275 (attempt to coerce); 609.466 (medical assistance fraud); 609.495 (aiding an offender); 609.498, subdivision 1 or 1b (aggravated first-degree or first-degree tampering with a witness); 609.52 (theft); 609.521 (possession of shoplifting gear); 609.522 (organized retail theft); 609.525 (bringing stolen goods into Minnesota); 609.527 (identity theft); 609.53 (receiving stolen property); 609.535 (issuance of dishonored checks); new text begin 609.542 (illegal remunerations); new text end 609.562 (arson in the second degree); 609.563 (arson in the third degree); 609.582 (burglary); 609.59 (possession of burglary tools); 609.611 (insurance fraud); 609.625 (aggravated forgery); 609.63 (forgery); 609.631 (check forgery; offering a forged check); 609.635 (obtaining signature by false pretense); 609.66 (dangerous weapons); 609.67 (machine guns and short-barreled shotguns); 609.687 (adulteration); 609.71 (riot); 609.713 (terroristic threats); 609.746 (interference with privacy); 609.82 (fraud in obtaining credit); 609.821 (financial transaction card fraud); 617.23 (indecent exposure), not involving a minor; repeat offenses under 617.241 (obscene materials and performances; distribution and exhibition prohibited; penalty); or 624.713 (certain persons not to possess firearms). (b) An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if less than 15 years has passed since the individual's aiding and abetting, attempt, or conspiracy to commit any of the offenses listed in paragraph (a), as each of these offenses is defined in Minnesota Statutes. (c) An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if less than 15 years has passed since the termination of the individual's parental rights under section 260C.301, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), or subdivision 3. (d) An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if less than 15 years has passed since the discharge of the sentence imposed for an offense in any other state or country, the elements of which are substantially similar to the elements of the offenses listed in paragraph (a) or since the termination of parental rights in any other state or country, the elements of which are substantially similar to the elements listed in paragraph (c). (e) If the individual studied commits one of the offenses listed in paragraph (a), but the sentence or level of offense is a gross misdemeanor or misdemeanor, the individual is disqualified but the disqualification look-back period for the offense is the period applicable to the gross misdemeanor or misdemeanor disposition. (f) When a disqualification is based on a judicial determination other than a conviction, the disqualification period begins from the date of the court order. When a disqualification is based on an admission, the disqualification period begins from the date of an admission in court. When a disqualification is based on an Alford Plea, the disqualification period begins from the date the Alford Plea is entered in court. When a disqualification is based on a preponderance of evidence of a disqualifying act, the disqualification date begins from the date of the dismissal, the date of discharge of the sentence imposed for a conviction for a disqualifying crime of similar elements, or the date of the incident, whichever occurs last. Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245C.15, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Ten-year disqualification. (a) An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if: (1) less than ten years have passed since the discharge of the sentence imposed, if any, for the offense; and (2) the individual has committed a gross misdemeanor-level violation of any of the following offenses: sections 256.98 (wrongfully obtaining assistance); 260B.425 (criminal jurisdiction for contributing to status as a juvenile petty offender or delinquency); 260C.425 (criminal jurisdiction for contributing to need for protection or services); 268.182 (fraud); 393.07, subdivision 10, paragraph (c) (federal SNAP fraud); 609.2112, 609.2113, or 609.2114 (criminal vehicular homicide or injury); 609.221 or 609.222 (assault in the first or second degree); 609.223 or 609.2231 (assault in the third or fourth degree); 609.224 (assault in the fifth degree); 609.224, subdivision 2, paragraph (c) (assault in the fifth degree by a caregiver against a vulnerable adult); 609.2242 and 609.2243 (domestic assault); 609.23 (mistreatment of persons confined); 609.231 (mistreatment of residents or patients); 609.2325 (criminal abuse of a vulnerable adult); 609.233 (criminal neglect of a vulnerable adult); new text begin 609.2334 (violation of an order for protection against financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult); new text end 609.2335 (financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult); 609.234 (failure to report maltreatment of a vulnerable adult); 609.265 (abduction); 609.275 (attempt to coerce); 609.324, subdivision 1a (other prohibited acts; minor engaged in prostitution); 609.33 (disorderly house); 609.377 (malicious punishment of a child); 609.378 (neglect or endangerment of a child); 609.466 (medical assistance fraud); 609.52 (theft); 609.522 (organized retail theft); 609.525 (bringing stolen goods into Minnesota); 609.527 (identity theft); 609.53 (receiving stolen property); 609.535 (issuance of dishonored checks); 609.582 (burglary); 609.59 (possession of burglary tools); 609.611 (insurance fraud); 609.631 (check forgery; offering a forged check); 609.66 (dangerous weapons); 609.71 (riot); 609.72, subdivision 3 (disorderly conduct against a vulnerable adult); new text begin 609.746 (interference with privacy); new text end 609.749, subdivision 2 (harassment); 609.82 (fraud in obtaining credit); 609.821 (financial transaction card fraud); 617.23 (indecent exposure), not involving a minor; 617.241 (obscene materials and performances); 617.243 (indecent literature, distribution); 617.293 (harmful materials; dissemination and display to minors prohibited); or Minnesota Statutes 2012, section 609.21; or violation of an order for protection under section 518B.01, subdivision 14. (b) An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if less than ten years has passed since the individual's aiding and abetting, attempt, or conspiracy to commit any of the offenses listed in paragraph (a), as each of these offenses is defined in Minnesota Statutes. (c) An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if less than ten years has passed since the discharge of the sentence imposed for an offense in any other state or country, the elements of which are substantially similar to the elements of any of the offenses listed in paragraph (a). (d) If the individual studied commits one of the offenses listed in paragraph (a), but the sentence or level of offense is a misdemeanor disposition, the individual is disqualified but the disqualification lookback period for the offense is the period applicable to misdemeanors. (e) When a disqualification is based on a judicial determination other than a conviction, the disqualification period begins from the date of the court order. When a disqualification is based on an admission, the disqualification period begins from the date of an admission in court. When a disqualification is based on an Alford Plea, the disqualification period begins from the date the Alford Plea is entered in court. When a disqualification is based on a preponderance of evidence of a disqualifying act, the disqualification date begins from the date of the dismissal, the date of discharge of the sentence imposed for a conviction for a disqualifying crime of similar elements, or the date of the incident, whichever occurs last. Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245C.15, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Seven-year disqualification. (a) An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if: (1) less than seven years has passed since the discharge of the sentence imposed, if any, for the offense; and (2) the individual has committed a misdemeanor-level violation of any of the following offenses: sections 256.98 (wrongfully obtaining assistance); 260B.425 (criminal jurisdiction for contributing to status as a juvenile petty offender or delinquency); 260C.425 (criminal jurisdiction for contributing to need for protection or services); 268.182 (fraud); 393.07, subdivision 10, paragraph (c) (federal SNAP fraud); 609.2112, 609.2113, or 609.2114 (criminal vehicular homicide or injury); 609.221 (assault in the first degree); 609.222 (assault in the second degree); 609.223 (assault in the third degree); 609.2231 (assault in the fourth degree); 609.224 (assault in the fifth degree); 609.2242 (domestic assault); new text begin 609.2334 (violation of an order for protection against financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult); new text end 609.2335 (financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult); 609.234 (failure to report maltreatment of a vulnerable adult); 609.2672 (assault of an unborn child in the third degree); 609.27 (coercion); violation of an order for protection under 609.3232 (protective order authorized; procedures; penalties); 609.466 (medical assistance fraud); 609.52 (theft); 609.522 (organized retail theft); 609.525 (bringing stolen goods into Minnesota); 609.527 (identity theft); 609.53 (receiving stolen property); 609.535 (issuance of dishonored checks); 609.611 (insurance fraud); 609.66 (dangerous weapons); 609.665 (spring guns); 609.746 (interference with privacy); 609.79 (obscene or harassing telephone calls); 609.795 (letter, telegram, or package; opening; harassment); 609.82 (fraud in obtaining credit); 609.821 (financial transaction card fraud); 617.23 (indecent exposure), not involving a minor; 617.293 (harmful materials; dissemination and display to minors prohibited); or Minnesota Statutes 2012, section 609.21; or violation of an order for protection under section 518B.01 (Domestic Abuse Act). (b) An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if less than seven years has passed since a determination or disposition of the individual's: (1) failure to make required reports under section 260E.06 or 626.557, subdivision 3, for incidents in which: (i) the final disposition under section 626.557 or chapter 260E was substantiated maltreatment, and (ii) the maltreatment was recurring or serious; or (2) substantiated serious or recurring maltreatment of a minor under chapter 260E, a vulnerable adult under section 626.557, or serious or recurring maltreatment in any other state, the elements of which are substantially similar to the elements of maltreatment under section 626.557 or chapter 260E for which: (i) there is a preponderance of evidence that the maltreatment occurred, and (ii) the subject was responsible for the maltreatment. (c) An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if less than seven years has passed since the individual's aiding and abetting, attempt, or conspiracy to commit any of the offenses listed in paragraphs (a) and (b), as each of these offenses is defined in Minnesota Statutes. (d) An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if less than seven years has passed since the discharge of the sentence imposed for an offense in any other state or country, the elements of which are substantially similar to the elements of any of the offenses listed in paragraphs (a) and (b). (e) When a disqualification is based on a judicial determination other than a conviction, the disqualification period begins from the date of the court order. When a disqualification is based on an admission, the disqualification period begins from the date of an admission in court. When a disqualification is based on an Alford Plea, the disqualification period begins from the date the Alford Plea is entered in court. When a disqualification is based on a preponderance of evidence of a disqualifying act, the disqualification date begins from the date of the dismissal, the date of discharge of the sentence imposed for a conviction for a disqualifying crime of similar elements, or the date of the incident, whichever occurs last. (f) An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if less than seven years has passed since the individual was disqualified under section 256.98, subdivision 8. Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245C.15, subdivision 4a, is amended to read: Subd. 4a. Licensed family foster setting disqualifications. (a) Notwithstanding subdivisions 1 to 4new text begin , 4b, and 4cnew text end , for a background study affiliated with a licensed family foster setting, regardless of how much time has passed, an individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if the individual committed an act that resulted in a felony-level conviction for sections: 609.185 (murder in the first degree); 609.19 (murder in the second degree); 609.195 (murder in the third degree); 609.20 (manslaughter in the first degree); 609.205 (manslaughter in the second degree); 609.2112 (criminal vehicular homicide); 609.221 (assault in the first degree); 609.223, subdivision 2 (assault in the third degree, past pattern of child abuse); 609.223, subdivision 3 (assault in the third degree, victim under four); a felony offense under sections 609.2242 and 609.2243 (domestic assault, spousal abuse, child abuse or neglect, or a crime against children); 609.2247 (domestic assault by strangulation); 609.2325 (criminal abuse of a vulnerable adult resulting in the death of a vulnerable adult); 609.245 (aggravated robbery); 609.247, subdivision 2 or 3 (carjacking in the first or second degree); 609.25 (kidnapping); 609.255 (false imprisonment); 609.2661 (murder of an unborn child in the first degree); 609.2662 (murder of an unborn child in the second degree); 609.2663 (murder of an unborn child in the third degree); 609.2664 (manslaughter of an unborn child in the first degree); 609.2665 (manslaughter of an unborn child in the second degree); 609.267 (assault of an unborn child in the first degree); 609.2671 (assault of an unborn child in the second degree); 609.268 (injury or death of an unborn child in the commission of a crime); 609.322, subdivision 1 (solicitation, inducement, and promotion of prostitution; sex trafficking in the first degree); 609.324, subdivision 1 (other prohibited acts; engaging in, hiring, or agreeing to hire minor to engage in prostitution); 609.342 (criminal sexual conduct in the first degree); 609.343 (criminal sexual conduct in the second degree); 609.344 (criminal sexual conduct in the third degree); 609.345 (criminal sexual conduct in the fourth degree); 609.3451 (criminal sexual conduct in the fifth degree); 609.3453 (criminal sexual predatory conduct); 609.3458 (sexual extortion); 609.352 (solicitation of children to engage in sexual conduct); 609.377 (malicious punishment of a child); 609.3775 (child torture); 609.378 (neglect or endangerment of a child); 609.561 (arson in the first degree); 609.582, subdivision 1 (burglary in the first degree); 609.746 (interference with privacy); 617.23 (indecent exposure); 617.246 (use of minors in sexual performance prohibited); or 617.247 (possession of child sexual abuse material). (b) Notwithstanding subdivisions 1 to 4new text begin , 4b, and 4cnew text end , for the purposes of a background study affiliated with a licensed family foster setting, an individual is disqualified under section 245C.14, regardless of how much time has passed, if the individual: (1) committed an action under paragraph (e) that resulted in death or involved sexual abuse, as defined in section 260E.03, subdivision 20; (2) committed an act that resulted in a gross misdemeanor-level conviction for section 609.3451 (criminal sexual conduct in the fifth degree); (3) committed an act against or involving a minor that resulted in a felony-level conviction for: section 609.222 (assault in the second degree); 609.223, subdivision 1 (assault in the third degree); 609.2231 (assault in the fourth degree); or 609.224 (assault in the fifth degree); or (4) committed an act that resulted in a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor-level conviction for section 617.293 (dissemination and display of harmful materials to minors). (c) Notwithstanding subdivisions 1 to 4new text begin , 4b, and 4cnew text end , for a background study affiliated with a licensed family foster setting, an individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if fewer than 20 years have passed since the termination of the individual's parental rights under section 260C.301, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), or if the individual consented to a termination of parental rights under section 260C.301, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), to settle a petition to involuntarily terminate parental rights. An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if fewer than 20 years have passed since the termination of the individual's parental rights in any other state or country, where the conditions for the individual's termination of parental rights are substantially similar to the conditions in section 260C.301, subdivision 1, paragraph (b). (d) Notwithstanding subdivisions 1 to 4new text begin , 4b, and 4cnew text end , for a background study affiliated with a licensed family foster setting, an individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if fewer than five years have passed since a felony-level violation for sections: 152.021 (controlled substance crime in the first degree); 152.022 (controlled substance crime in the second degree); 152.023 (controlled substance crime in the third degree); 152.024 (controlled substance crime in the fourth degree); 152.025 (controlled substance crime in the fifth degree); 152.0261 (importing controlled substances across state borders); 152.0262, subdivision 1, paragraph (b) (possession of substance with intent to manufacture methamphetamine); 152.027, subdivision 6, paragraph (c) (sale or possession of synthetic cannabinoids); 152.096 (conspiracies prohibited); 152.097 (simulated controlled substances); 152.136 (anhydrous ammonia; prohibited conduct; criminal penalties; civil liabilities); 152.137 (fentanyl- and methamphetamine-related crimes involving children or vulnerable adults); 169A.24 (felony first-degree driving while impaired); 243.166 (violation of predatory offender registration requirements); 609.2113 (criminal vehicular operation; bodily harm); 609.2114 (criminal vehicular operation; unborn child); 609.228 (great bodily harm caused by distribution of drugs); 609.2325 (criminal abuse of a vulnerable adult not resulting in the death of a vulnerable adult); 609.233 (criminal neglect); 609.235 (use of drugs to injure or facilitate a crime); 609.24 (simple robbery); 609.247, subdivision 4 (carjacking in the third degree); 609.322, subdivision 1a (solicitation, inducement, and promotion of prostitution; sex trafficking in the second degree); 609.498, subdivision 1 (tampering with a witness in the first degree); 609.498, subdivision 1b (aggravated first-degree witness tampering); 609.562 (arson in the second degree); 609.563 (arson in the third degree); 609.582, subdivision 2 (burglary in the second degree); 609.66 (felony dangerous weapons); 609.687 (adulteration); 609.713 (terroristic threats); 609.749, subdivision 3, 4, or 5 (felony-level harassment or stalking); 609.855, subdivision 5 (shooting at or in a public transit vehicle or facility); or 624.713 (certain people not to possess firearms). (e) Notwithstanding subdivisions 1 to 4new text begin , 4b, and 4cnew text end , except as provided in paragraph (a), for a background study affiliated with a licensed family child foster care license, an individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if fewer than five years have passed since: (1) a felony-level violation for an act not against or involving a minor that constitutes: section 609.222 (assault in the second degree); 609.223, subdivision 1 (assault in the third degree); 609.2231 (assault in the fourth degree); or 609.224, subdivision 4 (assault in the fifth degree); (2) a violation of an order for protection under section 518B.01, subdivision 14; (3) a determination or disposition of the individual's failure to make required reports under section 260E.06 or 626.557, subdivision 3, for incidents in which the final disposition under chapter 260E or section 626.557 was substantiated maltreatment and the maltreatment was recurring or serious; (4) a determination or disposition of the individual's substantiated serious or recurring maltreatment of a minor under chapter 260E, a vulnerable adult under section 626.557, or serious or recurring maltreatment in any other state, the elements of which are substantially similar to the elements of maltreatment under chapter 260E or section 626.557 and meet the definition of serious maltreatment or recurring maltreatment; (5) a gross misdemeanor-level violation for sections: 609.224, subdivision 2 (assault in the fifth degree); 609.2242 and 609.2243 (domestic assault); 609.233 (criminal neglect); 609.377 (malicious punishment of a child); 609.378 (neglect or endangerment of a child); 609.746 (interference with privacy); 609.749 (stalking); or 617.23 (indecent exposure); or (6) committing an act against or involving a minor that resulted in a misdemeanor-level violation of section 609.224, subdivision 1 (assault in the fifth degree). (f) For purposes of this subdivision, the disqualification begins from: (1) the date of the alleged violation, if the individual was not convicted; (2) the date of conviction, if the individual was convicted of the violation but not committed to the custody of the commissioner of corrections; or (3) the date of release from prison, if the individual was convicted of the violation and committed to the custody of the commissioner of corrections. Notwithstanding clause (3), if the individual is subsequently reincarcerated for a violation of the individual's supervised release, the disqualification begins from the date of release from the subsequent incarceration. (g) An individual's aiding and abetting, attempt, or conspiracy to commit any of the offenses listed in paragraphs (a) and (b), as each of these offenses is defined in Minnesota Statutes, permanently disqualifies the individual under section 245C.14. An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if fewer than five years have passed since the individual's aiding and abetting, attempt, or conspiracy to commit any of the offenses listed in paragraphs (d) and (e). (h) An individual's offense in any other state or country, where the elements of the offense are substantially similar to any of the offenses listed in paragraphs (a) and (b), permanently disqualifies the individual under section 245C.14. An individual is disqualified under section 245C.14 if fewer than five years have passed since an offense in any other state or country, the elements of which are substantially similar to the elements of any offense listed in paragraphs (d) and (e). Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245C.22, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Scope of set-aside. (a) If the commissioner sets aside a disqualification under this section, the disqualified individual remains disqualified, but may hold a license and have direct contact with or access to persons receiving services. Except as provided in paragraph (b), the commissioner's set-aside of a disqualification is limited solely to the licensed program, applicant, or agency specified in the set aside notice under section 245C.23. For personal care provider organizations, financial management services organizations, community first services and supports organizations, unlicensed home and community-based organizations, and consumer-directed community supports organizations, the commissioner's set-aside may further be limited to a specific individual who is receiving services. For new background studies required under section 245C.04, subdivision 1, paragraph deleted text begin (h)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end , if an individual's disqualification was previously set aside for the license holder's program and the new background study results in no new information that indicates the individual may pose a risk of harm to persons receiving services from the license holder, the previous set-aside shall remain in effect. (b) If the commissioner has previously set aside an individual's disqualification for one or more programs or agencies, and the individual is the subject of a subsequent background study for a different program or agency, the commissioner shall determine whether the disqualification is set aside for the program or agency that initiated the subsequent background study. A notice of a set-aside under paragraph (c) shall be issued within 15 working days if all of the following criteria are met: (1) the subsequent background study was initiated in connection with a program licensed or regulated under the same provisions of law and rule for at least one program for which the individual's disqualification was previously set aside by the commissioner; (2) the individual is not disqualified for an offense specified in section 245C.15, subdivision 1 or 2; (3) the commissioner has received no new information to indicate that the individual may pose a risk of harm to any person served by the program; and (4) the previous set-aside was not limited to a specific person receiving services. (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b), clause (2), for an individual who is employed in the substance use disorder field, if the commissioner has previously set aside an individual's disqualification for one or more programs or agencies in the substance use disorder treatment field, and the individual is the subject of a subsequent background study for a different program or agency in the substance use disorder treatment field, the commissioner shall set aside the disqualification for the program or agency in the substance use disorder treatment field that initiated the subsequent background study when the criteria under paragraph (b), clauses (1), (3), and (4), are met and the individual is not disqualified for an offense specified in section 245C.15, subdivision 1. A notice of a set-aside under paragraph (d) shall be issued within 15 working days. (d) When a disqualification is set aside under paragraph (b), the notice of background study results issued under section 245C.17, in addition to the requirements under section 245C.17, shall state that the disqualification is set aside for the program or agency that initiated the subsequent background study. The notice must inform the individual that the individual may request reconsideration of the disqualification under section 245C.21 on the basis that the information used to disqualify the individual is incorrect. Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245C.24, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Permanent bar to set aside a disqualification. (a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) to deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end , the commissioner may not set aside the disqualification of any individual disqualified pursuant to this chapter, regardless of how much time has passed, if the individual was disqualified for a crime or conduct listed in section 245C.15, subdivision 1. (b) For an individual in the substance use disorder or corrections field who was disqualified for a crime or conduct listed under section 245C.15, subdivision 1, and whose disqualification was set aside prior to July 1, 2005, the commissioner must consider granting a variance pursuant to section 245C.30 for the license holder for a program dealing primarily with adults. A request for reconsideration evaluated under this paragraph must include a letter of recommendation from the license holder that was subject to the prior set-aside decision addressing the individual's quality of care to children or vulnerable adults and the circumstances of the individual's departure from that service. (c) If an individual who requires a background study for nonemergency medical transportation services under section 245C.03, subdivision 12, was disqualified for a crime or conduct listed under section 245C.15, subdivision 1, and if more than 40 years have passed since the discharge of the sentence imposed, the commissioner may consider granting a set-aside pursuant to section 245C.22. A request for reconsideration evaluated under this paragraph must include a letter of recommendation from the employer. This paragraph does not apply to a person disqualified based on a violation of sections 243.166; 609.185 to 609.205; 609.25; 609.342 to 609.3453; 609.352; 617.23, subdivision 2, clause (1), or 3, clause (1); 617.246; or 617.247. (d) When a licensed foster care provider adopts an individual who had received foster care services from the provider for over six months, and the adopted individual is required to receive a background study under section 245C.03, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clause (2) or (6), the commissioner may grant a variance to the license holder under section 245C.30 to permit the adopted individual with a permanent disqualification to remain affiliated with the license holder under the conditions of the variance when the variance is recommended by the county of responsibility for each of the remaining individuals in placement in the home and the licensing agency for the home. (e) For an individual 18 years of age or older affiliated with a licensed family foster setting, the commissioner must not set aside or grant a variance for the disqualification of any individual disqualified pursuant to this chapter, regardless of how much time has passed, if the individual was disqualified for a crime or conduct listed in section 245C.15, subdivision 4a, paragraphs (a) and (b). (f) In connection with a family foster setting license, the commissioner may grant a variance to the disqualification for an individual who is under 18 years of age at the time the background study is submitted. deleted text begin (g) In connection with foster residence settings and children's residential facilities, the commissioner must not set aside or grant a variance for the disqualification of any individual disqualified pursuant to this chapter, regardless of how much time has passed, if the individual was disqualified for a crime or conduct listed in section 245C.15, subdivision 4a, paragraph (a) or (b). deleted text end Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245D.04, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Protection-related rights. (a) A person's protection-related rights include the right to: (1) have personal, financial, service, health, and medical information kept private, and be advised of disclosure of this information by the license holder; (2) access records and recorded information about the person in accordance with applicable state and federal law, regulation, or rule; (3) be free from maltreatment; (4) be free from restraint, time out, seclusion, restrictive intervention, or other prohibited procedure identified in section 245D.06, subdivision 5, or successor provisions, except for: (i) emergency use of manual restraint to protect the person from imminent danger to self or others according to the requirements in section 245D.061 or successor provisions; or (ii) the use of safety interventions as part of a positive support transition plan under section 245D.06, subdivision 8, or successor provisions; (5) receive services in a clean and safe environment when the license holder is the owner, lessor, or tenant of the service site; (6) be treated with courtesy and respect and receive respectful treatment of the person's property; (7) reasonable observance of cultural and ethnic practice and religion; (8) be free from bias and harassment regarding race, gender, age, disability, spirituality, and sexual orientation; (9) be informed of and use the license holder's grievance policy and procedures, including knowing how to contact persons responsible for addressing problems and to appeal under section 256.045; (10) know the name, telephone number, and the website, email, and street addresses of protection and advocacy services, including the appropriate state-appointed ombudsman, and a brief description of how to file a complaint with these offices; (11) assert these rights personally, or have them asserted by the person's family, authorized representative, or legal representative, without retaliation; (12) give or withhold written informed consent to participate in any research or experimental treatment; (13) associate with other persons of the person's choice in the community; (14) personal privacy, including the right to use the lock on the person's bedroom or unit door; (15) engage in chosen activities; and (16) access to the person's personal possessions at any time, including financial resources. (b) For a person residing in a residential site licensed according to chapter 245A, or where the license holder is the owner, lessor, or tenant of the residential service site, protection-related rights also include the right to: (1) have daily, private access to and use of a non-coin-operated telephone for local calls and long-distance calls made collect or paid for by the person; (2) receive and send, without interference, uncensored, unopened mail or electronic correspondence or communication; (3) have use of and free access to common areas in the residence and the freedom to come and go from the residence at will; (4) choose the person's visitors and time of visits and have privacy for visits with the person's spouse, next of kin, legal counsel, religious adviser, or others, in accordance with section 363A.09 of the Human Rights Act, including privacy in the person's bedroom; (5) have access to three nutritionally balanced meals and nutritious snacks between meals each day; (6) have freedom and support to access food and potable water at any time; (7) have the freedom to furnish and decorate the person's bedroom or living unit; (8) a setting that is clean and free from accumulation of dirt, grease, garbage, peeling paint, mold, vermin, and insects; (9) a setting that is free from hazards that threaten the person's health or safety; and (10) a setting that meets the definition of a dwelling unit within a residential occupancy as defined in the State Fire Code. (c) Restriction of a person's rights under paragraph (a), clauses (13) to (16), or paragraph (b)new text begin , clauses (1) to (7),new text end is allowed only if determined necessary to ensure the health, safety, and well-being of the person. Any restriction of those rights must be documented in the person's support plan or support plan addendum. The restriction must be implemented in the least restrictive alternative manner necessary to protect the person and provide support to reduce or eliminate the need for the restriction in the most integrated setting and inclusive manner. The documentation must include the following information: (1) the justification for the restriction based on an assessment of the person's vulnerability related to exercising the right without restriction; (2) the objective measures set as conditions for ending the restriction; (3) a schedule for reviewing the need for the restriction based on the conditions for ending the restriction to occur semiannually from the date of initial approval, at a minimum, or more frequently if requested by the person, the person's legal representative, if any, and case manager; and (4) signed and dated approval for the restriction from the person, or the person's legal representative, if any. A restriction may be implemented only when the required approval has been obtained. Approval may be withdrawn at any time. If approval is withdrawn, the right must be immediately and fully restored. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245D.10, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Availability of current written policies and procedures. (a) The license holder must review and update, as needed, the written policies and procedures required under this chapter. (b)(1) The license holder must inform the person new text begin or the person's legal representative new text end and case manager of the policies and procedures affecting a person's rights under section 245D.04, and provide copies of those policies and procedures, within five working days of service initiation. (2) If a license holder only provides basic services and supports, this includes the: (i) grievance policy and procedure required under subdivision 2; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (ii) service suspension and termination policy and procedure required under subdivision 3deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (iii) emergency use of manual restraints policy and procedure required under section 245D.061, subdivision 9, or successor provisions. new text end (3) For all other license holders this includes the: (i) policies and procedures in clause (2);new text begin andnew text end deleted text begin (ii) emergency use of manual restraints policy and procedure required under section 245D.061, subdivision 9, or successor provisions; and deleted text end deleted text begin (iii)deleted text end new text begin (ii)new text end data privacy requirements under section 245D.11, subdivision 3. (c) The license holder must provide a written notice to all persons or their legal representatives and case managers at least 30 days before implementing any procedural revisions to policies affecting a person's service-related or protection-related rights under section 245D.04 and maltreatment reporting policies and procedures. The notice must explain the revision that was made and include a copy of the revised policy and procedure. The license holder must document the reasonable cause for not providing the notice at least 30 days before implementing the revisions. (d) Before implementing revisions to required policies and procedures, the license holder must inform all employees of the revisions and provide training on implementation of the revised policies and procedures. (e) The license holder must annually notify all persons, or their legal representatives, and case managers of any procedural revisions to policies required under this chapter, other than those in paragraph (c). Upon request, the license holder must provide the person, or the person's legal representative, and case manager with copies of the revised policies and procedures. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 26. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.02, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 20. new text end new text begin Fraud. new text end new text begin "Fraud" means an intentional deception or misrepresentation made by a person with the knowledge that the deception could result in an unauthorized benefit to the person or another person. Fraud includes: new text end new text begin (1) the following crimes, including attempts or conspiracy to commit the crimes: new text end new text begin (i) theft in violation of section 609.52; new text end new text begin (ii) perjury in violation of section 609.48; new text end new text begin (iii) aggravated forgery and forgery in violation of sections 609.625 and 609.63; new text end new text begin (iv) medical assistance fraud in violation of section 609.466; new text end new text begin (v) financial transaction card fraud in violation of section 609.821; new text end new text begin (vi) wrongfully obtaining assistance in violation of section 256.98; new text end new text begin (vii) illegal remunerations in violation of section 609.542; and new text end new text begin (viii) a felony listed in United States Code, title 42, section 1320a-7b(b)(1) or (2), subject to any safe harbors established in Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, part 1001, section 952; new text end new text begin (2) any act that constitutes fraud under applicable federal or state law, including but not limited to knowingly and willfully submitting an application for provider status that is false or fraudulent in whole or in part; and new text end new text begin (3) an intentional submission of a claim for reimbursement under chapter 256B, knowing or having reason to know the claim is ineligible for reimbursement in whole or in part and acting with the intent to defraud the payor. new text end Sec. 27. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.04, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Investigation of certain claims. new text begin The commissioner must new text end establish by rule general criteria and procedures for the identification and prompt investigation of suspected medical assistance fraud, theft, abuse, presentment of false or duplicate claims, presentment of claims for services not new text begin reasonable or new text end medically necessary, or false statement or representation of material facts by a vendor of medical caredeleted text begin , and for the imposition of sanctions against a vendor of medical caredeleted text end . new text begin The commissioner may utilize both prepayment and postpayment review systems to review claims submitted by vendors. Payment of claims, including payments made after a prepayment review, does not prohibit the commissioner from completing a postpayment claims review and taking additional administrative actions or monetary recovery against a vendor. new text end If it appears to the state agency that a vendor of medical care may have acted in a manner warranting civil or criminal proceedings, it shall so inform the attorney general in writing. Sec. 28. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.064, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Imposition of monetary recovery and sanctions. (a) The commissioner shall determine any monetary amounts to be recovered and sanctions to be imposed upon an individual or entity under this section. Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (d), neither a monetary recovery nor a sanction will be imposed by the commissioner without prior notice and an opportunity for a hearing, according to chapter 14, on the commissioner's proposed action, provided that the commissioner may suspend or reduce payment to an individual or entity, except a nursing home or convalescent care facility, after notice and prior to the hearing if in the commissioner's opinion that action is necessary to protect the public welfare and the interests of the program. (b) Except when the commissioner finds good cause not to suspend payments under Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, section 455.23(e) or (f), the commissioner shall withhold or reduce payments to an individual or entity without providing advance notice of such withholding or reduction if either of the following occurs: (1) the individual or entity is convicted of a crime involving the conduct described in subdivision 1a; or (2) the commissioner determines there is a credible allegation of fraud for which an investigation is pending under the program. Allegations are considered credible when they have an indicium of reliability and the state agency has reviewed all allegations, facts, and evidence carefully and acts judiciously on a case-by-case basis. A credible allegation of fraud is an allegation which has been verified by the state, from any source, including but not limited to: (i) fraud hotline complaints; (ii) claims data mining; and (iii) patterns identified through provider audits, civil false claims cases, and law enforcement investigations. (c) The commissioner must send notice of the withholding or reduction of payments under paragraph (b) within five days of taking such action unless requested in writing by a law enforcement agency to temporarily withhold the notice. The notice must: (1) state that payments are being withheld according to paragraph (b); (2) set forth the general allegations as to the nature of the withholding action, but need not disclose any specific information concerning an ongoing investigation; (3) except in the case of a conviction for conduct described in subdivision 1a, state that the withholding is for a temporary period and cite the circumstances under which withholding will be terminated; (4) identify the types of claims to which the withholding applies; and (5) inform the individual or entity of the right to submit written evidence for consideration by the commissioner. new text begin The withholding of payments under paragraph (b) is a temporary action and is not subject to a contested case for the purposes of chapter 14 nor subject to appeal under section 256.045. new text end (d) The withholding or reduction of payments will not continue after the commissioner determines there is insufficient evidence of fraud by the individual or entity, or after legal proceedings relating to the alleged fraud are completed, unless the commissioner has sent notice of intention to impose monetary recovery or sanctions under paragraph (a). Upon conviction for a crime related to the provision, management, or administration of a health service under medical assistance, a payment held pursuant to this section by the commissioner or a managed care organization that contracts with the commissioner under section 256B.035 is forfeited to the commissioner or managed care organization, regardless of the amount charged in the criminal complaint or the amount of criminal restitution ordered. (e) The commissioner shall suspend or terminate an individual's or entity's participation in the program without providing advance notice and an opportunity for a hearing when the suspension or termination is required because of the individual's or entity's exclusion from participation in Medicare. Within five days of taking such action, the commissioner must send notice of the suspension or termination. The notice must: (1) state that suspension or termination is the result of the individual's or entity's exclusion from Medicare; (2) identify the effective date of the suspension or termination; and (3) inform the individual or entity of the need to be reinstated to Medicare before reapplying for participation in the program. (f) Upon receipt of a notice under paragraph (a) that a monetary recovery or sanction is to be imposed, an individual or entity may request a contested case, as defined in section 14.02, subdivision 3, by filing with the commissioner a written request of appeal. The appeal request must be received by the commissioner no later than 30 days after the date the notification of monetary recovery or sanction was mailed to the individual or entity. The appeal request must specify: (1) each disputed item, the reason for the dispute, and an estimate of the dollar amount involved for each disputed item; (2) the computation that the individual or entity believes is correct; (3) the authority in statute or rule upon which the individual or entity relies for each disputed item; (4) the name and address of the person or entity with whom contacts may be made regarding the appeal; and (5) other information required by the commissioner. (g) The commissioner may order an individual or entity to forfeit a fine for failure to fully document services according to standards in this chapter and Minnesota Rules, chapter 9505. The commissioner may assess fines if specific required components of documentation are missing. The fine for incomplete documentation shall equal 20 percent of the amount paid on the claims for reimbursement submitted by the individual or entity, or up to $5,000, whichever is less. If the commissioner determines that an individual or entity repeatedly violated this chapter, chapter 254B or 245G, or Minnesota Rules, chapter 9505, related to the provision of services to program recipients and the submission of claims for payment, the commissioner may order an individual or entity to forfeit a fine based on the nature, severity, and chronicity of the violations, in an amount of up to $5,000 or 20 percent of the value of the claims, whichever is greater. (h) The individual or entity shall pay the fine assessed on or before the payment date specified. If the individual or entity fails to pay the fine, the commissioner may withhold or reduce payments and recover the amount of the fine. A timely appeal shall stay payment of the fine until the commissioner issues a final order. new text begin (i) Section 15.013 does not apply to the commissioner taking action under this section. new text end Sec. 29. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256B.27, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Access to medical records. The commissioner of human services, with the written consent of the recipient, on file with the local welfare agency, shall be allowed access in the manner and within the time prescribed by the commissioner to all personal medical records of medical assistance recipients solely for the purposes of investigating whether or not: (a) a vendor of medical care has submitted a claim for reimbursement, a cost report or a rate application which is duplicative, erroneous, or false in whole or in part, or which results in the vendor obtaining greater compensation than the vendor is legally entitled to; or (b) the medical care was medically necessary. deleted text begin When the commissioner is investigating a possible overpayment of Medicaid funds,deleted text end new text begin The commissioner may conduct on-site inspections of any and all vendors and service locations or may request records from a vendor to verify that information submitted to the commissioner is accurate, determine compliance with service delivery and billing requirements, and determine compliance with any other applicable laws or rules.new text end The commissioner must be given immediate access without prior notice to the vendor's office during regular business hours and to documentation and records related to services provided and submission of claims for services provided. The department shall document in writing the need for immediate access to records related to a specific investigation. Denying the commissioner access to records is cause for the vendor's immediate suspension of payment or termination according to section 256B.064. The determination of provision of services not medically necessary shall be made by the commissioner. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a vendor of medical care shall not be subject to any civil or criminal liability for providing access to medical records to the commissioner of human services pursuant to this section. Sec. 30. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 260E.03, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Facility. "Facility" means: (1) a licensed or unlicensed day care facility, certified license-exempt child care center, residential facility, agency, new text begin psychiatric residential treatment facility, new text end hospital, sanitarium, or other facility or institution required to be licensed under sections 144.50 to 144.58, 241.021, or 245A.01 to 245A.16, or chapter 142B, 142C, 144H, or 245D; (2) a school as defined in section 120A.05, subdivisions 9, 11, and 13; and chapter 124E; or (3) a nonlicensed personal care provider organization as defined in section 256B.0625, subdivision 19a. Sec. 31. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 260E.11, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Reports of maltreatment in facility. A person mandated to report child maltreatment occurring within a licensed facility shall report the information to the agency responsible for licensing or certifying the facility under sections 144.50 to 144.58, 241.021, and 245A.01 to 245A.16 or chapter 142B, 142C, 144H, or 245D or to a nonlicensed personal care provider organization as defined in section 256B.0625, subdivision 19a.new text begin A person mandated to report child maltreatment occurring within a federally certified psychiatric residential treatment facility must report the information to the Department of Health.new text end Sec. 32. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 260E.14, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Facilities and schools. (a) The local welfare agency is the agency responsible for investigating allegations of maltreatment in child foster care, family child care, legally nonlicensed child care, and reports involving children served by an unlicensed personal care provider organization under section 256B.0659. Copies of findings related to personal care provider organizations under section 256B.0659 must be forwarded to the Department of Human Services provider enrollment. (b) The Department of Human Services is the agency responsible for screening and investigating allegations of maltreatment in juvenile correctional facilities listed under section 241.021 located in the local welfare agency's county and in facilities licensed or certified under chapters 245A and 245Dnew text begin , except federally certified psychiatric residential treatment facilitiesnew text end . (c) The Department of Health is the agency responsible for screening and investigating allegations of maltreatment in facilities licensed under sections 144.50 to 144.58 and 144A.43 to 144A.482 deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end chapter 144Hnew text begin , or federally certified as a psychiatric residential treatment facilitynew text end . (d) The Department of Education is the agency responsible for screening and investigating allegations of maltreatment in a school as defined in section 120A.05, subdivisions 9, 11, and 13, and chapter 124E. The Department of Education's responsibility to screen and investigate includes allegations of maltreatment involving students 18 through 21 years of age, including students receiving special education services, up to and including graduation and the issuance of a secondary or high school diploma. (e) The Department of Human Services is the agency responsible for screening and investigating allegations of maltreatment of minors in an EIDBI agency operating under sections 245A.142 and 256B.0949. (f) A health or corrections agency receiving a report may request the local welfare agency to provide assistance pursuant to this section and sections 260E.20 and 260E.22. (g) The Department of Children, Youth, and Families is the agency responsible for screening and investigating allegations of maltreatment in facilities or programs not listed in paragraph (a) that are licensed or certified under chapters 142B and 142C. Sec. 33. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 626.5572, subdivision 13, is amended to read: Subd. 13. Lead investigative agency. "Lead investigative agency" is the primary administrative agency responsible for investigating reports made under section 626.557. (a) The Department of Health is the lead investigative agency for facilities or services licensed or required to be licensed as hospitals, home care providers, nursing homes, boarding care homes, hospice providers, residential facilities that are also federally certified as intermediate care facilities that serve people with developmental disabilities, new text begin federally certified psychiatric residential treatment facilities, new text end or any other facility or service not listed in this subdivision that is licensed or required to be licensed by the Department of Health for the care of vulnerable adults. "Home care provider" has the meaning provided in section 144A.43, subdivision 4, and applies when care or services are delivered in the vulnerable adult's home. (b) The Department of Human Services is the lead investigative agency for facilities or services licensed or required to be licensed as adult day care, adult foster care, community residential settings, programs for people with disabilities, EIDBI agencies, family adult day services, mental health programs, mental health clinics, substance use disorder programs, the Minnesota Sex Offender Program, or any other facility or service not listed in this subdivision that is licensed or required to be licensed by the Department of Human Servicesnew text begin , except federally certified psychiatric residential treatment facilitiesnew text end . The Department of Human Services is also the lead investigative agency for unlicensed EIDBI agencies under section 256B.0949. (c) The county social service agency or its designee is the lead investigative agency for all other reports, including but not limited to reports involving vulnerable adults receiving services from a personal care provider organization under section 256B.0659. Sec. 34. new text begin NEW BACKGROUND STUDIES FOR INDIVIDUALS NOT IN NETSTUDY 2.0.new text end new text begin By March 1, 2027, the commissioner of human services and counties must conduct new background studies for all individuals specified under Minnesota Statutes, section 245C.03, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clauses (2) to (6), and affiliated with a child foster family setting license holder, adult foster care or family adult day services and with a family child care license holder, or a legal nonlicensed child care provider authorized under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 142E. The commissioner or county must follow the requirements in Minnesota Statutes, section 245C.04, subdivision 1, paragraphs (e) and (f), when conducting the background studies under this section. The new background studies must be submitted through NETStudy 2.0. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective September 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 35. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin (a) new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 245A.02, subdivision 10b, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin (b) new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245A.10, subdivision 3a, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin (c) new text end new text begin Minnesota Rules, part 9505.2165, subpart 4, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-06085 245A.02 DEFINITIONS. Subd. 10b. Owner. "Owner" means an individual or organization that has a direct or indirect ownership interest of five percent or more in a program licensed under this chapter. For purposes of this subdivision, "direct ownership interest" means the possession of equity in capital, stock, or profits of an organization, and "indirect ownership interest" means a direct ownership interest in an entity that has a direct or indirect ownership interest in a licensed program. For purposes of this chapter, "owner of an employee stock ownership plan" means the president and treasurer of the entity. A government entity or nonprofit corporation that is issued a license under this chapter shall be designated the owner. 245A.10 FEES. Subd. 3a. Fee for change of ownership exception. (a) A license holder must submit a fee of $2,100 for each license subject to the change in ownership exception under section 245A.043, subdivision 2, paragraph (b). (b) License holders under chapter 245D must submit a fee of $4,200 for each license subject to the change in ownership exception under section 245A.043, subdivision 2, paragraph (b). (c) A license holder for a children's residential facility must submit a fee of $500 for each license subject to the change in ownership exception under section 245A.043, subdivision 2, paragraph (b). 256B.0759 SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER DEMONSTRATION PROJECT. Subd. 2. Provider participation. (a) Programs licensed by the Department of Human Services as nonresidential substance use disorder treatment programs that receive payment under this chapter must enroll as demonstration project providers and meet the requirements of subdivision 3 by January 1, 2025. Programs that do not meet the requirements of this paragraph are ineligible for payment for services provided under section 256B.0625. (b) Programs licensed by the Department of Human Services as residential treatment programs according to section 245G.21 that receive payment under this chapter must enroll as demonstration project providers and meet the requirements of subdivision 3 by January 1, 2024. Programs that do not meet the requirements of this paragraph are ineligible for payment for services provided under section 256B.0625. (c) Programs licensed by the Department of Human Services as residential treatment programs according to section 245G.21 that receive payment under this chapter, are licensed as a hospital under sections 144.50 to 144.581, and provide only ASAM 3.7 medically monitored inpatient level of care are not required to enroll as demonstration project providers. Programs meeting these criteria must submit evidence of providing the required level of care to the commissioner to be exempt from enrolling in the demonstration. (d) Programs licensed by the Department of Human Services as withdrawal management programs according to chapter 245F that receive payment under this chapter must enroll as demonstration project providers and meet the requirements of subdivision 3 by January 1, 2024. Programs that do not meet the requirements of this paragraph are ineligible for payment for services provided under section 256B.0625. (e) Out-of-state residential substance use disorder treatment programs that receive payment under this chapter must enroll as demonstration project providers and meet the requirements of subdivision 3 by January 1, 2024. Programs that do not meet the requirements of this paragraph are ineligible for payment for services provided under section 256B.0625. (f) Tribally licensed programs may elect to participate in the demonstration project and meet the requirements of subdivision 3. The Department of Human Services must consult with Tribal Nations to discuss participation in the substance use disorder demonstration project. (g) The commissioner shall allow providers enrolled in the demonstration project before July 1, 2021, to receive applicable rate enhancements authorized under subdivision 4 for all services provided on or after the date of enrollment, except that the commissioner shall allow a provider to receive applicable rate enhancements authorized under subdivision 4 for services provided on or after July 22, 2020, to fee-for-service enrollees, and on or after January 1, 2021, to managed care enrollees, if the provider meets all of the following requirements: (1) the provider attests that during the time period for which the provider is seeking the rate enhancement, the provider took meaningful steps in their plan approved by the commissioner to meet the demonstration project requirements in subdivision 3; and (2) the provider submits attestation and evidence, including all information requested by the commissioner, of meeting the requirements of subdivision 3 to the commissioner in a format required by the commissioner. (h) The commissioner may recoup any rate enhancements paid under paragraph (g) to a provider that does not meet the requirements of subdivision 3 by July 1, 2021. Subd. 5. Federal approval. The commissioner shall seek federal approval to implement the demonstration project under this section and to receive federal financial participation. 256B.5012 ICF/DD PAYMENT SYSTEM IMPLEMENTATION. Subd. 4. ICF/DD rate increases beginning July 1, 2001, and July 1, 2002. (a) For the rate years beginning July 1, 2001, and July 1, 2002, the commissioner shall make available to each facility reimbursed under this section an adjustment to the total operating payment rate of 3.5 percent. Of this adjustment, two-thirds must be used as provided under paragraph (b) and one-third must be used for operating costs. (b) The adjustment under this paragraph must be used to increase the wages and benefits and pay associated costs of all employees except administrative and central office employees, provided that this increase must be used only for wage and benefit increases implemented on or after the first day of the rate year and must not be used for increases implemented prior to that date. (c) For each facility, the commissioner shall make available an adjustment using the percentage specified in paragraph (a) multiplied by the total payment rate, excluding the property-related payment rate, in effect on the preceding June 30. The total payment rate shall include the adjustment provided in section 256B.501, subdivision 12. (d) A facility whose payment rates are governed by closure agreements, receivership agreements, or Minnesota Rules, part 9553.0075, is not eligible for an adjustment otherwise granted under this subdivision. (e) A facility may apply for the payment rate adjustment provided under paragraph (b). The application must be made to the commissioner and contain a plan by which the facility will distribute the adjustment in paragraph (b) to employees of the facility. For facilities in which the employees are represented by an exclusive bargaining representative, an agreement negotiated and agreed to by the employer and the exclusive bargaining representative constitutes the plan. A negotiated agreement may constitute the plan only if the agreement is finalized after the date of enactment of all rate increases for the rate year. The commissioner shall review the plan to ensure that the payment rate adjustment per diem is used as provided in this subdivision. To be eligible, a facility must submit its plan by March 31, 2002, and March 31, 2003, respectively. If a facility's plan is effective for its employees after the first day of the applicable rate year that the funds are available, the payment rate adjustment per diem is effective the same date as its plan. (f) A copy of the approved distribution plan must be made available to all employees by giving each employee a copy or by posting it in an area of the facility to which all employees have access. If an employee does not receive the wage and benefit adjustment described in the facility's approved plan and is unable to resolve the problem with the facility's management or through the employee's union representative, the employee may contact the commissioner at an address or telephone number provided by the commissioner and included in the approved plan. Subd. 5. Rate increase effective June 1, 2003. For rate periods beginning on or after June 1, 2003, the commissioner shall increase the total operating payment rate for each facility reimbursed under this section by $3 per day. The increase shall not be subject to any annual percentage increase. Subd. 6. ICF/DD rate increases October 1, 2005, and October 1, 2006. (a) For the rate periods beginning October 1, 2005, and October 1, 2006, the commissioner shall make available to each facility reimbursed under this section an adjustment to the total operating payment rate of 2.2553 percent. (b) 75 percent of the money resulting from the rate adjustment under paragraph (a) must be used to increase wages and benefits and pay associated costs for employees, except for administrative and central office employees. 75 percent of the money received by a facility as a result of the rate adjustment provided in paragraph (a) must be used only for wage, benefit, and staff increases implemented on or after the effective date of the rate increase each year, and must not be used for increases implemented prior to that date. The wage adjustment eligible employees may receive may vary based on merit, seniority, or other factors determined by the provider. (c) For each facility, the commissioner shall make available an adjustment, based on occupied beds, using the percentage specified in paragraph (a) multiplied by the total payment rate, including variable rate but excluding the property-related payment rate, in effect on the preceding day. The total payment rate shall include the adjustment provided in section 256B.501, subdivision 12. (d) A facility whose payment rates are governed by closure agreements or receivership agreements is not eligible for an adjustment otherwise granted under this subdivision. (e) A facility may apply for the portion of the payment rate adjustment provided under paragraph (a) for employee wages and benefits and associated costs. The application must be made to the commissioner and contain a plan by which the facility will distribute the funds according to paragraph (b). For facilities in which the employees are represented by an exclusive bargaining representative, an agreement negotiated and agreed to by the employer and the exclusive bargaining representative constitutes the plan. A negotiated agreement may constitute the plan only if the agreement is finalized after the date of enactment of all rate increases for the rate year. The commissioner shall review the plan to ensure that the payment rate adjustment per diem is used as provided in this subdivision. To be eligible, a facility must submit its plan by March 31, 2006, and December 31, 2006, respectively. If a facility's plan is effective for its employees after the first day of the applicable rate period that the funds are available, the payment rate adjustment per diem is effective the same date as its plan. (f) A copy of the approved distribution plan must be made available to all employees by giving each employee a copy or by posting it in an area of the facility to which all employees have access. If an employee does not receive the wage and benefit adjustment described in the facility's approved plan and is unable to resolve the problem with the facility's management or through the employee's union representative, the employee may contact the commissioner at an address or telephone number provided by the commissioner and included in the approved plan. Subd. 7. ICF/DD rate increases effective October 1, 2007, and October 1, 2008. (a) For the rate year beginning October 1, 2007, the commissioner shall make available to each facility reimbursed under this section operating payment rate adjustments equal to 2.0 percent of the operating payment rates in effect on September 30, 2007. For the rate year beginning October 1, 2008, the commissioner shall make available to each facility reimbursed under this section operating payment rate adjustments equal to 2.0 percent of the operating payment rates in effect on September 30, 2008. For each facility, the commissioner shall make available an adjustment, based on occupied beds, using the percentage specified in this paragraph multiplied by the total payment rate, including the variable rate but excluding the property-related payment rate, in effect on the preceding day. The total payment rate shall include the adjustment provided in section 256B.501, subdivision 12. A facility whose payment rates are governed by closure agreements or receivership agreements is not eligible for an adjustment otherwise granted under this subdivision. (b) Seventy-five percent of the money resulting from the rate adjustments under paragraph (a) must be used for increases in compensation-related costs for employees directly employed by the facility on or after the effective date of the rate adjustments, except: (1) the administrator; (2) persons employed in the central office of a corporation that has an ownership interest in the facility or exercises control over the facility; and (3) persons paid by the facility under a management contract. (c) Two-thirds of the money available under paragraph (b) must be used for wage increases for all employees directly employed by the facility on or after the effective date of the rate adjustments, except those listed in paragraph (b), clauses (1) to (3). The wage adjustment that employees receive under this paragraph must be paid as an equal hourly percentage wage increase for all eligible employees. All wage increases under this paragraph must be effective on the same date. Only costs associated with the portion of the equal hourly percentage wage increase that goes to all employees shall qualify under this paragraph. Costs associated with wage increases in excess of the amount of the equal hourly percentage wage increase provided to all employees shall be allowed only for meeting the requirements in paragraph (b). This paragraph shall not apply to employees covered by a collective bargaining agreement. (d) The commissioner shall allow as compensation-related costs all costs for: (1) wages and salaries; (2) FICA taxes, Medicare taxes, state and federal unemployment taxes, and workers' compensation; (3) the employer's share of health and dental insurance, life insurance, disability insurance, long-term care insurance, uniform allowance, and pensions; and (4) other benefits provided, subject to the approval of the commissioner. (e) The portion of the rate adjustments under paragraph (a) that is not subject to the requirements in paragraphs (b) and (c) shall be provided to facilities effective October 1 of each year. (f) Facilities may apply for the portion of the rate adjustments under paragraph (a) that is subject to the requirements in paragraphs (b) and (c). The application must be submitted to the commissioner within six months of the effective date of the rate adjustments, and the facility must provide additional information required by the commissioner within nine months of the effective date of the rate adjustments. The commissioner must respond to all applications within three weeks of receipt. The commissioner may waive the deadlines in this paragraph under extraordinary circumstances, to be determined at the sole discretion of the commissioner. The application must contain: (1) an estimate of the amounts of money that must be used as specified in paragraphs (b) and (c); (2) a detailed distribution plan specifying the allowable compensation-related and wage increases the facility will implement to use the funds available in clause (1); (3) a description of how the facility will notify eligible employees of the contents of the approved application, which must provide for giving each eligible employee a copy of the approved application, excluding the information required in clause (1), or posting a copy of the approved application, excluding the information required in clause (1), for a period of at least six weeks in an area of the facility to which all eligible employees have access; and (4) instructions for employees who believe they have not received the compensation-related or wage increases specified in clause (2), as approved by the commissioner, and which must include a mailing address, email address, and the telephone number that may be used by the employee to contact the commissioner or the commissioner's representative. (g) The commissioner shall ensure that cost increases in distribution plans under paragraph (f), clause (2), that may be included in approved applications, comply with requirements in clauses (1) to (4): (1) costs to be incurred during the applicable rate year resulting from wage and salary increases effective after October 1, 2006, and prior to the first day of the facility's payroll period that includes October 1 of each year shall be allowed if they were not used in the prior year's application and they meet the requirements of paragraphs (b) and (c); (2) a portion of the costs resulting from tenure-related wage or salary increases may be considered to be allowable wage increases, according to formulas that the commissioner shall provide, where employee retention is above the average statewide rate of retention of direct care employees; (3) the annualized amount of increases in costs for the employer's share of health and dental insurance, life insurance, disability insurance, and workers' compensation shall be allowable compensation-related increases if they are effective on or after April 1 of the year in which the rate adjustments are effective and prior to April 1 of the following year; and (4) for facilities in which employees are represented by an exclusive bargaining representative, the commissioner shall approve the application only upon receipt of a letter of acceptance of the distribution plan, as regards members of the bargaining unit, signed by the exclusive bargaining agent and dated after May 25, 2007. Upon receipt of the letter of acceptance, the commissioner shall deem all requirements of this section as having been met in regard to the members of the bargaining unit. (h) The commissioner shall review applications received under paragraph (f) and shall provide the portion of the rate adjustments under paragraphs (b) and (c) if the requirements of this subdivision have been met. The rate adjustments shall be effective October 1 of each year. Notwithstanding paragraph (a), if the approved application distributes less money than is available, the amount of the rate adjustment shall be reduced so that the amount of money made available is equal to the amount to be distributed. Subd. 8. ICF/DD rate decreases effective July 1, 2009. Effective July 1, 2009, the commissioner shall decrease each facility reimbursed under this section operating payment adjustments equal to 2.58 percent of the operating payment rates in effect on June 30, 2009. For each facility, the commissioner shall implement the rate reduction, based on occupied beds, using the percentage specified in this subdivision multiplied by the total payment rate, including the variable rate but excluding the property-related payment rate, in effect on the preceding date. The total rate reduction shall include the adjustment provided in subdivision 7. Subd. 9. ICF/DD rate increase effective July 1, 2011; Clearwater County. Effective July 1, 2011, the commissioner shall increase the daily rate to $138.23 at an intermediate care facility for the developmentally disabled located in Clearwater County and classified as a class A facility with 15 beds. Subd. 10. ICF/DD rate decrease effective July 1, 2011; exception for Clearwater County. For each facility reimbursed under this section, except for a facility located in Clearwater County and classified as a class A facility with 15 beds, the commissioner shall decrease operating payment rates equal to 0.095 percent of the operating payment rates in effect on June 30, 2011. For each facility, the commissioner shall apply the rate reduction, based on occupied beds, using the percentage specified in this subdivision multiplied by the total payment rate, including the variable rate but excluding the property-related payment rate, in effect on the preceding date. The total rate reduction shall include the adjustment provided in section 256B.501, subdivision 12. Subd. 11. ICF/DD rate decrease effective July 1, 2011. For each facility reimbursed under this section, the commissioner shall decrease operating payments equal to 1.5 percent of the operating payment rates in effect on June 30, 2011. For each facility, the commissioner shall apply the rate reduction, based on occupied beds, using the percentage specified in this subdivision multiplied by the total payment rate, including the variable rate but excluding the property-related payment rate, in effect on the preceding date. The total rate reduction shall include the adjustment provided in section 256B.501, subdivision 12. Subd. 12. ICF/DD rate increase effective July 1, 2013. For each facility reimbursed under this section, the commissioner shall increase operating payments equal to one-half percent of the operating payment rates in effect on June 30, 2013. For each facility, the commissioner shall apply the rate increase, based on occupied beds, using the percentage specified in this subdivision multiplied by the total payment rate, including the variable rate but excluding the property-related payment rate, in effect on the preceding date. The total rate increase shall include the adjustment provided in section 256B.501, subdivision 12. Subd. 14. Rate increase effective June 1, 2013. For rate periods beginning on or after June 1, 2013, the commissioner shall increase the total operating payment rate for each facility reimbursed under this section by $7.81 per day. The increase shall not be subject to any annual percentage increase. Subd. 15. ICF/DD rate increases effective April 1, 2014. (a) Notwithstanding subdivision 12, for each facility reimbursed under this section, for the rate period beginning April 1, 2014, the commissioner shall increase operating payments equal to one percent of the operating payment rates in effect on March 31, 2014. (b) For each facility, the commissioner shall apply the rate increase based on occupied beds, using the percentage specified in this subdivision multiplied by the total payment rate, including the variable rate, but excluding the property-related payment rate in effect on the preceding date. The total rate increase shall include the adjustment provided in section 256B.501, subdivision 12. Subd. 16. ICF/DD rate increases effective July 1, 2014. (a) For the rate period beginning July 1, 2014, the commissioner shall increase operating payments for each facility reimbursed under this section equal to five percent of the operating payment rates in effect on June 30, 2014. (b) For each facility, the commissioner shall apply the rate increase based on occupied beds, using the percentage specified in this subdivision multiplied by the total payment rate, including the variable rate but excluding the property-related payment rate in effect on June 30, 2014. The total rate increase shall include the adjustment provided in section 256B.501, subdivision 12. (c) To receive the rate increase under paragraph (a), each facility reimbursed under this section must submit to the commissioner documentation that identifies a quality improvement project that the facility will implement by June 30, 2015. Documentation must be provided in a format specified by the commissioner. Projects must: (1) improve the quality of life of intermediate care facility residents in a meaningful way; (2) improve the quality of services in a measurable way; or (3) deliver good quality service more efficiently while using the savings to enhance services for the participants served. (d) For a facility that fails to submit the documentation described in paragraph (c) by a date or in a format specified by the commissioner, the commissioner shall reduce the facility's rate by one percent effective January 1, 2015. (e) Facilities that receive a rate increase under this subdivision shall use 80 percent of the additional revenue to increase compensation-related costs for employees directly employed by the facility on or after July 1, 2014, except: (1) persons employed in the central office of a corporation or entity that has an ownership interest in the facility or exercises control over the facility; and (2) persons paid by the facility under a management contract. This requirement is subject to audit by the commissioner. (f) Compensation-related costs include: (1) wages and salaries; (2) the employer's share of FICA taxes, Medicare taxes, state and federal unemployment taxes, workers' compensation, and mileage reimbursement; (3) the employer's share of health and dental insurance, life insurance, disability insurance, long-term care insurance, uniform allowance, pensions, and contributions to employee retirement accounts; and (4) other benefits provided and workforce needs, including the recruiting and training of employees as specified in the distribution plan required under paragraph (i). (g) For public employees under a collective bargaining agreement, the increase for wages and benefits is available and pay rates must be increased only to the extent that the increases comply with laws governing public employees' collective bargaining. Money received by a facility under paragraph (e) for pay increases for public employees must be used only for pay increases implemented between July 1, 2014, and August 1, 2014. (h) For a facility that has employees that are represented by an exclusive bargaining representative, the provider shall obtain a letter of acceptance of the distribution plan required under paragraph (i), in regard to the members of the bargaining unit, signed by the exclusive bargaining agent. Upon receipt of the letter of acceptance, the facility shall be deemed to have met all the requirements of this subdivision in regard to the members of the bargaining unit. Upon request, the facility shall produce the letter of acceptance for the commissioner. (i) A facility that receives a rate adjustment under paragraph (a) that is subject to paragraph (e) shall prepare, and upon request submit to the commissioner, a distribution plan that specifies the amount of money the facility expects to receive that is subject to the requirements of paragraph (e), including how that money will be distributed to increase compensation for employees. The commissioner may recover funds from a facility that fails to comply with this requirement. (j) By January 1, 2015, the facility shall post the distribution plan required under paragraph (i) for a period of at least six weeks in an area of the facility's operation to which all eligible employees have access and shall provide instructions for employees who do not believe they have received the wage and other compensation-related increases specified in the distribution plan. The instructions must include a mailing address, email address, and telephone number that an employee may use to contact the commissioner or the commissioner's representative. 256D.09 PAYMENT; ASSESSMENT; OVERPAYMENT. Subd. 2a. Vendor payments for drug dependent persons. If, at the time of application or at any other time, there is a reasonable basis for questioning whether a person applying for or receiving financial assistance is drug dependent, as defined in section 254A.02, subdivision 5, the person shall be referred for a chemical health assessment, and only emergency assistance payments or general assistance vendor payments may be provided until the assessment is complete and the results of the assessment made available to the county agency. A reasonable basis for referring an individual for an assessment exists when: (1) the person has required detoxification two or more times in the past 12 months; (2) the person appears intoxicated at the county agency as indicated by two or more of the following: (i) the odor of alcohol; (ii) slurred speech; (iii) disconjugate gaze; (iv) impaired balance; (v) difficulty remaining awake; (vi) consumption of alcohol; (vii) responding to sights or sounds that are not actually present; (viii) extreme restlessness, fast speech, or unusual belligerence; (3) the person has been involuntarily committed for drug dependency at least once in the past 12 months; or (4) the person has received treatment, including domiciliary care, for drug abuse or dependency at least twice in the past 12 months. The assessment and determination of drug dependency, if any, must be made by an assessor qualified under section 245G.11, subdivisions 1 and 5, to perform an assessment of chemical use. The county shall only provide emergency general assistance or vendor payments to an otherwise eligible applicant or recipient who is determined to be drug dependent, except up to 15 percent of the grant amount the person would otherwise receive may be paid in cash. Notwithstanding subdivision 1, the commissioner of human services shall also require county agencies to provide assistance only in the form of vendor payments to all eligible recipients who assert substance use disorder as a basis for eligibility under section 256D.05, subdivision 1, paragraph (a), clauses (1) and (5). The determination of drug dependency shall be reviewed at least every 12 months. If the county determines a recipient is no longer drug dependent, the county may cease vendor payments and provide the recipient payments in cash. Subd. 2b. Disability verification; substance use disorder. If at any time there is verification that the client's disability is dependent upon the client's continued drug addiction or alcoholism, general assistance for rent and utilities must be made in the form of vendor payments. Verification of drug addiction or alcoholism can be received from: (1) denial of Social Security benefits based on drug addiction or alcoholism; (2) a statement from the state medical review team that the person's disability is dependent upon continued drug addiction or alcoholism; or (3) a doctor's statement that the person's disability is dependent upon continued drug addiction or alcoholism. 256K.45 HOMELESS YOUTH ACT. Subd. 2. Homeless youth report. (a) The commissioner shall prepare a biennial report, beginning February 1, 2025, which provides meaningful information to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over homeless youth, that includes but is not limited to: (1) a list of the areas of the state with the greatest need for services and housing for homeless youth, and the level and nature of the needs identified; (2) details about grants made, including shelter-linked youth mental health grants under section 256K.46; (3) the distribution of funds throughout the state based on population need; (4) follow-up information, if available, on the status of homeless youth and whether they have stable housing two years after services are provided; and (5) any other outcomes for populations served to determine the effectiveness of the programs and use of funding. (b) This subdivision expires December 31, 2034. 626.557 REPORTING OF MALTREATMENT OF VULNERABLE ADULTS. Subd. 10. Duties of county social service agency. (a) When the common entry point refers a report to the county social service agency as the lead investigative agency or makes a referral to the county social service agency for emergency adult protective services, or when another lead investigative agency requests assistance from the county social service agency for adult protective services, the county social service agency shall immediately assess and offer emergency and continuing protective social services for purposes of preventing further maltreatment and for safeguarding the welfare of the maltreated vulnerable adult. The county shall use standardized tools and the data system made available by the commissioner. The information entered by the county into the standardized tool must be accessible to the Department of Human Services. In cases of suspected sexual abuse, the county social service agency shall immediately arrange for and make available to the vulnerable adult appropriate medical examination and treatment. When necessary in order to protect the vulnerable adult from further harm, the county social service agency shall seek authority to remove the vulnerable adult from the situation in which the maltreatment occurred. The county social service agency may also investigate to determine whether the conditions which resulted in the reported maltreatment place other vulnerable adults in jeopardy of being maltreated and offer protective social services that are called for by its determination. (b) Within five business days of receipt of a report screened in by the county social service agency for investigation, the county social service agency shall determine whether, in addition to an assessment and services for the vulnerable adult, to also conduct an investigation for final disposition of the individual or facility alleged to have maltreated the vulnerable adult. (c) The county social service agency must investigate for a final disposition the individual or facility alleged to have maltreated a vulnerable adult for each report accepted as lead investigative agency involving an allegation of abuse, caregiver neglect that resulted in harm to the vulnerable adult, financial exploitation that may be criminal, or an allegation against a caregiver under chapter 256B. (d) An investigating county social service agency must make a final disposition for any allegation when the county social service agency determines that a final disposition may safeguard a vulnerable adult or may prevent further maltreatment. (e) If the county social service agency learns of an allegation listed in paragraph (c) after the determination in paragraph (a), the county social service agency must change the initial determination and conduct an investigation for final disposition of the individual or facility alleged to have maltreated the vulnerable adult. (f) County social service agencies may enter facilities and inspect and copy records as part of an investigation. The county social service agency has access to not public data, as defined in section 13.02, and medical records under sections 144.291 to 144.298, that are maintained by facilities to the extent necessary to conduct its investigation. The inquiry is not limited to the written records of the facility, but may include every other available source of information. (g) When necessary in order to protect a vulnerable adult from serious harm, the county social service agency shall immediately intervene on behalf of that adult to help the family, vulnerable adult, or other interested person by seeking any of the following: (1) a restraining order or a court order for removal of the perpetrator from the residence of the vulnerable adult pursuant to section 518B.01; (2) the appointment of a guardian or conservator pursuant to sections 524.5-101 to 524.5-502, or guardianship or conservatorship pursuant to chapter 252A; (3) replacement of a guardian or conservator suspected of maltreatment and appointment of a suitable person as guardian or conservator, pursuant to sections 524.5-101 to 524.5-502; or (4) a referral to the prosecuting attorney for possible criminal prosecution of the perpetrator under chapter 609. The expenses of legal intervention must be paid by the county in the case of indigent persons, under section 524.5-502 and chapter 563. In proceedings under sections 524.5-101 to 524.5-502, if a suitable relative or other person is not available to petition for guardianship or conservatorship, a county employee shall present the petition with representation by the county attorney. The county shall contract with or arrange for a suitable person or organization to provide ongoing guardianship services. If the county presents evidence to the court exercising probate jurisdiction that it has made a diligent effort and no other suitable person can be found, a county employee may serve as guardian or conservator. The county shall not retaliate against the employee for any action taken on behalf of the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship, even if the action is adverse to the county's interest. Any person retaliated against in violation of this subdivision shall have a cause of action against the county and shall be entitled to reasonable attorney fees and costs of the action if the action is upheld by the court. Repealed Minnesota Rule: 26-06085 9505.2165 DEFINITIONS. § Subp. 4. Fraud. "Fraud" means: § A. acts which constitute a crime against any program, or attempts or conspiracies to commit those crimes, including the following: § (1) theft in violation of Minnesota Statutes, section 609.52; § (2) perjury in violation of Minnesota Statutes, section 609.48; § (3) aggravated forgery and forgery in violation of Minnesota Statutes, sections 609.625 and 609.63; § (4) medical assistance fraud in violation of Minnesota Statutes, section 609.466; and § (5) financial transaction card fraud in violation of Minnesota Statutes, section 609.821; § B. making a false statement, false claim, or false representation to a program where the person knows or should reasonably know the statement, claim, or representation is false, including knowingly and willfully submitting a false or fraudulent application for provider status; and § C. a felony listed in United States Code, title 42, section 1320a-7b(b)(3)(D), subject to any safe harbors established in Code of Federal Regulations, title 42, part 1001, section 952.